<BODY DOCID=127>
Diamond Shamrock Corp said that
effective today it had cut its contract prices for crude oil by
1.50 dlrs a barrel.
    The reduction brings its posted price for West Texas
Intermediate to 16.00 dlrs a barrel, the copany said.
    "The price reduction today was made in the light of falling
oil product prices and a weak crude oil market," a company
spokeswoman said.
    Diamond is the latest in a line of U.S. oil companies that
have cut its contract, or posted, prices over the last two days
citing weak oil markets.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=144>
OPEC may be forced to meet before a
scheduled June session to readdress its production cutting
agreement if the organization wants to halt the current slide
in oil prices, oil industry analysts said.
    "The movement to higher oil prices was never to be as easy
as OPEC thought. They may need an emergency meeting to sort out
the problems," said Daniel Yergin, director of Cambridge Energy
Research Associates, CERA.
    Analysts and oil industry sources said the problem OPEC
faces is excess oil supply in world oil markets.
    "OPEC's problem is not a price problem but a production
issue and must be addressed in that way," said Paul Mlotok, oil
analyst with Salomon Brothers Inc.
    He said the market's earlier optimism about OPEC and its
ability to keep production under control have given way to a
pessimistic outlook that the organization must address soon if
it wishes to regain the initiative in oil prices.
    But some other analysts were uncertain that even an
emergency meeting would address the problem of OPEC production
above the 15.8 mln bpd quota set last December.
    "OPEC has to learn that in a buyers market you cannot have
deemed quotas, fixed prices and set differentials," said the
regional manager for one of the major oil companies who spoke
on condition that he not be named. "The market is now trying to
teach them that lesson again," he added.
    David T. Mizrahi, editor of Mideast reports, expects OPEC
to meet before June, although not immediately. However, he is
not optimistic that OPEC can address its principal problems.
    "They will not meet now as they try to take advantage of the
winter demand to sell their oil, but in late March and April
when demand slackens," Mizrahi said.
    But Mizrahi said that OPEC is unlikely to do anything more
than reiterate its agreement to keep output at 15.8 mln bpd."
    Analysts said that the next two months will be critical for
OPEC's ability to hold together prices and output.
    "OPEC must hold to its pact for the next six to eight weeks
since buyers will come back into the market then," said Dillard
Spriggs of Petroleum Analysis Ltd in New York.
    But Bijan Moussavar-Rahmani of Harvard University's Energy
and Environment Policy Center said that the demand for OPEC oil
has been rising through the first quarter and this may have
prompted excesses in its production.
    "Demand for their (OPEC) oil is clearly above 15.8 mln bpd
and is probably closer to 17 mln bpd or higher now so what we
are seeing characterized as cheating is OPEC meeting this
demand through current production," he told Reuters in a
telephone interview.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=191>
Texaco Canada said it lowered the
contract price it will pay for crude oil 64 Canadian cts a
barrel, effective today.
    The decrease brings the company's posted price for the
benchmark grade, Edmonton/Swann Hills Light Sweet, to 22.26
Canadian dlrs a bbl.
    Texaco Canada last changed its crude oil postings on Feb
19.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=194>
Marathon Petroleum Co said it reduced
the contract price it will pay for all grades of crude oil one
dlr a barrel, effective today.
    The decrease brings Marathon's posted price for both West
Texas Intermediate and West Texas Sour to 16.50 dlrs a bbl. The
South Louisiana Sweet grade of crude was reduced to 16.85 dlrs
a bbl.
    The company last changed its crude postings on Jan 12.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=211>
Houston Oil Trust said that independent
petroleum engineers completed an annual study that estimates
the trust's future net revenues from total proved reserves at
88 mln dlrs and its discounted present value of the reserves at
64 mln dlrs.
    Based on the estimate, the trust said there may be no money
available for cash distributions to unitholders for the
remainder of the year.
    It said the estimates reflect a decrease of about 44 pct in
net reserve revenues and 39 pct in discounted present value
compared with the study made in 1985.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=236>
Kuwait"s Oil Minister, in remarks
published today, said there were no plans for an emergency OPEC
meeting to review oil policies after recent weakness in world
oil prices.
    Sheikh Ali al-Khalifa al-Sabah was quoted by the local
daily al-Qabas as saying: "None of the OPEC members has asked
for such a meeting."
    He denied Kuwait was pumping above its quota of 948,000
barrels of crude daily (bpd) set under self-imposed production
limits of the 13-nation organisation.
    Traders and analysts in international oil markets estimate
OPEC is producing up to one mln bpd above a ceiling of 15.8 mln
bpd agreed in Geneva last December.
    They named Kuwait and the United Arab Emirates, along with
the much smaller producer Ecuador, among those producing above
quota. Kuwait, they said, was pumping 1.2 mln bpd.
    "This rumour is baseless. It is based on reports which said
Kuwait has the ability to exceed its share. They suppose that
because Kuwait has the ability, it will do so," the minister
said.
    Sheikh Ali has said before that Kuwait had the ability to
produce up to 4.0 mln bpd.
    "If we can sell more than our quota at official prices,
while some countries are suffering difficulties marketing their
share, it means we in Kuwait are unusually clever," he said.
    He was referring apparently to the Gulf state of qatar,
which industry sources said was selling less than 180,000 bpd
of its 285,000 bpd quota, because buyers were resisting
official prices restored by OPEC last month pegged to a marker
of 18 dlrs per barrel.
    Prices in New York last week dropped to their lowest levels
this year and almost three dollars below a three-month high of
19 dollars a barrel.
    Sheikh Ali also delivered "a challenge to any international
oil company that declared Kuwait sold below official prices."
    Because it was charging its official price, of 16.67 dlrs a
barrel, it had lost custom, he said but did not elaborate.
    However, Kuwait had guaranteed markets for its oil because
of its local and international refining facilities and its own
distribution network abroad, he added.
    He reaffirmed that the planned meeting March 7 of OPEC"s
differentials committee has been postponed until the start of
April at the request of certain of the body"s members.
    Ecuador"s deputy energy minister Fernando Santos Alvite said
last Wednesday his debt-burdened country wanted OPEC to assign
a lower official price for its crude, and was to seek this at
talks this month of opec"s pricing committee.
    Referring to pressure by oil companies on OPEC members, in
apparent reference to difficulties faced by Qatar, he said: "We
expected such pressure. It will continue through March and
April." But he expected the situation would later improve.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=237>
Indonesia appears to be nearing a
political crossroads over measures to deregulate its protected
economy, the U.S. Embassy says in a new report.
    To counter falling oil revenues, the government has
launched a series of measures over the past nine months to
boost exports outside the oil sector and attract new
investment.
    Indonesia, the only Asian member of OPEC and a leading
primary commodity producer, has been severely hit by last year"s
fall in world oil prices, which forced it to devalue its
currency by 31 pct in September.
    But the U.S. Embassy report says President Suharto"s
government appears to be divided over what direction to lead
the economy.
    "(It) appears to be nearing a crossroads with regard to
deregulation, both as it pertains to investments and imports,"
the report says. It primarily assesses Indonesia"s agricultural
sector, but also reviews the country"s general economic
performance.
    It says that while many government officials and advisers
are recommending further relaxation, "there are equally strong
pressures being exerted to halt all such moves."
    "This group strongly favours an import substitution economy,"
the report says.
    Indonesia"s economic changes have been welcomed by the World
Bank and international bankers as steps in the right direction,
though they say crucial areas of the economy like plastics and
steel remain highly protected, and virtual monopolies.
    Three sets of measures have been announced since last May,
which broadened areas for foreign investment, reduced trade
restrictions and liberalised imports.
    The report says Indonesia"s economic growth in calendar 1986
was probably about zero, and the economy may even have
contracted a bit. "This is the lowest rate of growth since the
mid-1960s," the report notes.
    Indonesia, the largest country in South-East Asia with a
population of 168 million, is facing general elections in
April.
    But the report hold out little hope for swift improvement
in the economic outlook. "For 1987 early indications point to a
slightly positive growth rate not exceeding one pct. Economic
activity continues to suffer due to the sharp fall in export
earnings from the petroleum industry."
    "Growth in the non-oil sector is low because of weak
domestic demand coupled with excessive plant capacity, real
declines in construction and trade, and a reduced level of
growth in agriculture," the report states.
    Bankers say continuation of present economic reforms is
crucial for the government to get the international lending its
needs.
    A new World Bank loan of 300 mln dlrs last month in balance
of payments support was given partly to help the government
maintain the momentum of reform, the Bank said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=242>
Saudi riyal interbank deposits were
steady at yesterday's higher levels in a quiet market.
    Traders said they were reluctant to take out new positions
amidst uncertainty over whether OPEC will succeed in halting
the current decline in oil prices.
    Oil industry sources said yesterday several Gulf Arab
producers had had difficulty selling oil at official OPEC
prices but Kuwait has said there are no plans for an emergency
meeting of the 13-member organisation.
    A traditional Sunday lull in trading due to the European
weekend also contributed to the lack of market activity.
    Spot-next and one-week rates were put at 6-1/4, 5-3/4 pct
after quotes ranging between seven, six yesterday.
    One, three, and six-month deposits were quoted unchanged at
6-5/8, 3/8, 7-1/8, 6-7/8 and 7-3/8, 1/8 pct respectively.
    The spot riyal was quietly firmer at 3.7495/98 to the
dollar after quotes of 3.7500/03 yesterday.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=246>
The Gulf oil state of Qatar, recovering
slightly from last year's decline in world oil prices,
announced its first budget since early 1985 and projected a
deficit of 5.472 billion riyals.
    The deficit compared with a shortfall of 7.3 billion riyals
in the last published budget for 1985/86.
    In a statement outlining the budget for the fiscal year
1987/88 beginning today, Finance and Petroleum Minister Sheikh
Abdul-Aziz bin Khalifa al-Thani said the government expected to
spend 12.217 billion riyals in the period.
    Projected expenditure in the 1985/86 budget had been 15.6
billion riyals.
    Sheikh Abdul-Aziz said government revenue would be about
6.745 billion riyals, down by about 30 pct on the 1985/86
projected revenue of 9.7 billion.
    The government failed to publish a 1986/87 budget due to
uncertainty surrounding oil revenues.
    Sheikh Abdul-Aziz said that during that year the government
decided to limit recurrent expenditure each month to
one-twelfth of the previous fiscal year's allocations minus 15
pct.
    He urged heads of government departments and public
institutions to help the government rationalise expenditure. He
did not say how the 1987/88 budget shortfall would be covered.
    Sheikh Abdul-Aziz said plans to limit expenditure in
1986/87 had been taken in order to relieve the burden placed on
the country's foreign reserves.
    He added in 1987/88 some 2.766 billion riyals had been
allocated for major projects including housing and public
buildings, social services, health, education, transport and
communications, electricity and water, industry and
agriculture.
    No figure was revealed for expenditure on defence and
security. There was also no projection for oil revenue.
    Qatar, an OPEC member, has an output ceiling of 285,000
barrels per day.
    Sheikh Abdul-Aziz said: "Our expectations of positive signs
regarding (oil) price trends, foremost among them OPEC's
determination to shoulder its responsibilites and protect its
wealth, have helped us make reasonable estimates for the coming
year's revenue on the basis of our assigned quota."
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=248>
Saudi Arabian Oil Minister Hisham Nazer
reiterated the kingdom's commitment to last December's OPEC
accord to boost world oil prices and stabilise the market, the
official Saudi Press Agency SPA said.
    Asked by the agency about the recent fall in free market
oil prices, Nazer said Saudi Arabia "is fully adhering by the
... Accord and it will never sell its oil at prices below the
pronounced prices under any circumstance."
    Nazer, quoted by SPA, said recent pressure on free market
prices "may be because of the end of the (northern hemisphere)
winter season and the glut in the market."
    Saudi Arabia was a main architect of the December accord,
under which OPEC agreed to lower its total output ceiling by
7.25 pct to 15.8 mln barrels per day (bpd) and return to fixed
prices of around 18 dlrs a barrel.
    The agreement followed a year of turmoil on oil markets,
which saw prices slump briefly to under 10 dlrs a barrel in
mid-1986 from about 30 dlrs in late 1985. Free market prices
are currently just over 16 dlrs.
    Nazer was quoted by the SPA as saying Saudi Arabia's
adherence to the accord was shown clearly in the oil market.
    He said contacts among members of OPEC showed they all
wanted to stick to the accord.
    In Jamaica, OPEC President Rilwanu Lukman, who is also
Nigerian Oil Minister, said the group planned to stick with the
pricing agreement.
    "We are aware of the negative forces trying to manipulate
the operations of the market, but we are satisfied that the
fundamentals exist for stable market conditions," he said.
    Kuwait's Oil Minister, Sheikh Ali al-Khalifa al-Sabah, said
in remarks published in the emirate's daily Al-Qabas there were
no plans for an emergency OPEC meeting to review prices.
    Traders and analysts in international oil markets estimate
OPEC is producing up to one mln bpd above the 15.8 mln ceiling.
    They named Kuwait and the United Arab Emirates, along with
the much smaller producer Ecuador, among those producing above
quota. Sheikh Ali denied that Kuwait was over-producing.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=273>
Saudi crude oil output last month fell
to an average of 3.5 mln barrels per day (bpd) from 3.8 mln bpd
in January, Gulf oil sources said.
    They said exports from the Ras Tanurah and Ju'aymah
terminals in the Gulf fell to an average 1.9 mln bpd last month
from 2.2 mln in January because of lower liftings by some
customers.
    But the drop was much smaller than expected after Gulf
exports rallied in the fourth week of February to 2.5 mln bpd
from 1.2 mln in the third week, the sources said.
    The production figures include neutral zone output but not
sales from floating storage, which are generally considered
part of a country's output for Opec purposes.
    Saudi Arabia has an Opec quota of 4.133 mln bpd under a
production restraint scheme approved by the 13-nation group
last December to back new official oil prices averaging 18 dlrs
a barrel.
    The sources said the two-fold jump in exports last week
appeared to be the result of buyers rushing to lift February
entitlements before the month-end.
    Last week's high export levels appeared to show continued
support for official Opec prices from Saudi Arabia's main crude
customers, the four ex-partners of Aramco, the sources said.
    The four -- Exxon Corp &lt;XON>, Mobil Corp &lt;MOB>, Texaco Inc
&lt;TX> and Chevron Corp &lt;CHV> -- signed a long-term agreement
last month to buy Saudi crude for 17.52 dlrs a barrel.
    However the sources said the real test of Saudi Arabia's
ability to sell crude at official prices in a weak market will
come this month, when demand for petroleum products
traditionally tapers off. Spot prices have fallen in recent
weeks to more than one dlr below Opec levels.
    Saudi Arabian oil minister Hisham Nazer yesterday
reiterated the kingdom's commitment to the December OPEC accord
and said it would never sell below official prices.
    The sources said total Saudi refinery throughput fell
slightly in February to an average 1.1 mln bpd from 1.2 mln in
January because of cuts at the Yanbu and Jubail export
refineries.
    They put crude oil exports through Yanbu at 100,000 bpd
last month, compared to zero in January, while throughput at
Bahrain's refinery and neutral zone production remained steady
at around 200,000 bpd each.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=349>
Deputy oil ministers from six Gulf
Arab states will meet in Bahrain today to discuss coordination
of crude oil marketing, the official Emirates news agency WAM
reported.
    WAM said the officials would be discussing implementation
of last Sunday's agreement in Doha by Gulf Cooperation Council
(GCC) oil ministers to help each other market their crude oil.
    Four of the GCC states - Saudi Arabia, the United Arab
Emirates (UAE), Kuwait and Qatar - are members of the
Organiaation of Petroleum Exporting Countries (OPEC) and some
face stiff buyer resistance to official OPEC prices.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=352>
Saudi Arabian Oil Minister Hisham Nazer
reiterated the kingdom's commitment to last December's OPEC
accord to boost world oil prices and stabilize the market, the
official Saudi Press Agency SPA said.
    Asked by the agency about the recent fall in free market
oil prices, Nazer said Saudi Arabia "is fully adhering by the
... accord and it will never sell its oil at prices below the
pronounced prices under any circumstance."
    Saudi Arabia was a main architect of December pact under
which OPEC agreed to cut its total oil output ceiling by 7.25
pct and return to fixed prices of around 18 dollars a barrel.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=353>
Kuwait's oil minister said in a newspaper
interview that there were no plans for an emergency OPEC
meeting after the recent weakness in world oil prices.
    Sheikh Ali al-Khalifa al-Sabah was quoted by the local
daily al-Qabas as saying that "none of the OPEC members has
asked for such a meeting."
    He also denied that Kuwait was pumping above its OPEC quota
of 948,000 barrels of crude daily (bpd).
    Crude oil prices fell sharply last week as international
oil traders and analysts estimated the 13-nation OPEC was
pumping up to one million bpd over its self-imposed limits.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=368>
The port of Philadelphia was closed
when a Cypriot oil tanker, Seapride II, ran aground after
hitting a 200-foot tower supporting power lines across the
river, a Coast Guard spokesman said.
    He said there was no oil spill but the ship is lodged on
rocks opposite the Hope Creek nuclear power plant in New
Jersey.
    He said the port would be closed until today when they
hoped to refloat the ship on the high tide.
    After delivering oil to a refinery in Paulsboro, New
Jersey, the ship apparently lost its steering and hit the power
transmission line carrying power from the nuclear plant to the
state of Delaware.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=489>
A study group said the United States
should increase its strategic petroleum reserve to one mln
barrels as one way to deal with the present and future impact
of low oil prices on the domestic oil industry.
    U.S. policy now is to raise the strategic reserve to 750
mln barrels, from its present 500 mln, to help protect the
economy from an overseas embargo or a sharp price rise.
    The Aspen Institute for Humanistic Studies, a private
group, also called for new research for oil exploration and
development techniques.
    It predicted prices would remain at about 15-18 dlrs a
barrel for several years and then rise to the mid 20s, with
imports at about 30 pct of U.S. consumption.
    It said instead that such moves as increasing oil reserves
and more exploration and development research would help to
guard against or mitigate the risks of increased imports.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=502>
A study group said the United States
should increase its strategic petroleum reserve to one mln
barrels as one way to deal with the present and future impact
of low oil prices on the domestic oil industry.
    U.S. policy now is to raise the strategic reserve to 750
mln barrels, from its present 500 mln, to help protect the
economy from an overseas embargo or a sharp price rise.
    The Aspen Institute for Humanistic Studies, a private
group, also called for new research for oil exploration and
development techniques.
    It predicted prices would remain at about 15-18 dlrs a
barrel for several years and then rise to the mid 20s, with
imports at about 30 pct of U.S. consumption.
    The study cited two basic policy paths for the nation: to
protect the U.S. industry through an import fee or other such
device or to accept the full economic benefits of cheap oil.
    But the group did not strongly back either option, saying
there were benefits and drawbacks to both.
    It said instead that such moves as increasing oil reserves
and more exploration and development research would help to
guard against or mitigate the risks of increased imports.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=543>
Unocal Corp's Union Oil Co said it
lowered its posted prices for crude oil one to 1.50 dlrs a
barrel in the eastern region of the U.S., effective Feb 26.
    Union said a 1.50 dlrs cut brings its posted price for the
U.S. benchmark grade, West Texas Intermediate, to 16 dlrs.
Louisiana Sweet also was lowered 1.50 dlrs to 16.35 dlrs, the
company said.
    No changes were made in Union's posted prices for West
Coast grades of crude oil, the company said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=704>
The New York Mercantile Exchange set
April one for the debut of a new procedure in the energy
complex that will increase the use of energy futures worldwide.
     On April one, NYMEX will allow oil traders that do not
hold a futures position to initiate, after the exchange closes,
a transaction that can subsequently be hedged in the futures
market, according to an exchange spokeswoman.
    "This will change the way oil is transacted in the real
world," said said Thomas McKiernan, McKiernan and Co chairman.
    Foreign traders will be able to hedge trades against NYMEX
prices before the exchange opens and negotiate prices at a
differential to NYMEX prices, McKiernan explained.
     The expanded program "will serve the industry because the
oil market does not close when NYMEX does," said Frank Capozza,
secretary of Century Resources Inc.
     The rule change, which has already taken effect for
platinum futures on NYMEX, is expected to increase the open
interest and liquidity in U.S. energy futures, according to
traders and analysts.
    Currently, at least one trader in this transaction, called
an exchange for physical or EFP, must hold a futures position
before entering into the transaction.
    Under the new arrangement, neither party has to hold a
futures position before entering into an EFP and one or both
parties can offset their cash transaction with a futures
contract the next day, according to exchange officials.
    When NYMEX announced its proposed rule change in December,
NYMEX President Rosemary McFadden, said, "Expansion of the EFP
provision will add to globalization of the energy markets by
providing for, in effect, 24-hour trading."
    The Commodity Futures Trading Commission approved the rule
change in February, according to a CFTC spokeswoman.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=708>
Argentine crude oil production was
down 10.8 pct in January 1987 to 12.32 mln barrels, from 13.81
mln barrels in January 1986, Yacimientos Petroliferos Fiscales
said.
    January 1987 natural gas output totalled 1.15 billion cubic
metrers, 3.6 pct higher than 1.11 billion cubic metres produced
in January 1986, Yacimientos Petroliferos Fiscales added.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=791>
The New York Mercantile Exchange said
it will introduce exchanges for physicals (EFPS) to its energy
futures markets April one.
    An exchange spokeswoman said the change will allow oil
traders that do not hold a futures position to initiate, after
the exchange closes, a transaction that can subsequently be
hedged in the futures market.
    EFPs, already in effect for platinum futures on NYMEX, are
expected to increase the open interest and liquidity in U.S.
energy futures, according to traders and analysts.
    The Commodity Futures Trading Commission approved the rule
change in February, according to a CFTC spokeswoman.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=835>
Greece, responding to a warning by Turkey
against conducting oil activities in the Aegean Sea, said today
it had the right to decide where and how to do research or
drilling work in the area.
    A government spokesman said the Greek position was made
clear to Turkey's ambassador Nazmi Akiman when he met Greek
Foreign Affairs Undersecretary Yannis Kapsis last week.
    Acting Turkish Prime Minister Kaya Erdem said earlier today
Greek activities in the northern Aegean contravened the 1976
Berne Agreement which set the framework for talks on the Aegean
continental shelf disputed between Ankara and Athens.
    The Greek statement today said, "Greece is not prepared to
give up even a trace of its sovereignty rights to the seabed.
It has been stressed to...Mr Akiman that the decision where or
how to drill belongs exclusively to the Greek government."
    "The Greek government has repeatedly let the Turkish side
know that it considers the 1976 Berne protocol as inactive
through the fault of Turkey," it said.
    The Greek statement said Athens was ready to put the
continental shelf issue before international courts.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=873>
Opec remains within its agreed output
ceiling of 15.8 mln barrels a day, and had expected current
fluctuations in the spot market of one or two dlrs, Indonesian
Energy Minister Subroto said.
    He told reporters after meeting with President Suharto that
present weakness in the spot oil market was the result of
warmer weather in the U.S. And Europe which reduced demand for
oil.
    Prices had also been forced down because refineries were
using up old stock, he said.
    He denied that Opec was exceeding its agreed production
ceiling. Asked what Opec's output level was now, he replied:
"Below 15.8 (mln barrels per day)." He did not elaborate.
    He said there appeared to have been some attempts to
manipulate the market, but if all Opec members stick by the
cartel's December pricing agreement it would get through
present price difficulties.
    He predicted that prices would recover again in the third
and fourth quarters of 1987.
    He also reiterated that there was no need for an emergency
Opec meeting.
    He said Opec had expected to see some fluctuations in the
spot price. "We hope the weak price will be overcome, and
predict the price will be better in the third and fourth
quarters."
    Refiners, he said, appeared to have used up old stock
deliberately to cause slack demand in the market and the price
to fall. But Opec would get through this period if members
stuck together.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=918>
Mexican state oil firm Petroleos Mexicanos
(Pemex) signed for a 500 mln dlr&#127;untied loan from the
Export-Import Bank of Japan to finance its Pacific Petroleum
Project, Pemex Japan representative Tito Ayal said.
    No further details on the loan were immediately available.
    Ayala told an oil seminar the project, due for completion
in 1988, is aimed at improving distribution of oil products in
the domestic market, mainly along the Pacific coast.
    The project consists of a pipeline linking Nueva Teapa on
the Gulf of Mexico with Salina Cruz on the Pacific Coast, and
construction of the second phase of the Salina Cruz refinery.
    The project also includes construction of liquified
petroleum gas (LPG) storage tanks at Santa Cruz, additional
crude oil storage at both ends of the pipeline, an ammonia
complex at Lazaro Cardenas on the Pacific Coast and expansion
of the infrastructure of the port of Salina Cruz, Ayala said.
    Pemex will buy 80 mln dlrs worth of foreign equipment and
materials for the project, he said. The new pipeline will
enable Japan to load Mexico's Maya crude oil at Salina Cruz
rather than in the Gulf of Mexico. Pemex will also have some
LPG surplus available in Salina Cruz that may help Japan
diversify its supply sources of that product, he added.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=930>
Mobil Corp &lt;MOB.N> of the U.S. Plans to
open an office in Peking to develop oil exploration
opportunities in China, the China Daily said.
    It quoted Mobil president Richard Tucker, currently in
Peking, as saying he is optimistic about investment prospects
in China and that Peking will continue to encourage foreign
private businesses to invest here.
    It said Mobil bought 73 mln dlrs of crude oil and oil
products from China in 1986 and sold it lubricant and
fertiliser, but gave no more details.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=945>
Mobil Oil Corp of U.S. Plans to open an
office in Peking to develop oil exploration opportunities in
China, the China Daily said.
     It quoted Mobil president Richard Tucker, currently in
Peking, as saying he is optimistic about investment prospects
in China and that Peking will continue to encourage foreign
private businesses to invest here.
     It said Mobil bought 73 mln dlrs of crude oil and oil
products from China in 1986 and sold it lubricant and
fertiliser, but gave no more details.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=952>
Opec remains within its agreed output
ceiling of 15.8 mln barrels a day, and had expected current
fluctuations in the spot market of one or two dlrs, Indonesian
Energy Minister Subroto said.
    He told reporters after meeting with President Suharto that
present weakness in the spot oil market was the result of
warmer weather in the U.S. And Europe which reduced demand for
oil.
    Prices had also been forced down because refineries were
using up old stock, he said.
    He denied that Opec was exceeding its agreed production
ceiling. Asked what Opec's output level was now, he replied:
"Below 15.8 (mln barrels per day)." He did not elaborate.
    He said there appeared to have been some attempts to
manipulate the market, but if all Opec members stick by the
cartel's December pricing agreement it would get through
present price difficulties.
    He predicted that prices would recover again in the third
and fourth quarters of 1987.
    He also reiterated that there was no need for an emergency
Opec meeting.
    He said Opec had expected to see some fluctuations in the
spot price. "We hope the weak price will be overcome, and
predict the price will be better in the third and fourth
quarters."
    Refiners, he said, appeared to have used up old stock
deliberately to cause slack demand in the market and the price
to fall. But Opec would get through this period if members
stuck together.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=988>
&lt;BP Oil Ltd>, the U.K. Marketing and
refining arm of British Petroleum Co Plc &lt;BP.L>, raised its
pretax operating profit on a replacement cost basis to 182 mln
stg in calendar 1986, compared with 66 mln stg in 1985.
    Sales and operating revenue fell to 3.1 billion stg from
4.2 billion on a replacement cost basis. Historical cost
operating profit was 61 mln stg, up from 16 mln.
    BP Oil said 1985 profits had been depressed by exceptional
items. Its profit figures were stated before interest charges.
    Chief executive David Kendall said improved results
mirrored benefits of a restructuring program undertaken in
recent years.
    However, he warned future financial pressure on the
industry will be severe.
    "The U.K. Oil marketing and refining industry will need to
invest larger sums - probably around 500 mln stg a year - for a
good many years," he said in a statement.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1026>
The Kenyan economy is heading for
difficult times after a boom last year, and the country must
tighten its belt to prevent the balance of payments swinging
too far into deficit, President Daniel Arap Moi said.
    In a speech at the state opening of parliament, Moi said
high coffee prices and cheap oil in 1986 led to economic growth
of five pct, compared with 4.1 pct in 1985.
    The same factors produced a two billion shilling balance of
payments surplus and inflation fell to 5.6 pct from 10.7 pct in
1985, he added.
    "But both these factors are no longer in our favour ... As a
result, we cannot expect an increase in foreign exchange
reserves during the year," he said.
    The price of coffee, Kenya's main source of foreign
exchange, fell in London today to about 94 cents a pound from a
peak of 2.14 dlrs in January 1986.
    Crude oil, which early last year slipped below 10 dlrs a
barrel, has since crept back to over 18 dlrs.
    Moi said the price changes, coupled with a general decline
in the flow of capital from the rest of the world, made it more
difficult to finance the government's budget deficit.
    Kenya was already spending over 27 pct of its budget on
servicing its debts and last year it was a net exporter of
capital for the first time in its history, he added.
    "This is a clear indication that we are entering a difficult
phase as regards our external debts, and it is imperative that
we raise the rate of domestic savings and rely less on foreign
sources to finance our development," he said.
    "It will be necessary to maintain strict discipline on
expenditure ... And members of this house will have to take the
lead in encouraging wananchi (ordinary people) to be more
frugal in satisfying immediate needs," the president added.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1306>
Crude oil prices rallied today, moving
over 17.00 dlrs a barrel because of Saudi Arabia's determined
effort to support prices, analysts said.
    "The Saudis and other OPEC nations are jawboning the market,
hoping to restore confidence and prices and to do this without
another meeting," said Sanford Margoshes, oil analyst with
Shearson Lehman Brothers Inc.
    "But OPEC is not out of the woods yet by a longshot due to
seasonal declines in demand and some cheating," he added.
    Oil industry analysts said Saudi Arabia has led the attempt
to get other OPEC members to resist pressures to discount from
the official prices agreed to last december.
    The analysts said that to get others to hold the line,
Saudi Arabia pushed hard at the meeting of deputy oil ministers
of the Gulf Cooperation Council last weekend and at the
Cooperation Council oil ministers' meeting the previous week.
    The Saudis have also offered to support members having
difficulty in selling their oil, analysts said.
    "They are trying to make sure that no one discounts, and to
prevent that, it appears that Saudi Arabia or some other OPEC
member will allocate some of their oil sales to help members
that lose sales," Margoshes said.
    He added that the allocations would probably be in the form
of loans to be repaid when these nations resume sales.
    Analysts said this would be useful in keeping in line
nations like Qatar, which has had trouble selling oil. But it
is also likely that such assistance would be provided to
Nigeria which is under pressure to extend discounts.
    Analysts said that Saudi Arabia, with assistance from OPEC
president Rilwanu Lukman, was trying to avoid an emergency OPEC
meeting for fear that it would give the appearance that the
December pact is falling apart.
    Daniel McKinley, oil analyst with Smith Barney, Upham
Harris and Co said, "both physical and futures markets have been
oversold and it only took a small spark to bring on a short
covering rally."
    He believes an Iranian trade mission to Tokyo, which
refused discounts to Japanese buyers, brought Japanese refiners
into the market to cover their short positions.
    Oil traders said one japanese refiner came into the market
to but 10 cargoes of May Dubai, which sent prices up on Mideast
sours, with Dubai trading up to 16.50 dlrs after trading
yeterray as low as 15.63 dlrs and then spilled over into the
North sea crude oil market.
    Traders said that there have been persistent rumors today
that Japanese buyers are looking to pick up cargoes of Brent
for Japan and European trade sources indidate rumors of vessels
being fixed to make such shipments.
    North sea brent today rose over 17.00 dlrs with trades
reported as high as 17.05 dlrs, up one dlr.
    OPEC members' denials that they are producing over their
quotas sparked moves to cover short postitions.
    Indonesian oil minister Subroto said today that OPEC
production was below the 15.8 mln bpd quota agreed to last
december but he gave no details on OPEC production against
claims it was more at least one mln bpd above that level.
    "The production probably is about their quota level and
largely because Saudi Arabia will not discount and canot sell
its oil as a result," Margoshes said.
    Analysts have mixed opinions about the extent of the
current rally. Some believe prices can continue to rise if
Saudi Arabia and OPEC hold steady in a refusal to discount.
    But others said that despite the rally today there were
still several fundamental factors, including demand, which
could cut the rally short.
    Marion Stewart, an indepedent petroleum economist, said
slow growth in the economies of the U.S. and OECD would keep
demand for oil slack and he now estimates that demand to rise
about 1.4 pct over 1986.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1335>
&lt;PanCanadian Petroleum Ltd>
said it agreed to sell its working interest in its North Sea
properties and its British unit, Canadian Pacific Oil and Gas
of Canada Ltd, to Whitehall Petroleum Ltd, a private British
company.
    PanCanadian, 87 pct-owned by Canadian Pacific Ltd &lt;CP>,
said it would receive 1.7 mln British pounds cash (3.5 mln
Canadian dlrs) at closing, expected in two to three months.
    It said the deal is subject to approval by regulators and
its partners in the properties, which consist of exploration
wells. It will also retain a royalty interest in the
properties.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1343>
Distillate fuel stocks held in
primary storage fell by 4.4 mln barrels in the week ended Feb
27 to 127.10 mln barrels from 131.50 mln the previous week, the
American Petroleum Institute (API) said.
    In its weekly statistical bulletin, the oil industry trade
group said gasoline stocks fell 30,000 barrels to 252.92 mln
barrels from a revised 252.95 mln, while crude oil stocks rose
700,000 barrels to 329.38 mln from a revised 328.68 mln.
    It said residual fuel stocks fell 380,000 barrels to 38.04
mln from 38.42 mln barrels.
    API said refinery runs in the week fell to 12.17 mln
barrels per day from a revised 12.42 mln and refinery use of
operating capacity was 78.1 pct, off from a revised 79.7 pct.
    Crude oil imports in the week fell to 3.98 mln bpd from a
revised 4.22 mln, API added.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1387>
Saudi Arabia will succeed in pressuring
other members of the Organization of Petroleum Exporting
Countries to stay within their production quotas, said Morgan
Stanley Group managing director John Wellemeyer.
    Wellemeyer, speaking to reporters at an offshore oil
engineering conference, also said he expected OPEC nations to
attempt to hold prices under 20 dlrs a barrel for several years
to keep industrial demand for residual fuel oil strong.
    "Over the next few weeks I think you'll see a concerted
effort by the Saudis to get production down," Wellemeyer said.
    "The Saudis are committed to that price level (of 18 dlrs a
barrel) and are willing to make it happen again," he said.
    In recent weeks, oil prices fell to the 16 to 17 dlrs a
barrel level on market reports of some OPE members producing
above their quota, pushing total OPEC production to 15.8 mln
barrels per day. But prices rebounded today, with April U.S.
crude prices up about one dlr to over 17 dlrs a barrel on a
belief Saudi Arabia is attempting to curb OPEC output.
    Wellemeyer said that sharp declines in U.S. oil production
could push demand for OPEC oil above 20 mln barrels per day as
early as 1989 and up to 24 mln barrels per day by 1993.
    Although the projected increases in demand for OPEC oil
should strengthen world prices, Wellemeyer said he believed the
organization would hold its official price below 20 dlrs a
barrel for some time to prevent residual fuel users from
switching to natural gas supplies. The interfuel swing market
accounts for about eight mln barrels a day, or 18 pct of the
world demand for oil.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1556>
Worldwide spot crude oil movements fell
to 30.07 mln long dwt in February from 37.25 mln tons in
January and 41.44 mln in December, London shipbroker Howard
Houlder said.
    The decline mainly reflected a sharp drop in movements out
of the Mideast Gulf, which totalled 7.4 mln tons last month
against 11.65 mln in January. These included shipments to
western options at 2.05 mln tons against 3.59 mln previously.
    Liftings from the Gulf to eastern options fell to 4.15 mln
tons from 5.94 mln and those from the Gulf to other areas
dropped to 1.2 mln tons from 2.13 mln, Howard Houlder said.
    U.K./Continent coastal movements declined sharply to 2.91
mln tons from 4.77 mln but those from the U.K./Continent to the
U.S. rose to 1.99 mln from 1.69 mln.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1616>
Drilling for oil in California is
likely to continue at last year's sharply reduced levels
despite recent gains in crude oil prices, industry analysts
said.
    Because much of the crude oil in California fields is
thick, heavy and expensive to extract, oil prices would have to
increase to near 1985's levels before any significant recovery
is seen in drilling, they said.
    "Companies will probably only drill their best prospects,"
said John Curti, an analyst with Birr Wilson Securities Inc.
    Few new wells now are being drilled.
    Only 33 rigs, about one-quarter of the total available,
were drilling for oil onshore in California last week, compared
to about 70 last year, said Bill Bolster of Munger Oil
Information Services, which tracks California drilling
activity.
    "It's in the dregs right now," said Bolster of the state's
drilling activity.
    Current prices are not enough to justify increased
drilling, said Ed Malmgreen of the California Independent
Producers Association.
    While an Organization of Petroleum Exporting Countries pact
to curb production boosted oil prices early this year, prices
eventually fell.
    Prices for California's marker grade, Line 63 blend, have
slumped about 20 pct in the last month to 14 dlrs from a high
of about 17 dlrs.
    More than half of California's oil comes from stripper
wells, those producing less than 10 barrels a day, and that
much of that oil costs between 18 and 25 dlrs a barrel to
extract, Malmgreen said.
    "It's not unusual for a stripper well to cost 18 dlrs,"
Malmgreen said.
    Many stripper wells along the southern California coast
produce eight times as much water as crude oil, and inland
wells frequently require the use of steam injection to spur
extraction of the thick, heavy oil, he said.
    The outlook for future production in California is clouded
by a lack of exploratory drilling now, analysts said.
    In the heart of California's oil patch, Kern County, which
produces about two-thirds of the state's oil, exploratory
drilling has slowed to a crawl.
    Only 55 exploratory wells were drilled in Kern County in
1986, compared to 137 in 1985, according to David Mitchell of
the state energy commission. So far this year only five
exploratory wells have been drilled.
    "I don't think they'll even get to what they did last
year," Mitchell said.
    No pickup in exploratory drilling is likely for the rest of
the decade, Mitchell said.
    Along with the fall in drilling has come a decrease in the
number of producing wells and overall production.
    Between February and October of 1986, the number of
producing oil wells in California fell 14 pct to 43,521 from
more than 50,000, said Bill Guerard of the California Energy
Commission.
    In line with that decrease, California's crude oil output
fell about 10 pct last year due to low oil prices and is
expected to remain at that lower level, analysts said.
    Between February and October 1986, California's crude oil
production slipped from an all-time high of 1.185 mln barrels
per day to 1.066 mln bpd, Guerard said.
    Total estimated crude oil production in California for 1986
was 408 mln bbls, compared with 424 mln bbls in 1985 and 405
mln bbl in 1983, according to the California Department of
Conservation.
    "Production in 1987 will probably hold around 1986 levels,"
Guerard said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1661>
&lt;Sterling Investment Group>
said it successfully drilled and completed a significant
development well 65 miles southwest of Houston, Texas.
    The well has a choke of 11/64 of an inch and is 10,097 feet
deep.
    The well initially tested at a maximum daily flow rate of
two mln cubic feet of gas and 304 barrels of condensate.
    Participants in the new well, along with Sterling, are
Trafalgar House Ltd of the U.K. and &lt;Texstar NOrth America Inc.>
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1686>
Iranian Oil Minister Gholamreza Aqazadeh
is expected here on Friday for talks with his Algerian
counterpart Belkacem Nabi, the official Algerian news agency
APS said today.
    Aqazadeh, who will be accompanied by a large delegation,
will have talks on bilateral relations in the field of energy
and exchange views with Algerian officials on the current world
energy situation, it said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1692>
The U.K. Offshore oil industry has
suffered from last year's collapse in oil prices but should not
sustain any permament damage, Minister of State for Energy
Alick Buchanan-Smith said.
    The drilling, diving and supply vessels sectors had been
most affected, Buchanan Snith told the House of Commons energy
committee. He noted, however, that oil companies were still
spending six mln stg a day to maintain North Sea production.
    He added that a report by the manpower services committee
which said 14,000 jobs were lost in the industry in 1986 should
be seen in the context of a total workforce of 300,000.
    Prices of North Sea Brent-grade crude dipped to a low of
8.50
dlrs a barrel last July from a peak of over 30 dlrs the
previous November.
    They recovered to around 18 dlrs a barrel after last
December's OPEC meeting and Brent traded today around 17.15
dlrs.
    Buchanan-Smith said the U.K. Has no intention of adopting
OPEC style quotas, noting that Britian is an oil-consuming as
well as an oil-producing nation.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1709>
Resource Exploration Inc said it has
agreed to let &lt;Langasco Energy Corp> drill 50 oil and
natural gas wells on its Clinton Sandstone formation within its
Tuscarawas and Harrison County, Ohio area of operation.
    Resource said it would receive a cash payment and an
overriding royalty interest on oil and gas production from
wells drilled on the property.
    Resource said gas produced from the property will be
transported through its existing pipeline. Also, Resource said
it will provide service work to complete the wells and it will
operate the wells after they are completed.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1711>
Texas Railroad Commissioner James
Nugent, saying that the ailing oilpatch cannot wait for
Congress to act, today urged Texas state lawmakers to adopt
incentives to find new oil reserves and to exempt severance
taxes on oil produced from stripper wells.
    Nugent said in a speech to the Texas house of
representatives that the state must take the initiative in
molding U.S. energy policy and finding new ways to assist
troubled oil producers.
    His proposal to revitalize Texas' oil industry would exempt
stripper wells that produce 10 barrels of oil or less each day
from the state's 4.6 pct severance tax. He said that the
majority of Texas' oil wells fall within the stripper well
category and a price swing of two to three dlrs a barrel can be
crucial in determining if the well remains in production.
    Nugent also called for state lawmakers to exempt new
wildcat wells from the state severance tax for up to five years
as a financial incentive to explore for new oil reserves.
    Secondary and tertiary oil production, expensive methods of
production that inject water or gas into the ground to recover
oil, should also be exempted from the severance tax, Nugent
said. His plan would exempt existing secondary and tertiary
wells that produce at a rate of less than three barrels a day
for three years, or until the price of oil reaches $25 a
barrel.
    "We've been sitting back and waiting on two federal
administrations to develop a coherent energy policy for the
nation to follow. I say we have waited long enough," Nugent
said. "In other words, let's tell Washington to either lead,
follow, or get out of the way."
    Nugent said that the financial losses to the state treasury
by exempting marginal oil production from state severance taxes
would be more than made up by stimulating new business for the
oil supply and service industry.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1856>
Distillate fuel stocks held in
primary storage fell by 3.4 mln barrels in the week ended Feb
27 to 128.4 mln barrels, the Energy Information Administration
(EIA) said.
    In its weekly petroleum status report, the Department of
Energy agency said gasoline stocks were off 100,000 barrels in
the week to 251.5 mln barrels and refinery crude oil stocks
were up 3.2 mln barrels to 333.0 mln.
    The EIA said residual fuel stocks fell 2.2 mln barrels to
37.9 mln barrels and crude oil stocks in the Strategic
Petroleum Reserve (SPR) were up 700,000 barrels to 516.5 mln.
    The total of all crude, refined product and SPR stocks were
unchanged at 1,575.1 mln barrels, it said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1875>
Southland Corp's Citgo Petrleum Corp
said it raised the contract price it will pay for all grades of
crude oil by one dlr a barrel, effective today.
    The increase brings Citgo's posted price for West Texas
Intermediate to 17.00 dlrs a bbl. West Texas Sour is also now
priced at 17.00 dlrs/bbl, and Light Louisiana South is posted
at 17.35 dlrs/bbl.
    On February 25 Citgo lowered its crude postings 50 cts to
1.50 dlrs per bbl, and cut WTI one dlr to 16.00.
    
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1878>
U.S. oil demand as measured by
products supplied rose 2.1 pct in the four weeks ended February
27 to 16.39 mln barrels per day (bpd) from 16.05 mln in the
same period a year ago, the Energy Information Administration
(EIA) said.
    In its weekly petroleum status report, the Energy
Department agency said distillate demand was down 2.1 pct in
the period to 3.37 mln bpd from 3.44 mln a year earlier.
    Gasoline demand averaged 6.60 mln bpd, up 2.4 pct from 6.44
mln last year, while residual fuel demand was 1.47 mln bpd, up
1.9 pct from 1.44 mln, the EIA said.
    Domestic crude oil production was estimated at 8.38 mln
bpd, down 8.7 pct from 9.18 mln a year ago, and gross daily
crude imports (excluding those for the SPR) averaged 4.11 mln
bpd, up 36.9 pct from three mln, the EIA said.
    Refinery crude runs in the four weeks were 12.21 mln bpd,
up 2.2 pct from 12 mln a year earlier, it said.
    Year-to-date figures will not become available until March
26 when EIA's Petroleum Supply Monthly data for January 1987
becomes available, the agency said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1904>
A group of creditor banks hopes to work
out a rescue package for Japan Line Ltd &lt;JLIT.T>, one of the
world's largest tanker operators, by the end of Japan's
business year on March 31, a spokesman for the Industrial Bank
of Japan Ltd &lt;IBJT.T> (IBJ) said.
    Japan Line's cumulative debt was 68.98 billion yen at the
end of September, which exceeded shareholders' equities and
reserves totalling 63.40 billion.
    In December, Japan Line asked banks to shelve repayment of
about 124 billion yen in outstanding loans and about 153
billion in loans to its subsidiaries.
    Japan Line said then that the yen's steep rise and the
world shipping recession had hit the company hard.
    The Japanese daily Asahi Shimbun said today that IBJ and
three other banks plan to abandon a total of 16 billion yen in
loans to Japan Line and a group of creditor banks plans to buy
seven billion yen of new Japan Line shares.
    The spokesman for IBJ, Japan Line's largest creditor, said
the package may write off part of the outstanding loans and
will be worked out before long.
    Commenting on the article, he said the details of the
package have not yet been settled.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1909>
OPEC countries are all sticking firmly to
official crude oil prices but the volatility of spot prices is
likely to continue into the third quarter, Indonesian Minister
of Mines and Energy Subroto told Reuters.
    Subroto, attending a Pacific Energy Cooperation conference,
blamed recent rapid spot price changes on unbalanced supply and
demand. "If we stick to the production limitation, the third
quarter will be in better balance."
    He said the market is in a period of transition while the
impact of OPEC's December agreement to cut output and fix
prices at an average 18 dlrs a barrel is worked through.
    Asked whether OPEC members of the Gulf Cooperation Council
(GCC) had any concrete proposals to help Qatar sell its crude
oil in the face of strong resistance to its official prices,
Subroto said: "Apparently they have taken care of that."
    "They (the GCC) meet very often among themselves. I think
they'll help each other," he said.
    Subroto said that as he was not a member of OPEC's Price
Differentials Committee he did not know why the meeting had
been postponed from its scheduled April 2 date.
    "Maybe they find it is better not to have the meeting
because ... Everyone is sticking to official prices," he said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1948>
The Papua New Guinea Government
will establish a public corporation to invest in resources
projects, Minerals and Energy Minister John Kaputin said.
    "We intend to provide a means through which less privileged
individuals can become part owners and beneficiaries from the
development of mining and petroleum projects," he told
Parliament.
    Existing policy allowing the state up to 30 pct equity in
major mining projects and 22.5 pct in oil and gas projects
would be maintained, he said. The planned agency could take
over the state's equity in current developments.
    Kaputin said Papua New Guinea was experiencing a boom with
exploration companies spending about 60 mln kina annually on
about 150 mining and 23 petroleum projects.
    "The Government is determined to ensure that Papua New
Guinean ownership in minerals and petroleum projects increases
in an orderly way," he said.
    Kaputin did not say when the corporation would be
established or exactly what form it would take, but said the
government would study whether it should be directly involved
in exploration or development.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1980>
Ice conditions are unchanged at the
Soviet Baltic oil port of Ventspils, with continuous and
compacted drift ice 15 to 30 cms thick, the latest report of
the Finnish Board of Navigation said.
    Icebreaker assistance to reach Ventspils harbour is needed
for normal steel vessels without special reinforcement against
ice, the report said.
    It gave no details of ice conditions at the other major
Soviet Baltic export harbour of Klaipeda.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1990>
OPEC crude oil output in the first few
days of March was running at about 14.7 mln bpd, down from a 16
mln bpd average for February and well below the 15.8 mln bpd
ceiling the group adopted in December, a Reuter survey shows.
    The figures were polled by Reuters correspondents from oil
traders, industry executives and analysts in Europe, the Middle
East, Africa, Latin America and Asia.
    They back recent statements by OPEC ministers that the
group is producing within its ceiling to support the return to
a fixed price system, which came into effect last month.
    OPEC output for the whole of February was about 200,000 bpd
above the ceiling, largely because of overproduction by the
United Arab Emirates and Kuwait, the figures show.
    The UAE, together with the much smaller producer Ecuador,
was also producing above quota in the first days of March, the
survey reveals.
    But such overproduction was compensated for by a sharp fall
in Saudi Arabian output, together with Iran"s inability to
export as much as its quota allows.
    Iraq rejected its OPEC quota of 1.466 mln bpd and produced
1.75 mln bpd in February and early March, the figures showed.
    Saudi output -- excluding movements into stocks -- fell to
3.1 mln bpd in early March from 3.5 mln bpd in February,
against a 4.133 mln bpd quota. The Saudi figures include a
200,000 bpd share of Neutral Zone production.
    Kuwait, which has consistently denied quota violations, was
estimated to be pumping 1.4 mln bpd in February and 1.15 in
early March -- both figures including 200,000 bpd as its share
of Neutral Zone output -- against its 948,000 bpd quota.
    Reports of customer resistance to fixed prices set by some
OPEC states were reflected in output from Qatar and Nigeria,
both substantially under quota in February and early March.
    Qatar's February output was 230,000 bpd, and this fell to
180,000 bpd in early March compared with its 285,000 bpd quota.
    Industry sources say Japanese buyers are resisting Qatar"s
prices and Gulf Arab oil states have pledged to make up for any
shortfall in sales which a fellow Gulf state suffers.
    Nigeria's early March output was about one mln bpd, down
from 1.14 mln bpd in February and its quota of 1.238 mln bpd.
    Industry sources say Nigeria's customers believe its Bonny
grades are overpriced compared with compatible Brent crudes
from the U.K. North Sea.
    Country-by-country production figures are as follows, in
mln bpd -
 COUNTRY        CURRENT        FEBRUARY    QUOTA
 ALGERIA        0.64           0.64        0.635
 ECUADOR        0.26           0.26        0.210
 GABON          0.15           0.15        0.152
 INDONESIA      1.16           1.16        1.133
 IRAN           1.80           2.20        2.255
 IRAQ           1.75           1.75        1.466
 KUWAIT         1.15           1.40        0.948
 LIBYA          0.95           0.95        0.948
 NIGERIA        1.00           1.14        1.238
 QATAR          0.18           0.23        0.285
 SAUDI ARABIA   3.10           3.50        4.133
 UAE            1.10           1.15        0.902
 VENEZUELA      1.50           1.50        1.495
 TOTAL          14.7           16.0        15.8
 REUTER
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10011>
Canadian oil exports rose 20 pct in 1986
over the previous year to 33.96 mln cubic meters, while oil
imports soared 25.2 pct to 20.58 mln cubic meters, Statistics
Canada said.
    Production, meanwhile, was unchanged from the previous year
at 91.09 mln cubic feet.
    Natural gas exports plunged 19.4 pct to 21.09 billion cubic
meters, while Canadian sales slipped 4.1 pct to 48.09 billion
cubic meters.
    The federal agency said that in December oil production
fell 4.0 pct to 7.73 mln cubic meters, while exports rose 5.2
pct to 2.84 mln cubic meters and imports rose 12.3 pct to 2.1
mln cubic meters.
    Natural gas exports fell 16.3 pct in the month 2.51 billion
cubic meters and Canadian sales eased 10.2 pct to 5.25 billion
cubic meters.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10078>
British Petroleum Co Plc does not
intend to raise the price of its planned 70 dlr per share offer
for the publicly held 45 pct of Standard Oil Co, BP Managing
Director David Simon said.
    "We don't seen this as any progressive bidding game," he
told reporters at a news conference. BP now owns 55 pct of
Standard's stock.
    Simon said BP had carefully considered the amount of its
planned bid and he quoted an oil analyst, whom he would not
identify, as saying BP's careful evaluation means the company
is not going to raise its offer.
    "I think that (an increase) would be totally wrong. I think
the price is very fair and it is much to early to speculate
about ligigation," he said. "Let's wait and see how the offer
runs."
    Another official declined to speculate under what
circumstances BP might raise its bid.
    The BP official said the 70 dlrs a share offer is 7.2 times
Standard's 1986 cash flow and 56 pct above an independent
evaluation of the company's assets, including the value of its
oil, natural gas liquids and natural gas reserves.
    He said the price Royal Dutch/Shell Group &lt;RD> &lt;SC> paid
for publicly held Shell Oil Co shares in 1985 was 5.1 times
cash flow.
    The BP official also said the 70 dlr bid is a 40 pct
premium over Standard's stock price over the past year.
    BP Group Treasurer Rodney Chase said more than half to as
much as two-third's of the 7.4 billion dlrs BP needs for its
offer will come from existing sources. The rest will be
financed by new debt.
    BP will draw in cash from its operating companies around
the world and is also arranging a five billion dlr line of
credit, he explained.
    The company's debt to equity ratio will rise 11 or 12
percentage points from the current 33 pct if the offer is
completed, Chase said. But the ratio will be back below 40 pct
within 12 months, he added.
    Chase also said 50 to 60 pct of Standard Oil's publicly
held shares are held by financial institutions.
    Simon said Standard's board was informed of the offer on
March nine and has been considering it since that time.
    He said BP does not expect any regulatory problems that
would delay completion of the acquisition. "We have informed
Washington of our intentions and we've already been an integral
part of ownership of U.S. oil reserves," he pointed out.
    Simon said there is a good chance that current world oil
prices of about 18 dlrs a barrel could be maintained, and that
the more stable market is due mostly to changes in policy in
Saudi Arabia and other OPEC members to control oil production.
    "We think there are signals that current conditions are
more favorable than they have been for sometime," Simon said.
    "We have hopes for greater stability, but we do not see
prices going much higher," he added.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10080>
British Petroleum Plc's plan to pay
7.4 billion dlrs for less than half of Standard Oil Co has
signalled higher values in the U.S. oil patch, analysts said.
    "I think that BP's bid is a very strong affirmation and
clear signal that they have confidence in the U.S., and they
think the barrel of oil in the ground is going to go higher,"
said Sanford Margoshes of Shearson Lehman Brothers Inc.
    BP earlier today said its U.S. unit planned to tender at 70
dlrs per share for the 45 pct of Standard it does not already
own.
    "It's a 7.4 billion dlr price that (shows) OPEC has won the
war and oil prices are not going to crack," said Prescott, Ball
and Turben analyst Bruce Lazier.
    "Behind that is a huge implication for the rest of the
energy issues out there in the stock market, particularly those
that are acquisition targets," Lazier said.
    One of those mentioned by Lazier was USX Corp, an
energy-steel concern which had been courted by investor Carl
Icahn and drew the attention of Australian Robert Holmes a
Court last year. Rumors continue to swirl around its stock.
    Margoshes said he does not foresee major U.S. oil firms
falling into takeover situations for several years, with the
exception of possibly Amerada Hess Corp &lt;AHC>. He said most of
the majors found partners in the last round of matchmaking
which ended two years ago, and others restructured to the point
that they have become unattractive.
    U.S. oil stocks rallied in response to the offer. Exxon
Corp &lt;XON> rose 1-1/8 to 88-1/2. Chevron Corp &lt;CHV> jumped
1-1/8 to 58-7/8, and Texaco &lt;TX> climbed 1/4 to 37-3/4. Unocal
Corp &lt;UCL> rose 1-3/4, while Occidental Petroleum Corp &lt;OXY>
climbed 1-1/8 to 34-3/4. Amoco Corp &lt;AN> rose 1-3/8 to 83-3/4.
    Standard Oil's stock was up 6-1/4 in heavy trading to
71-1/8. Earlier in the session it had been at a high of 72-1/4.
Wall Street has speculated British Petroleum may boost its
offer by several dlrs per share, but the company maintained it
would not raise the 70 dlr bid.
    British Petroleum stock rose 2-1/4 to 59-5/8.
    Analysts said the fact British Petroleum made such a bid in
the first place indicates that the British oil giant has
changed its outlook for the oil industry.
    Analysts said last year British Petroleum held one of the
more bearish positions on oil prices.
    "They said the real price of oil would stay at 15 dlrs (a
barrel) for several years, and I think they beat a hasty
retreat from that point of view," Margoshes said.
    "They are more appropriately today looking more
optimistically. I believe they are looking at 18 dlrs
(long-term)...also in their heart of hearts they believe that
will be exceeded," Margoshes said.
    The U.S. benchmark crude West Texas Intermediate was
trading today around 18.60 dlrs per barrel.
    Analysts said British Petroleum might have been able to buy
up the rest of Standard Oil for about 50 dlrs per share when
oil prices were falling last year.
    They said Standard Oil's brightest asset is its slightly
more than 50 pct ownership of the Alaskan Prudhoe Bay oil
field. Analysts also said the company has other interests in
the Alaskan North Slope.
    Analysts said the Standard investment is extremely
attractive to BP because the U.S. is the largest oil market and
has hard-to-replace reserves.
    "I think it just fits in with their long-range plans to
increase their position in the U.S. market," Dean Witter
analyst Eugene Nowak said.
    Analysts said it also raises BP's visibility ahead of the
British government's announced disposal of 31.7 pct of BP
stock. The U.K. government said it would dispose of the holding
sometime in the year beginning April one.
    After acquiring all of Standard, most of BP's reserves
would be in the U.S., but only about six pct of its stock is
held in the U.S.
    "The only way they can sell all that stock is to move it
into the United States. No other market can handle all that
stock," said L.F. rothschild analyst Rosario Ilacqua.
    In 1986, Standard Oil had net losses of 345 mln dlrs on
revenues of 10.02 billion dlrs, compared to a profit the year
earlier of 308 mln dlrs on revenues of 13.82 billion dlrs.
    
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10106>
USX Corp chairman David Roderick said
the company had ended talks with British Petroleum Co Plc &lt;BP>
about the possible sale of some energy assets and said USX has
no immediate restructuring plans for its oil businesses.
    "We have terminated our discussions," Roderick told Reuters
after a speech to the Petroleum Equipment Suppliers Association
here. He said USX was not conducting talks with any other
possible buyer of its energy assets.
    Earlier today, BP said it planned to offer 70 dlrs per
share for the Standard Oil Co's &lt;SRD> publicly held stock.
    USX said in December the company had held formal
discussions with BP about the potential sale of some of its
overseas oil assets and USX had received expressions of
interest from a half dozen other oil companies.
    Roderick, in response to a question, said USX had no
immediate plans to restructure its Marathon Oil Co, or Texas
Oil and Gas Corp. He said USX also did not plan to sell any of
its 49 pct interest in the giant Yates Field in west Texas.
    "We want to maintain our production in the Yates Field
during these difficult times," Roderick added.
    In response to a question, Roderick also said he did not
know whether Australian investor Robert Holmes a Court was
accumulating USX stock. In recent days, traders have suggested
Holmes a Court was buying additional shares.
    Roderick said Carl Ichan, who terminated an eight billion
dlr hostile takeover plan for USX in January, continued to hold
a sizable interest in the company. "Mr. Ichan still apparently
has 11.4 pct. He hasn't bought any more stock or sold any,"
Roderick said. "He's a very satisfied shareholder right now. I
talk with him monthly."
    In his speech, Roderick predicted the fall in the value of
the dollar would set the stage for the U.S. to solve its trade
deficit problem which totaled 170 billion dlrs in 1986.
    "I expect by the early 1990s the U.S. will be running a net
trade surplus," Roderick said. "I think the worst is over and
we can look forward to stability and upward movement ahead."
    However, the USX chairman warned that European trading
partners may resist the turn in the U.S. trade deficit. "Some
economic discomfort must be transferred from the United States
to our friends, trading partners and allies."
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10168>
British Petroleum Co PLC may have to
raise its planned 70 dlrs a share tender offer for the publicly
traded shares of Standard Oil Co &lt;SRD>, analysts said.
    "There's a lot of speculation here that someway or other
they would be forced to come up with another bid," said Rosario
Ilaqua of L.F. Rothschild.
    And despite BP managing director David Simon's denial today
that BP would raise the offer, the analysts said that remained
a distinct possibility.
    Analysts said they base their thinking on Royal Dutch/Shell
Group's &lt;RD> &lt;SC> bid to buy the outstanding stake of Shell Oil
Co in 1984 and 1985. Royal Dutch/Shell eventually raised its
initial 55 dlrs a share offer to 60 dlrs a share, after
lawsuits by minority shareholders.
    "I think they're going to have to go a little higher
eventually, just as Royal Dutch/Shell had to go a little higher
for the Shell Oil minority shares," Bruce Lazier of Prescott
Ball and Turben said. He estimated a price of 75 dlrs a share.
    Royal Dutch/Shell offered 55 dlrs a share for the 30.5 pct
of Shell Oil it did not already own in January of 1984. After
objections from minority shareholders about the price, Royal
Dutch/Shell raised its bid and began a 58 dlrs a share tender
offer in April 1984.
    But shareholders sued and a court blocked completion of the
offer. After months of wrangling over the worth of Shell Oil,
Royal Dutch/Shell agreed to another two dlrs increase.
    It ended up paying 5.67 billion dlrs for the outstanding
Shell Oil stake, a significant premium to its original bid of
about 5.2 billion dlrs.
    The analysts made their comments before Simon's remarks at
a BP press conference in New York this afternoon.
    Sanford Margoshes of Shearson Lehman Brothers Inc told
clients this morning that a sweetened offer was possible. The
analyst said the bid could be raised by two dlrs a share.
    Analysts do not expect regulatory hurdles because of the
Royal Dutch/Shell group precedent. But there may be shareholder
lawsuits for the same reason, they said.
    Goldman Sachs and Co, BP's investment advisor, advised the
Shell Oil board in 1984 and 1985.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10190>
Standard Oil Co expects the sale of
assets and federal tax refunds resulting from last year's loss
to add about one billion dlrs to its normal cash flows from
operations in 1987, its annual report said.
    Last year, the report noted, the cash flow from operations
dropped to 1.8 billion dlrs from 3.5 billion dlrs in 1985 and
3.2 billion dlrs in 1984 due principally to lower oil prices.
    The report, prepared before British Petroleum Co Plc &lt;BP>
disclosed plans to seek the rest of Standard's stock, put 1987
capital spending at 1.6 billion dlrs, down from the 1.7 billion
dlrs projected in January.
    Standard's capital spending totaled 1.77 billion dlrs in
1986.
    The report showed a decline in proven oil reserves to 2.41
billion barrels at the end of 1986 from 2.65 billion barrels a
year earlier as discoveries and other additions dropped to 11.4
mln barrels last year from 23.2 mln in 1985.
    But it said gas reeserves rose to 7.31 trillion cubic feet
from 7.22 trillion at the end of 1985 despite a 30.9 mln cubic
feet downward revision in previous reserve estimates during
1986. Discoveries and other additions totaled 200.5 billion
cubic feet last year, up from 175.9 billion in 1985, it added.
    Standard said both oil and gas production increased last
year -- to 726,600 barrels per day from 719,700 barrels the
previous day and to 154.4 mln cubic feet daily from 10.1 mln in
1985.
    But the average sales price of both dropped -- to 13.83
dlrs per barrel from 26.43 dlrs for oil in 1985 and to 1.49
dlrs per thousand cubic feet from 2.18 dlrs a year earlier.
    Standard said its refined product sales also rose last
year, to 644,500 barrels per day from 604,200 barrels daily in
1985.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10192>
Energy and Mines Minister Arturo
Hernandez Grisanti today told a meeting of regional oil
exporters the next few months will be critical to efforts to
achieve price recovery and stabilize the market.
     Hernandez said while OPEC and non-OPEC nations have
already made some strides in their efforts to strengthen the
market, the danger of a reversal is always present.
    "March and the next two or three months will be a really
critical period," Hernandez said. He said, "We will be able to
define a movement, either towards market stability and price
recovery or, depending on the market, a reversal."
    Earlier this week, Hernandez said Venezuela's oil price has
averaged just above 16 dlrs a barrel for the year to date. If
OPEC achieves its stated goal of an 18 dlrs a barrel average
price, he said, Venezuela's should move up to 16.50 dlrs.
    Hernandez spoke today at the opening of the fifth
ministerial meeting of the informal group of Latin American and
Caribbean oil exporters, formed in 1983.
    Ministers from member states Ecuador, Mexico,
Trinidad-Tobago and Venezuela are attending the two day
conference, while Colombia is present for the first time as an
observer.
    Hernandez defined the meeting as an informal exchange of
ideas about the oil market. However, the members will also
discuss ways to combat proposals for a tax on imported oil
currently before the U.S. Congress.
    Following the opening session, the group of ministers met
with President Jaime Lusinchi at Miraflores, the presidential
palace. The delegations to the conference are headed by
Hernandez of Venezuela, Energy Minister Javier Espinosa of
Ecuador, Energy Minister Kelvin Ramnath of Trinidad-Tobago,
Jose Luis Alcudiai, assistant energy secretary of Mexico and
Energy Minister Guilermno Perry Rubio of Colombia.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10200>
Brazilian crude oil and
liquefied natural gas production fell to an average 583,747
barrels per day in February from 596,740 in the same 1986
month, the state oil company Petrobras said.
    The drop was due to operating problems in the Campos Basin,
the country's main producing area, where output was down to
346,011 bpd from 357,420, a Petrobras statement said.
    Consumption of oil derivatives totalled 1.14 mln bpd in
February, 16.7 pct up on February last year but down from the
record 1.22 mln bpd used in October last year. Use of alcohol
fuel in February was 208,600 bpd, 42 pct above February, 1986.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10228>
Top executives with Tenneco Corp &lt;TGT>
and Sabine Corp &lt;SAB> said they expected world oil prices to
gradually increase over the next two years as U.S. reliance on
imports of oil from the Middle East grows.
     "I believe we have bottomed out and can look forward to a
trend of gradually increasing prices," C.W. Nance, president of
Tenneco Oil Exploration and Production, told a meeting of the
Petroleum Equipment Suppliers Association.
     Nance predicted that by 1990, the Organization of
Producing and Exporting Countries would be producing at the
rate of 80 pct of capacity.
    The gain will come largely through increased imports to the
United States, he said.
    "They will be able to raise the price again but I do not
think they will raise it as much as they did in 1979," Nance
said. He did not say how much of a price hike he expected.
     Andrew Shoup, chairman of Dallas-based Sabine, predicted
that world oil prices would increase from a range of 15 to 20
dlrs a barrel in 1987 to a range of 17 to 22 dlrs a barrel in
1988. Natural gas prices, Shoup said, should similarly climb
from a range of 1.30 to 1.70 dlrs per mcf this year to between
1.50 and 1.90 dlrs per mcf in 1988.
     "Fuel switching could help us as much as five pct in
increased demand," Shoup said, referring to the gas industry's
outlook for 1987. Repeal of the Fuel Use Act, a federal law
prohibiting the use of natural gas in new manufacturing plants
and utilities, could increase demand for gas by as much as 15
pct, he said.
     Tenneco's Nance also said that some U.S. cities may
experience peak day shortages in natural gas supplies next
winter because of the industry's reduced deliverability.
     Tenneco's gas deliverability, for example, dropped by 20
pct during 1986, he said.
     "This does not mean the gas bubble is gone," Nance said.
"We believe gas prices have bottomed out. The real question is
how broad the valley is -- is it one year, two years or three
years before we start to climb out?"
      J.C. Walter of &lt;Walter Oil and Gas Corp>, said the recent
improvement in oil prices was not enough for independent
producers to begin new onshore drilling projects.
     "If crude oil stays below 20 dlrs a barrel and 1.50 dlr
per mcf for natural gas prevails, the prospects for onshore
exploration at deeper depths in the Texas Gulf Coast by
independents in the 1990s are pretty dismal," Walter said.
     He suggested that some independents may instead turn to
exploration in shallow federal offshore leases. Farm-out
agreements, cheap rig rates and less competition have held
finding costs in those areas to five or six dlrs a barrel,
Walter said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10268>
India is searching for non-communist
countertrade partners to help it cut its trade deficit and
conserve foreign exchange.
    Wheat, tobacco, tea, coffee, jute, engineering and
electronic goods, as well as minerals including iron ore, are
all on offer in return for crude oil, petroleum products,
chemicals, steel and machinery, trade sources told Reuters.
    Most of the impetus behind countertrade, which began in
1984, comes from two state trading firms -- the State Trading
Corp (STC) and the Minerals and Metals Trading Corp (MMTC).
    "The two state trading corporations are free to use their
buying power in respect to bulk commodities to promote Indian
exports," a commerce ministry spokeswoman said, adding that
private firms are excluded from countertrading.
    One trade source said India has targetted countries that
depend on an Indian domestic market recently opened to foreign
imports.
    However, countertrade deals still make up only a small part
of India's total trading and are likely to account for less
than eight pct of the estimated 18.53 billion dlrs in trade
during the nine months ended December, the sources said.
    Countertrade accounted for just five pct of India's 25.65
billion dlrs in trade during fiscal 1985/86 ended March,
against almost nothing in 1984/85, official figures show.
    However, the figures exclude exchanges with the Eastern
Bloc paid in non-convertible Indian rupees, the sources said.
    Total trade with the Soviet Union, involving swaps of
agricultural produce and textiles for Soviet arms and crude
oil, is estimated at 3.04 billion dlrs in fiscal 1986/87,
against three billion in 1985/86.
    Indian countertrade, which is being promoted mainly to help
narrow the country's large trade deficit, is still
insignificant compared with agreements reached by Indonesia,
Venezuela and Brazil, the trade sources said.
    The trade deficit, which hit an estimated record 6.96
billion dlrs in 1985/86, is expected to decline to 5.6 billion
in the current fiscal year.
    But the push to include non-communist countries in
countertrade is also due to other factors, including the slow
growth of foreign reserves, a tight debt repayment schedule,
shrinking aid and trade protectionism, businessmen said.
    One source said India is showing more dynamism in promoting
countertrade deals than in the past, when the deals were made
discreetly because they break GATT rules. As a member of the
General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade (GATT), India cannot
officially support bartering.
    The MMTC's recent countertrade deals include iron ore
exports to Yugoslavia for steel structures and rails.
    "MMTC's recent global tenders now include a clause that
preference will be given to parties who accept payment in kind
for goods and services sold to India," a trade official said,
adding that the policy remains flexible.
    "We also take into account other factors such as prices at
which the goods and services are offered to India," the trade
official said.
    Early this year the commerce ministry quietly told foreign
companies interested in selling aircraft, ships, drilling rigs
and railway equipment to India that they stood a better chance
if they bought Indian goods or services in return, the trade
sources said.
    Illustrating the point, the official said a South Korean
firm recently agreed to sell a drilling platform worth 40 mln
dlrs to the state-run Oil and Natural Gas Commission.
    In return, the South Koreans gave a verbal assurance to buy
Indian goods worth 10 pct of the contract, against the 25 pct
sought by New Delhi, the trade official said.
    "We selected the Korean firm because its bid was the lowest,"
he added.
    Countertrade is helping African countries short of foreign
currency to import goods. India has signed a trade protocol to
buy up to 15,000 tonnes of asbestos fibre from Zimbabwe in
exchange for Indian goods, including jute bags and cars.
    But despite India's new drive, countertrade has some
inherent problems, they added.
    "It is not always easy to meet the basic requirement that
the trade should always be balanced," one trade source said. "The
other problem is it is often difficult to supply or buy
commodities which the other party wants."
    Another added, "Barter is also restrictive. We look upon it
as a temporary measure to get over the current balance of
payments difficulty.
    "This is why countertrade has not been made a law in India.
It does not even figure in the country's foreign trade policy."
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10395>
Greek Prime Minister Andreas Papandreou
said today that the Greek armed froces were ready to tackle any
aggressors following the sailing of a Turkish research vessel
and warships towards disputed waters in the Aegean Sea.
    Papandreou told an emergency cabinet meeting in Athens "the
military readiness of our country is able now to give a very
hard lesson if our neighbours (Turkey) were to carry out
military actions."
    He said the activities of the research vessel could be
aimed at partitioning the Aegean.
    "The air force, navy and army are in a state of alert,"
General Guven Ergenc, Secretary General of the Turkish General
Staff, told a news conference.
    He said the Turkish research ship Sismik 1, escorted by an
unspecified number of warships, would sail into disputed waters
in the Aegean Sea tomorrow morning.
    Ergenc told Reuters later that all leave had been cancelled
for members of the armed forces in the Aegean coast area.
    The Turkish government said yesterday it had licensed the
state-owned Turkish Petroleum Corp to explore for oil in
international waters around three Greek islands off Turkey.
     Greece and Turkey have long-standing disputes over areas
of the Aegean and the presence of Turkish troops in Cyprus.
    The latest row erupted when the Greek government said last
month that it was taking control of a Canadian-led consortium
which was already producing oil off the Greek island of Thassos
and would drill in the same area after the takeover.
    Ergenc told the news conference the alert followed a
government decision that Turkey should protect its interests
"because of measures Greece has been taking in the Aegean in
violation of international agreements."
    Asked how Turkey would react if Greece attacked any of the
vessels, he said "If there is an attack, it is clear what has to
be done. An attack on a warship is a cause for war." But he
added "We are not in a state of war. The measures taken by the
military are directed towards protecting our rights."
    Greece said yesterday it would defend its national rights
in the Aegean and urged Turkey to accept reference of the
dispute to the International Court of Justice in The Hague.
    Turkish Foreign Ministry spokesman Yalim Eralp told
reporters today this was unacceptable because of preconditions
Athens had attached.
    In Athens, Greek Prime Minister Papandreou said that if the
Turkish vessel Sismik 1 began research operations "we will
hinder it, of course not with words, as it cannot be stopped
with words."
    Greek newspapers said the armed forces were on alert and
navy ships had gone to the Aegean. But government spokesman
Yannis Roubatis did not confirm the move, saying only "The Greek
fleet is not at its naval base."
    Papandreou said that a map issued in Turkey showed 95 pct
of the areas proposed for research were on the Greek
continental shelf.
    Papandreou told the U.S. And NATO that if they had a part
in orchestrating the present crisis in order to force Greece to
negotiate with Turkey, the Greek government would not accept
it.
    Papandreou has maintained in the past that he will not
negotiate with Ankara until Turkey recognises Greek rights in
the Aegean and withdraws its troops from Cyprus.
    He said that in the case of war with Turkey it would not be
possible for Greece to discuss the future of American military
bases here. Asked by reporters if he would close the U.S. Bases
in Greece in the event of war, Papandreou replied "Obviously,
and perhaps even before the war."
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10406>
India is searching for non-communist
countertrade partners to help it cut its trade deficit and
conserve foreign exchange.
    Wheat, tobacco, tea, coffee, jute, engineering and
electronic goods, as well as minerals including iron ore, are
all on offer in return for crude oil, petroleum products,
chemicals, steel and machinery, trade sources told Reuters.
    Most of the impetus behind countertrade, which began in
1984, comes from two state trading firms -- the State Trading
Corp (STC) and the Minerals and Metals Trading Corp (MMTC).
    "The two state trading corporations are free to use their
buying power in respect to bulk commodities to promote Indian
exports," a commerce ministry spokeswoman said, adding that
private firms are excluded from countertrading.
    One trade source said India has targetted countries that
depend on an Indian domestic market recently opened to foreign
imports. But countertrade deals still make up only a small part
of India's total trading and are likely to account for less
than eight pct of the estimated 18.53 billion dlrs in trade
during the nine months ended December, the sources said.
    Countertrade accounted for just five pct of India's 25.65
billion dlrs in trade during fiscal 1985/86 ended March,
against almost nothing in 1984/85, official figures show.
    However, the figures exclude exchanges with the Eastern
Bloc paid in non-convertible Indian rupees, the sources said.
    Total trade with the Soviet Union, involving swaps of
agricultural produce and textiles for Soviet arms and crude
oil, is estimated at 3.04 billion dlrs in fiscal 1986/87.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10452>
NATO ambassadors met in emergency
session today to discuss tension between members Greece and
Turkey over a disputed area of the Aegean Sea on the Western
Alliance's southern flank, Greek diplomatic sources said.
    They said no information had yet emerged from the meeting,
called after statements from both countries that they were
prepared to back rival oil exploration teams with warships.
    General Guven Ergenc, Secretary General of the Turkish
General Staff, said today the Turkish research ship Sismik 1,
escorted by an unspecified number of warships, would sail into
disputed waters in the Aegean Sea tomorrow morning.
    Greek Prime Minister Andreas Papandreou said "The military
readiness of our country is able now to give a very hard lesson
if our neighbours (Turkey) were to carry out military actions."
    The row erupted when the Greek government said last month
that it was taking control of a Canadian-led consortium which
was already producing oil off the Greek island of Thassos and
would drill in the same area after the takeover.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10539>
Greece and Turkey's NATO allies today
called on both countries to avoid any action that could
aggravate an explosive situation in the Aegean and "avoid
recourse to force at all costs."
    After an emergency meeting of NATO ambassadors, a statement
was issued saying "the present situation damages the interests
of Greece and Turkey, and of the Alliance as a whole."
    Secretary-General Lord Carrington also offered himself as a
mediator in the dispute on the Western Alliance's southern
flank.
    The meeting was called after reports that warships of both
countries were sailing towards a disputed oil exploration zone
of the Aegean.
    The statement said the tensions in the area had reached a
serious level and called on both countries to begin immediate
discussions. "Any intensification would make things worse," it
added.
    No attempt was made at the meeting to resolve the complex
dispute which was aimed at damage-limitation. Carrington said,
"I am of course anxious to help in any way I can, provided that
both Greece and Turkey, and the other allies, wish me to do so."
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10567>
Consumer energy costs rose 1.9 pct
in February following a sharp rise last month, the Labor
Department said.
    The February increase in the overall energy costs,
including petroleum, coal and natural gas, followed a 0.2 pct
drop in December and a 3.0 pct rise in January, it said.
    Energy prices were 12.2 pct below year-ago levels.
    The department's Consumer Price Index showed that the cost
of gasoline rose in February by 4.2 pct, after a 6.6 pct rise
in January.
    Gasoline prices were nonetheless 18.0 pct below their
levels as of February 1986.
    Also, the category including fuel oil, coal and bottled gas
rose in February by 3.8 pct, putting it 14.9 pct under the
year-ago figure.
    The index also showed that natural gas and electricity were
unchanged last month, but down 3.5 pct from the February 1986
figure, the department said.
    The index has been updated  o reflect 1982-84 consumption
patterns; previously, the index was based on 1972-73 patterns.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10588>
The United States said it was doing
what it could to ease tension in the Aegean as Greek and
Turkish warships headed for a possible clash over oil drilling
rights on the sea's continental shelf.
    State Department spokesman Charles Redman told reporters,
"We have urged both sides to exercise restraint and avoid any
actions which might exacerbate the situation."
    "In the light of the most recent developments, we are
consulting with the parties and with other interested allies on
means to reduce tensions," he added.
    Redman declined to elaborate on what Washington was doing,
but he said an emergency meeting of NATO ambassadors in
Brussels on the subject was only one path it was pursuing.
    He also refused to say which side was to blame for the
renewed confrontation, saying Washington was still trying to
ascertain all the facts, as Prime minister Andreas Papanderou
said Greece was prepared to tackle any aggressor.
    "The crucial point here is that these are two friends and
allies. We don't want to see tension rise and we are doing what
we can to see if we can help here," Redman said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10620>
A Turkish research ship, escorted by
warships and air force planes, left for the Aegean to press
Ankara's case in an escalating row with Greece over oil rights,
the semi-official Anatolian News Agency said.
    The ship set off this morning from the Dardanelles port of
Canakkale with flags flying and watched by sightseers, the
agency said.
    Prime Minister Turgut Ozal said last night the ship would
not go into international waters unless Greece did the same.
    "We are waiting for the first move from them," he told
Turkish Radio in London.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10621>
Greek Prime Minister Andreas Papandreou
expressed "restricted optimism" about a crisis with Turkey over
disputed oil rights in the Aegean Sea.
    Papandreou was speaking to reporters after briefing
opposition political leaders on the latest developments in the
row as a Turkish research ship escorted by warships and combat
aircraft headed for the Aegean.
    He and other political leaders spoke of qualified optimism
following a statement by Turkish Premier Turgut Ozal last night
that the research vessel would not enter disputed waters as
previously annnounced unless Greek vessels did so.
    The Prime Minister declined to answer reporters' questions
about an announcement last night that Greece had asked the
United States to suspend operations at one of the American
military bases here due to the crisis.
    But Opposition leader Constantine Mitsotakis told reporters
he thought the suspension would be temporary until the crisis
is resolved. A U.S. Defence Department official in Washington
said the station was still functioning.
    Communist Party leader Harilaos Florakis said here "the
climate is calmer today."
    Greek newspapers reported that the Greek army, navy and air
force had been moved to strategic Greek islands in the Aegean
and to the land border with Turkey at the Evros River.
    But there was no official word on military movements apart
from a comment by the government spokesman that the Greek navy
was no longer in port.
    The United States, NATO and the United Nations all called
on Greece and Turkey to exercise restraint.
    Greek U.N. Representative Mihalis Dounas said in a letter
to the secretary-general that the dispute was of a legal nature
and could be settled in the International Court in the Hague.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10627>
Turkey"s standoff with Greece over Aegean
oil rights appeared at an end after the government said it had
been assured Athens would not start prospecting in disputed
waters.
    A Foreign Ministry statement last night hinted Turkey was
claiming victory. A Greek-based international consortium, North
Aegean Petroleum Co., Had given up plans to start searching for
oil in international waters east of Thasos island, it said.
    "In the same way it has been understood that Greece will
also not undertake oil activities outside its territorial
waters," the statement added.
    An Ankara Radio report monitored in London said Foreign
Minister Vahit Halefolu had called on Greece to engage in
dialogue over the dispute. It was impossible to resolve the
dispute by crises, he was quoted as saying.
    "We call on Greece to come and engage in a dialogue with us
- let us find a solution as two neighbours and allies should,"
he said.
    The radio said Halefoglu had briefed the leaders of a
number of the country"s political parties on the latest
developments.
    Turkey sent the survey ship Sismik 1 into the Aegean
yesterday, flanked by warships, to press its case but having
earlier said it would go into disputed waters, declared the
vessel would stay in Turkish areas.
    Prime Minister Turgut Ozal, in London on his way home after
heart surgery in the United States, is expected to receive an
ecstatic welcome from thousands of Turks when he returns today.
    He was in defiant mood last night, telling Turkish radio:
"We can never accept that Greece should confine us to the
Anatolian continent. If there are riches under the sea, they
are for mankind."
    Despite the end of the crisis, Turkish officials
acknowledged that the underlying dispute over delimiting the
continental shelf in the Aegean remained unsolved.
    Turkey alleged that the consortium"s plans would have
infringed the 1976 Berne agreement between the two countries,
which called for a moratorium on any activities until the
delimitation was agreed. Greece earlier this month declared it
considers the accord inoperative.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10632>
The Emirates Industrial Bank has
predicted a modest economic recovery in the Gulf Arab states
following higher oil revenues.
    A bank study, carried by the Emirates news agency WAM, said
total oil revenues of the six Gulf Cooperation Council (GCC)
countries were likely to reach 39 billion dlrs this year from
33.5 billion in 1986.
    The GCC groups Bahrain, Kuwait, Oman, Qatar, Saudi Arabia
and the United Arab Emirates (UAE).
    The bank said the improvement would result from higher oil
prices made possible by last December's OPEC accord to restrain
overall group production.
    These curbs have pushed up oil prices from around eight
dollars a barrel in mid-1986 to around 18 dlrs.
    "All signs point to the possibility of a modest recovery in
the economies of these (GCC) countries, although this expected
growth will not be similar to that of the (1970s) boom years,"
the study said.
    It added, however, that GCC states would experience higher
budget deficits this year because of needs arising from past
recession and the difficulty of making fresh spending cuts.
    The study said the combined GCC bugdet deficits would rise
to 23.2 billion dlrs from 17.9 billion last year.
    It said lower oil exports cut the GCC states' combined
trade surplus to 18 billion dlrs in 1986 from 21.5 billion in
1985.
    The UAE suffered a 19.5 pct drop in gross domestic product
to 77.6 billion dirhams last year from 96.4 billion in 1985, it
added.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10641>
Turkey pulled warships back from close
escort of its Sismik 1 survey ship as the threat of conflict
with Greece over oil rights in the Aegean Sea abated.
    The semi-official Anatolian Agency said naval vessels ended
their close protection of the ship as it continued work in
Turkish waters but were following it at a distance.
    Popular newspapers headlined what they saw as Turkish
resolve and international pressure forcing Greece to pull back
from planned exploration in disputed international waters.
    "Intense United States and NATO efforts bore fruit: Greece
will stay in its national waters," said the daily Gunes. The
top-selling Hurriyet topped its front page with: "Our resolute
stand made Greece see reason."
    But two newspapers, Cumhuriyet and Milliyet, noted in
identical headlines -- "Crisis Frozen" -- that the basic
disagreement over exploration rights remained unsolved.
    The confrontation eased after the Turkish government said
it had been assured Athens would not begin prospecting in
disputed waters.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10693>
Indonesia has minimised the economic
impact of falling oil prices, kept inflation within limits and
boosted exports, Finance Minister Radius Prawiro said.
    Indonesia was badly hit by last year's steep plunge in
crude prices, which cut revenue from oil exports by half.
    But Prawiro was quoted by Indonesian newspapers as telling
President Suharto that inflation was kept to around nine pct in
the financial year ending tomorrow, against around 4.3 pct the
previous year.
    Exports were estimated to have risen by seven pct, he said,
although he did not give complete figures.
    The depressed economy forms the main backdrop to general
elections next month in Indonesia, a major producer of rubber,
palm oil, tin, timber and coffee.
    Prawiro said 1986/87 had also been difficult because of the
appreciation of currencies like the yen and the mark against
the dollar, which increased Indonesia's debt repayments.
    He said the economy would have suffered more from the world
economic recession if the government had not devalued the
rupiah by 31 pct last September.
    In an editorial on the economic outlook, the Jakarta Post
said the government must press ahead with measures to
deregulate the economy to help boost non-oil exports.
    The English-language daily said bigger export earnings were
needed to finance not only imports but also the country's
growing foreign debt, estimated at around 37 billion dlrs.
    "About 50 pct of our foreign debt obligations fall due
within the next three to five years and will steadily increase
the debt servicing burden," the paper said.
    However, end-investors were seen bargain hunting in
expectation of a further yen interest rate decline, dealers
said.
    Most dealers were cautious in the face of the dollar's
nosedive today and the possibility of a U.S. Interest rate
rebound to halt further dollar depreciation.
    A 4.7 pct coupon and volume of 1,400 billion yen for the
April 10-year bond proposed by the Finance Ministry this
afternoon were taken favourably by the market.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10750>
The British Petroleum Co PLC (BP.L) oil
refinery at Grangemouth, closed after an explosion and fire
eight days ago, is expected to partially reopen next week, a
refinery spokesman said.
    He said the entire 178,500 bpd refinery has been shut since
the accident which killed one person and damaged the site's
hydrocracker. The main units will resume operation next week
but the hydrocracker will be closed for an unspecified period.
The spokesman said the refinery had been operating at about
half its capacity since end-January due to overhaul work on
part of the complex. The overhaul is expected to end by late
April.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10797>
Prime Minister Andreas Papandreou has
withdrawn a request to Washington to suspend operations at an
American army base near Athens as a Greek-Turkish row over oil
rights in the Aegean eased.
    A Turkish research ship which Greece had threatened to
tackle if it sailed into disputed waters in the Aegean Sea kept
to Turkish territorial waters yesterday, avoiding a potential
clash.
    Papandreou expressed qualified optimism after briefing
opposition leaders on Aegean developments early yesterday.
    The Greek government later withdrew Friday's request to
Washington to close down its telecommunications base at Nea
Makri, north of Athens, saying that the reasons which had
prompted it to make the request were no longer valid.
    Under the terms of the U.S.-Greek bases accord, Greece has
the right to ask for suspension of operations at times when its
national interests are threatened.
    The row in the Aegean erupted after Turkey said it would
search for oil round three Greek islands off its coast
following an announcement from Greece that it planned to drill
east of Thassos island after taking control of a Canadian-led
oil consortium operating in the northern Aegean.
    Turkey accused Greece of breaching the 1976 Berne Agreement
under which both sides agreed to preserve the status quo in the
Aegean until their continental shelf dispute was settled.
Athens says it considers the accord inactive.
    The Turkish Foreign Ministry said in a statement it had
received an assurance from Greece that it would not carry out
oil activities outside its territorial waters. Greece declined
comment on the statement.
    Papandreou repeated an invitation to Turkey to take the
long-standing continental shelf dispute to the International
Court of Justice at The Hague.
    Conservative opposition leader Constantine Mitsotakis said
he had urged Papandreou to accept an offer from NATO General
Secretary Lord Carrington to help resolve the row.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10845>
The average price of mexico's crude
oil exports in first quarter 1987 will be 15.25 dlrs per
barrel, according to preliminary figures issued in a press
release by the state oil company Petroleos Mexicanos (PEMEX).
    It gave no direct comparison with the year-ago figure but
said crude and products sales were expected to rise to 1.99
billion dlrs this quarter, 420 mln dlrs higher than expected
and 22 pct better than the year-ago quarter.
    Prospects for the second quarter were relatively favourable
with crude exports seen at 1.320 mln bpd after an expected
1.324 mln this month, 1.323 in February and 1.395 mln in
January.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10873>
The average price of mexico's crude
oil exports in first quarter 1987 will be 15.25 dlrs per
barrel, according to preliminary figures issued in a press
release by the state oil company Petroleos Mexicanos (PEMEX).
    It gave no direct comparison with the year-ago figure but
said crude and products sales were expected to rise to 1.99
billion dlrs this quarter, 420 mln dlrs higher than expected
and 22 pct better than the year-ago quarter.
    Prospects for the second quarter were relatively favourable
with crude exports seen at 1.320 mln bpd after an expected
1.324 mln this month, 1.323 in February and 1.395 mln in
January.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10947>
Crude oil netback values in complex
refineries rose slightly in the U.S. and the Mediterranean 
last Friday from the previous week but were lower elsewhere,
according to calculations by Reuters Pipeline.
    The soft tone to refining margins reflects large worldwide
stocks of petroleum products and thin trading activity, traders
said.
    In the U.S. Gulf, sweet crudes rose in value by as much as
26 cts a barrel for West Texas Intermediate, an increase of 1.4
pct from the previous Friday, while sour crudes, such as
Alaska North Slope, were up one pct.
    In the Mediterranean, netback values were up 17 cts to 22
cts a barrel, with Arab Light up 17 cts a barrel to 18.62 dlrs,
a 0.9 pct increase from the previous Friday and Urals were up
22 cts a barrel to 19.16 dlrs, a 1.2 pct increase.
    But netbacks for crude oil refined in Northern Europe was
generally lower with Brent valued at 18.89 dlrs, off 30 cts
from the previous friday, and Bonny Light was off 17 cts to
19.58 dlrs a barrel.
    Refinery netbacks in Singapore were also lower, with
heavier and sour crudes weakest. Arab Heavy dropped 10 cts to
16.63 dlrs a barrel and Dubai was off 12 cts to 18.09 dlrs.
    On the U.S. West Coast, however, netback values for ANS CIF
L.A. were weaker with weak gasoline prices sending the yield at
cracking plants down 68 cts to 18.42 dlrs from the previous
Friday, as shown below in dlrs a barrel.
TOPPING.........15.63......16.10......14.30
CRACKING........18.42......19.10......16.86
    The Mediterranean region also showed netback values rising
last Friday over the previous week with the largest gains shown
by Es Sider and the heavier Urals crude oil, which were each up
22 cts a barrel last Friday to 19.40 dlrs and 19.16 dlrs a
barrel, respectively.
    Netback values for the mediterranean region are shown below
in dlrs a barrel.
GRADE...........MAR 27.....MAR 20.....FEB 27
ES SIDER........19.40......19.18......16.44
ARAB LIGHT......18.61......18.44......15.52
IRAN LT.........19.25......19.08......16.16
KUWAIT..........18.51......18.33......15.42
URALS cif.......19.16......18.94......16.07
    Netbacks in Northern Europe's refinery region were lower
last friday from the previous week with Brent falling 1.6 pct
to 18.89 dlrs a barrel.
     Netbacks for other grades of oil refined in Northern
Europe are shown below in dlrs a barrel.
................MAR 27.....MAR 20.....FEB 27
BRENT...........18.89......19.19......16.77
BONNY LIGHT.....19.58......19.75......17.15
ARAB LIGHT......18.49......18.52......16.07
URALS CIF.......19.02......18.98......16.54
    Refinery netbacks in Singapore were also lower with heavier
and sour crudes weakest.
    Arab Heavy dropped 10 cts to 16.63 dlrs a barrel and Dubai
was off 12 cts to 18.09 dlrs.
     Netbacks for other grades of oil refined in Singapore  are
shown below in dlrs a barrel.
GRADE...........MAR 27.....MAR 20.....FEB 27
ATTAKA..........19.23......19.24......16.72
ARAB LIGHT......18.00......18.10......15.55
OMAN............18.21......18.25......16.31
DUBAI...........18.09......18.21......15.86
ARAB HEAVY......16.63......16.73......14.24
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11007>
U.S. refiners will have to
reduce operations if they want to be profitable this year, said
industry officials attending the National Petroleum Refiners
Association meeting here.
     "If the refining sector can discipline itself to refine
about 12 mln barrels of crude oil a day, we have a chance to
pull down inventories to acceptable levels by the second
quarter, said Archie Dunham, executive vice president of
petroluem products at Conoco Inc
    "If not, the industry will have a tough 1987," he added.
     Last week's American Petroleum Institute report said that
U.S. refining capacity rose three pct to 78.7 pct of capacity,
with crude oil runs at 12.2 mln barrels per day for the week
ended March 20.
     The API said that with the higher crude oil runs, 
distillate and gasoline inventories were sharply above year-ago
levels. Gasoline stocks were at 245.6 mln barrels, some 17.2
mln barrels above year-ago levels. Distillate stocks, at 108.7
mln barrels, are 10.9 mln barrels above last year's level, the
API said.
     Henry Rosenberg, chairman of Crown Central Petroleum Corp
&lt;CNP> told Reuters that unless refining and marketing return to
profitability, oil companies will have to rely on downstream
operations to produce an acceptable level of earnings.
     "The jump in refining capacity is a concern if it
continues," said Kenneth Buckler, executive vice president of
refining and marketing at &lt;Total Petroleum Co>, a U.S.
subsidiary of Cie Francaise Des Petroles of France.
     Refineries should operate near 75 pct of capacity given
the current level of demand but the operating level should
increase as gasoline demand picks up in the next quarter,
Buckler said.
     Dunham said the potential operable capacity of U.S.
refineries should also be cut about 500,000 barrels of crude
per day. "I expect to see the shutdown of more small refineries
over the next five years," he said, adding that these
facilities refine between 10,000 and 30,000 barrels of crude
oil per day. The API said U.S. operations have the capacity to
refine 15.6 mln bpd of crude.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11025>
Venezuela's state oil
company Petroleos de Venezuela S.A. wants to raise its
worldwide refining capacity by 150,000 barrels of per day, a
company official attending the National Petroleum Refiners
Association meeting here said.
    He declined to be identified but said PdVSA has the
capacity to refine about 650,000 bpd of crude oil from refining
centers
in Venezuela, Sweden, West Germany, Belgium, and the United
States. The company recently purchased a 50 pct stake in the
Corpus Christi, Texas refinery of Champlin Petroleum Co, a
subsidiary of Union Pacific Corp &lt;UNP>.
    Earlier it bought a similar stake in the Lake Charles, La
refinery owned by Citgo Petroleum Corp, a unit of Southland
Corp &lt;SLC>.
     According to the official, Venezuela is searching
worldwide for the additional refining capacity but he did not
mention where the company was looking. 
    Refineries abroad, he said, guarantee a refining outlet for
Venezuelan crude oil while ensuring stability of supply to
refiners.
    He said Venezuela currently  produces about 1.4 mln bpd of
crude oil, which is in line with its 1.495 bpd OPEC ceiling.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11100>
Shell Canada Ltd, 72 pct owned
by Royal Dutch/Shell Group &lt;RD> &lt;ST>, scheduled its annual
maintenance refinery shutdowns during the next two months,
company spokeswoman Judy Wish said.
    Wish said refineries will stockpile production before the
shutdowns to maintain normal supply while maintenance is
carried out.
    Production at Shell's major refinery at Strathcona Alberta,
will be closed for about one month, Wish said.
    There will be no layoffs associated with the refinery
maintenance, she added.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11118>
Development of costly shale oil,
liquified coal and other kinds of synthetic fuels, halted in
recent years because of cheap and abundant petroleum supplies,
will become economic again when world oil prices top 30 dlrs a
barrel, an Exxon Co USA executive said.
    Joe McMillan, a senior vice president, told Reuters after
addressing a Houston meeting of the American Institute of
Chemical Engineers, "By early in the next century, synthetics
should play a significant role in this country's energy
supply."
    McMillan also told reporters at a news conference that he
believed synthetic fuels would become economic to develop when
world oil prices reached a 30 to 40 dlr a barrel price range.
    "You're talking about a 50 pct increase in crude oil
prices, but I think that time is coming and we've got to be
prepared," McMillan said.
    He predicted U.S. oil demand would rise by about one pct
annually in the next few years while the nation fails to
replace its oil reserves through exploration. By the turn of
the century, world oil prices will be significantly higher
because of declining supplies, McMillan said.
    Ashland Oil, Inc. chairman John Hall, who also spoke at the
meeting, advocated some form of federal tax incentives to help
spur development of synthetic fuels.
    The United States, Hall said, has nearly 500 billion tons
of demonstrated coal reserves, an amount more than triple that
of all the world's known oil reserves.
    "We must encourage research now in order to make synfuels
competitive later," Hall said. The average lead time for
development of a shale oil or liquified coal project is between
five and ten years.
    Until last year, the federal government had subsidized
synfuels development through the U.S. Synthetic Fuels Corp., a
research program created during the Carter Administration with
the goal of developing replacements for up to two mln barrels
of oil.
    The corporation was shut down last April when Congress
refused to continue funding its eight billion dlr budget
because of uneconomic projects based on forecasts of 50 dlrs a
barrel oil and 10 dlr per mcf natural gas during this decade.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11149>
The U.S. should reassess
its Mideast policy in light of its rising dependence on
imported oil, according to Charles Ebinger of the Center for
Strategic and International Studies.
     "The prospect of rising dependence on oil imports from the
Gulf, and the recent revelations of the Tower Commission
report, mandate more than ever before the need for a
fundamental reassessment of U.S. interests in the Middle East,"
Ebinger said.
     He remarks were made in an address to the National
Petroleum Refiners Association meeting.
     "Although in the short run it is difficult to see a direct
link between Arab anger and threats to oil supplies, in the
current environment it will be increasingly difficult for
moderate Arab leaders to be seen as friendly to U.S.
interests," Ebinger said.
     Oil traders said threats to oil supplies has kept crude
oil prices strong recently although some believe prices will be
weaker if demand falls in the spring.
    But William Randol, analyst at First Boston Corp, said
crude oil prices will hold  near current levels this spring.
    There will be no spring downturn, said Randol, speaking at
the annual refiner meeting. He said there is a 40 pct chance
that crude oil prices could move higher in the second half of
the year, following an OPEC meeting scheduled for late June.
    He said he expects OPEC will extend its current agreement
to restrict production.
    OPEC will renew its production pricing agreement in June
because the value of the oil exports of the OPEC producers  has
declined along with the U.S. dollar, Randol said.
    OPEC oil exports are priced in U.S. dollars, and the dollar
has fallen about 30 pct in the last 18 months.
    Randol said U.S. crude oil imports will increase 3.5 to
four mln barrels per day by 1990 as consumption rises 1.5 to
two mln bpd, and supplies decline two mln bpd.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11213>
CSR Ltd &lt;CSRA.S> has made a bold move in
selling its oil and gas interests for almost a billion dlrs and
ploughing 150 mln into its traditional sugar business, share
analysts said.
    "It sounds like a good deal," Stuart McKibbin of &lt;A.C. Goode
and Co> told Reuters.
    CSR said it had dropped plans to float its oil and gas
interests held in the &lt;Delhi Australia Fund> and would instead
sell it to Exxon Corp &lt;XON> unit &lt;Esso Exploration and
Production Australia Inc> for 985 mln dlrs.
    In a twin announcement CSR, already Australia's largest
sugar refiner, made a 2.20 dlr a share bid for the 70 pct it
does not already hold in &lt;Pioneer Sugar Mills Ltd>.
    "This will be a big shock to the market, which was under the
impression that CSR was well down the road to floating Delhi,"
McKibbin said.
    A float of part of Delhi would have raised between 200 and
300 mln dlrs, but in opting to sell outright, CSR had given
itself the cash to practically eliminate its debt and embark on
an ambitious expansion programme in its best-performing
divisions of sugar and building products, analysts said.
    CSR not only gets the 985 mln dlrs but also has the right
to share equally with Esso any higher returns resulting from an
oil price over 20 U.S. Dlrs a barrel in the next two years.
    Delhi is one of Australia's largest onshore oil producers
yielding about six mln barrels a year from the Cooper Basin.
Analysts said the deal could net CSR as much as three mln dlrs
for every dollar rise in the oil price above 20 dlrs.
    Neale Goldston-Morris of Sydney broker &lt;Bain and Co Ltd>
said the move out of Delhi and investment in the sugar industry
was a sensible one but added that it represented the loss of
Australian-owned assets to a foreign company.
    "The farm they bought back a few years ago is being sold
back to the Americans," Goldston-Morris said.
    The Pioneer Sugar investment would make CSR by far the
largest player in Australia's 850 mln dlr a year sugar industry
and would give it access to some of the best sugar properties
and mills in the country, analysts said.
    They said Pioneer Sugar was expected to recommend
acceptance of the bid through which CSR would benefit from the
bottom out of a cyclical downturn in sugar prices.
    Sugar prices are forecast to rise to 340 dlrs a tonne next
season from an estimated 270 dlrs this year, they said.
    Selling Delhi meant CSR has finally quit a damaging
investment, made in 1981, which has dragged down the company's
overall performance, analysts said.
    CSR last year wrote off more than 550 mln dlrs in losses on
what had been a 591 mln U.S. Dlr investment financed entirely
from U.S. Dollar debt, they said.
    "It was a bad investment for them. They financed it entirely
with debt, the currency collapsed on them and then the oil
price collapsed on them," Owen Evans of Sydney broker &lt;Meares
and Philips Ltd> said.
    Esso not only picked up Delhi's oil and gas output but also
gained as much as 300 mln dlrs in transferable tax losses
accumulated in exploration allowances and other concessions.
    Analysts said Esso also gained its first real onshore stake
in Australia in its first major diversification from the 50/50
Bass Strait partnership with The Broken Hill Pty Co Ltd
&lt;BRKN.S>.
    "Esso has been very keen to diversify from the Gippsland
Basin. They haven't found too much oil in Bass Strait lately
and Esso needed a large pool of ongoing production,"
Goldston-Morris said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11231>
CSR Ltd has made a bold move in selling
its oil and gas interests for almost a billion dlrs and
ploughing 150 mln into its traditional sugar business, share
analysts said.
    CSR said it had dropped plans to float its oil and gas
interests held in the Delhi Australia Fund and would instead
sell them to Exxon Corp unit Esso Exploration and Production
Australia Inc for 985 mln dlrs.
    In a twin announcement CSR, already Australia's largest
sugar refiner, made a 2.20 dlr a share bid for the 70 pct it
does not already hold in Pioneer Sugar Mills Ltd.
    A float of part of Delhi would have raised between 200 and
300 mln dlrs, but in opting to sell outright CSR had given
itself the cash to all but eliminate its debt and embark on an
ambitious expansion programme in its best-performing divisions
of sugar and building products, analysts said.
    The Pioneer Sugar investment would give CSR by far the
largest stake in Australia's 850 mln dlr a year sugar industry
and access to some of the best sugar properties and mills in
the country, they said. Pioneer Sugar was expected to recommend
acceptance of the bid, through which CSR would benefit from the
bottoming out of a cyclical downturn in sugar prices.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11350>
Exxon Corp said in its annual report
that it raised production in 1986 although it did not replace
all oil and gas produced.
    The company said that it added about four pct to production
bringing it to 1.8 mln bpd, the highest level since 1979, based
largely on increased production of oil overseas but additions
to its reserves from new discoveries and reserve acquisitions
did not replace all of the oil and gas produced.
    The company said that the average price for oil and gas
declined 41 pct in 1986 from the previous year sparking a 38
pct decline in its earnings from exploration and production.
    Exxon's earnings from exploration and production in 1986
fell to 3.1 billion dlrs from 4.9 billion dlrs in 1985.
    Exxon said that its principal gains in production came from
the Gulf of Mexico, Alaska, the North Sea, Malaysia and from
oil sands in Canada.
    Exxon also said that it acquired 11.2 mln acres for
expoloration spread over 10 countries including the U.S, Europe
and the Far East.
    But capital expenditures for exploration and production
were cut to 4.6 billion dlrs from 7.6 billion the previous year
and further reductions were expected in 1987.
    Exxon said that its net share of crude oil and natural gas
liquids produced from offshore fields in the North Sea reached
a new high of 422,000 bpd.
    The light, sweet crudes produced from these North Sea
fields also gave the company trading gains as Exxon was able to
sell much of this crude and replace it with cheaper, lower
quality crude oil for its refineries which have been upgraded
over the past several years.
    The trading gains and lower acquisition costs gave Exxon
more of a spread in its refinery operations and added to
earnings gains from refining and marketing.
    Exxon said earnings from refining and marketing operations
rose to nearly two billion dlrs in 1986, up from 872 mln dlrs
in 1985.
    The company said petroleum sales slipped slightly to 4.043
mln barrels per day from 4.082 mln bpd in 1985 while crude runs
rose to 3.0 mln bpd from 2.9 mln bpd the previous year.
    Exxon's refinery operations benefited from a three year 500
mln dlr upgrading program to its Baytown, Texas refinery
completed last October and an 850 mln dlr upgrading project in
Rotterdam both of which emphasize utilizing lower grade crudes
to extract higher proportions of light products.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11388>
Exxon Corp said that 1986's 15 pct
increase in earnings per share to 7.42 dlrs a share were
partially based on its streamlined operations which compensated
for the weakness in its exploration earnings and the lowest
crude oil prices in a decade.
    Exxon said economies introduced in its operations from
reductions in personnel and other savings, such as reductions
in exploration expenses, were reflected in an 880 mln dlr
reduction in consolidated operating costs from 1985.
    The company said its more efficient operations would be
necessary to offset more adverse oil market conditions ahead.
    The company also said that its share repurchase plan
contributed to the per share gains over 1985.
    In a breakdown of costs, Exxon said that operating expenses
slipped to 9.2 billion dlrs in 1986 from 9.7 billion dlrs the
previous year and exploration expenses, including dry holes,
slipped back to 1.2 billion dlrs from 1.5 billion dlrs over the
same period as the number of wells drilled was lower.
    The company was also able to use lower interest rates to
reduce its interest expenses to 614 mln dlrs in 1986 from 627
mln dlrs the previous year.
    Exxon said that the ratio of debt to capital was cut by 1.6
pct in 1986 from the previous year to 19 pct.
    On December 31, 1986 Exxon's total debt of 7.87 billion
dlrs was down slightly from the previous year's 7.9 billion
dlrs and long term debt stood at 4.3 billion dlrs, down from
4.8 billion dlrs in 1985.
    Exxon's policy of repurchasing shares on the market for its
treasury also contributed to earnings results by a reduction of
shares to 722.6 mln shares from 754.1 mln shares the previous
year.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11403>
Chevron Corp said its Chevron
U.S.A. Inc unit and Tokyo-based Nippon Oil Co Ltd agreed to
conduct a joint-venture oil exploration and development program
on selected Chevron leaseholds in the United States.
    About 50 onshore and offshore exploratory wells will be
drilled under the agreement and Chevron will be the operator of
the project and pay some costs, the company said.
    It said Nippon will contribute an initial investment of
more than 100 mln dlrs.
    The Japanese government will also participate in the
venture by providing financing to Nippon through the Japanese
Oil Corp, Chevron said.
    It said drilling will begin during the second quarter.
    Properties to be evaluated are located in California,
Colorado, Kansas, Oklahoma, Mississippi, Montana, North Dakota,
Texas, Utah, and Wyoming, along with Federal Outer Continental
Shelf leases offshore Southern California and in the Gulf of
Mexico, Chevron said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11444>
Treasury Secretary James Baker told
the House Appropriations Committee that he believes the
president remains opposed to an oil import fee.
    He said Reagan last year rejected the idea and he added:
    "In my personal view he is not likely to change his thinking
on that."
    He said Reagan last year opposed the idea because the
energy industry was divided on the issue, a tax would require a
new bureacracy to administer and the resulting higher energy
prices would harm U.S. competitiveness.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11455>
Treasury Secretary James Baker and
Office of Management and Budget chief James Miller defended an
administration plan to sell the U.S. Naval Petroleum Reserves.
    In response to hostile questioning from a member of the
House Appropriations Committee, the officials said the plan was
justified to help bring the fiscal 1988 budget deficit and to
get the government out of the oil business.
    Miller acknowleged the estimated sale proceeds at 3.3
billion dlrs would actually bring down the deficit by about 2.2
billion dlrs because of the loss of revenues from the sale of
oil from the reserves.
    Miller said the sale price may end up higher.
    "We'd sell it to the highest bidder," Miller said.
    "If we can get more we'll take it."
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11491>
Tonight's American Petroleum Institute
weekly inventory report is expected to show moderate drawdowns
in distillates and gasoline stocks for the week ended March 27,
analysts and traders said.
    They said they expect gasoline stocks to fall three mln
barrels or less and heating oil inventories to drop between 1.3
and four mln barrels.
    Some analysts see crude stocks falling by as much as six
mln barrels, while others think they could go up as much as 3.5
mln barrels. Crude oil runs are expected to be unchanged from
the previous week or slightly higher or lower.
    For the week ended March 20, the API said gasoline stocks
fell 2.7 mln barrels. Mosts analysts expect a modest draw for
the week ended March 27. They said stocks could fall between
700,000 and three mln barrels. Some said there is also a chance
gasoline stocks will be unchanged.
    API said distillate stocks dropped four mln barrels for the
week ended March 20. Analysts and traders generally predict a
similar or smaller depletion for last week. They said stock
levels could drop 1.3 to four mln barrels.
    The analysts attribute product stockdraws to seasonal
factors but they said crude direction is harder to call.
    Crude inventories rose 8.5 mln barrels in the week ended
March 20, API said. Analysts are looking for build of between
3.5 mln barrels to a six mln barrel draw for the week ended
March 27.
    API reported the amount of refinery capacity utilized up
three pct for the week ended March 20. Analysts said
utilization could have remained unchanged, or rose or fell by
less than one pct for the week ended March 27.
    Moderate product stockdraws would strengthen the market
slightly, analysts said. But bullish expectations are already
partially reflected in today's gains, they added.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11559>
Union Pacific Corp said it has closed
the previously announced 50-50 partnership with Petroleos de
Venezuela SA, Venezuela's national oil company, to own a
160,000 barrel per day refinery in Corpus Christi, Texas.
    Union Pacific said the partnership, called Champlin
Refining Co, will acquire the refining and distribution system
owned and operated by Union Pacific's Champlin Petroleum Co
subsidiary. The Venezuelan company also signed a 25-year
feedstock agreement with the partnership to supply at least
140,000 barrels a day of Venezuelan crude oil and naphtha at
market related prices.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11632>
Devon Resource Investors said as
of January one, its estimated proven reserves increased
by 443,000 net equivalent barrels to 32.4 billion cubic feet of
natural gas and 660,000 barrels of oil, compared with 29.5 bcf
of gas and 700,500 barrels of oil as of Jan one, 1986.
    Devon said that its estimated future net revenues
attributable to reserves is about 58 mln dlrs with a present
value, discounted at 10 pct, of 38 mln dlrs.
    It also said that it expects to have sufficient cash flow
to cover its annual payout of 60 ct per unit and expand its
drilling budget in 1987.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11639>
Imperial Oil Ltd, 70 pct-owned by Exxon
Corp &lt;XON>, is negotiating with it major crude oil suppliers
concerning the effects of a trial deregulation of Alberta's
shut-in crude oil production, scheduled to be implemented on
June 1, a company spokesman said.
    "From our point of view, it's a question of entering into
negotiations or discussions to make appropriate changes to
contracts to reflect the changes that are going to take place
on June 1," spokesman John Cote told Reuters in reply to a
query.
    Commenting on published reports that Imperial had suspended
its oil supply contracts, Cote said: "It's not a question of
cancelling or suspending any of the agreements at this point."
    On June 1, Alberta's Energy Resources Conservation Board
will lift its crude oil marketing prorationing system,
regulating shut-in light and medium crude production, on a
trial basis to the end of 1987.
    Under the new system, producers and refiners will be
allowed to negotiate volumes of shut-in oil to be delivered
under purchase contracts.
    Shut-in crude is the surplus between the total amount of
oil being produced and the amount being purchased by refiners.
    "We have talked to a number of our major suppliers, and
we've discussed the upcoming change with them, but nothing has
been finalized," Imperial's manager of western crude supply Gary
Strong said.
    Under Alberta's trial system, Imperial wants to match a
reasonable supply of crude against the company's forecast
demand for its refineries, Strong said.
    "We have to know what they have and how that relates to what
we need in total," he said.
    Strong said figures on the amount of crude production
Imperial purchases from outside suppliers were not immediately
available.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11723>
Energy futures now set the
standard for oil pricing, said Arnold Safer, president of The
Energy Futures Group Inc, a consulting firm.
     "Petroleum futures trading at the New York Mercantile
Exchange literally set spot market prices in the U.S.," he
said, adding that some oil products sellers now offer contracts
based on a daily average of NYMEX prices.
     He also said that petroleum futures are a major market for
oil companies as well as for commodity traders. His remarks
were made at the National Petroleum Refiners Association.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12286>
Mobil Corp said it raised its west
coast crude postings, effective today.
    The Buena Vista light grade, at 26 degrees api gravity, was
raised 1.35 dlrs a barrel to 15.55 dlrs/bbl, while the
Huntington Beach light grade, at 16 degrees, was raised about
1.75 dlrs/bbl to 14.10 dlrs/bbl.
    The heavier Wilmington grade, at 17 degrees, was increased
1.20 dlrs to 14.30 dlrs/bbl. Kern River crude, at 13 degrees,
was increased 1.00 dlr to 13.00 dlrs/bbl.
     Mobil also said that effective today it changed its
gravity adjustment scale as follows: From 20 degrees to 34
degrees API, Mobil will adjust its price 0.015 of a ct per
one-tenth of an API degree. Below 20 degrees API, the company
will adjust its price 0.020 ct per one-tenth of a degree. Crude
grades from 34 degrees API to above 40 degrees are unaffected.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12503>
NP Energy Corp said the U.S.
Bankruptcy Court has indicated it will appoint a trustee to
oversee the company's Chapter 11 bankruptcy proceedings.
    It said it hopes the appointment will thwart "hostile"
actions being pursued by two unsecured creditors to whose
claims the company objects.
    NP further said the Nielsen 1-20 well in Duchesne County,
Utah, has tested 300 barrels of oil per day.  NP owns a 61 pct
working interest.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12533>
An estimated 1.2 mln metro users in
Madrid were stranded today as striking railway workers halted
the underground transport system, industry sources said. The
strikers joined coal miners, steel and oil refinery workers in
Spain's latest wave of stoppages over wage demands.
    Some 10,000 pitmen in the northern province of Leon entered
the second day of an indefinite stoppage to demand wage rises
and a five-day working week, the sources said.
    Oil refinery workers picketed the state-owned Empresa
Nacional de Petroleo SA (EMP) to prevent fuel lorries leaving
the company's largest plant in Puertollano, central Spain.
    Paramilitary police were guarding steel mills at Reinosa,
in northern Spain, from the daily protests against planned job
cuts. A local government official said the police force would
remain in place until tempers had cooled down.
    More than 60 people were injured in pitched battles between
police and steel foundry workers in Reinosa last month.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12775>
A Swedish Finance Ministry committee
forecast that British Petroleum Plc &lt;BP.L> may have to close
its refinery in Gothenburg because of an anticipated worsening
of the Swedish petroleum industry's competitiveness.
    It said in a report that the future of the Swedish refining
business was bleak due to the steady drop in domestic oil
consumption since the mid-1970s, a possible tightening of rules
on sulphur content and competition from Norway's Mongstad
facility of &lt;Den Norske Stats Olieselskab> (Statoil) &lt;STAT.OL>
when its expansion is completed in the 1990s.
    The committee said the BP refinery, which lacks a
de-sulphurisation plant, was likely to be closed or sold unless
costly investments were made to enhance the facility's capacity
to refine a broader range of products.
    But the committee noted that capacity utilisation had in
recent years been above that of the European refining industry
on average. The BP plant, in which Sweden's state-owned &lt;OK
Petroleum AB> has a 22 pct, started up in 1967 and has an
annual capacity of 4.7 mln tonnes.
    There was nobody at British Petroleum immediately available
for comment.
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12803>
Norwegian oil companies Norsk Hydro A/S
&lt;NHY.OL> and Saga Petroleum A/S &lt;SAGO.OL> said they have
applied for offshore exploration drilling licenses in Gabon on
Africa's west coast.
    Saga Petroleum said it has applied for a 35 pct share and
operatorship on one block, adding Finnish oil company Neste
&lt;NEOY.HE>(25 pct), Spain's Hispanoil (25 pct), and the World
Bank's International Finance Corporation (IFS) (15 pct) have
joined Saga to fill remaining shares in the application.
    Saga spokesman Roy Halvorsen told Reuters he expected
Gabonese officials would reply to the application by Easter.
    Halvorsen said this is the first time Saga has applied to
operate on OPEC-member Gabon's continental shelf, adding that
Italian oil company Agip is heading a group of applicants in a
separate bid for the same license.
    Norsk Hydro has also applied for an undisclosed share in a
single exploration license in which U.S. Oil company Tenneco
has already been assigned operatorship, company spokesman
Bjoern Tretvoll said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12940>
The British Petroleum Co Plc &lt;BP.L> said
it had no plans to close its refinery in Gothenburg, despite
forecasts by a Swedish finance ministry committee that it might
be planning such a move.
    The committee said the refinery's future looked bleak
because the Swedish petroleum industry's competitiveness was
expected to worsen unless it invested, and because of the
effects of a possible tightening of rules on sulphur content.
    But BP said the unit, in which Sweden's &lt;OK Petroleum AB>
has a 22 pct stake, had performed well both technically and
financially up to and including the first quarter of 1987.
    Current restrictions on sulphur emissions and known future
plans for both Sweden and export markets did not cause it any
serious problems, it said in a statement.
    The refinery started up in 1967 and has an annual capacity
of 4.7 mln tonnes.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13056>
Iraq said its forces sank three Iranian
boats which tried to approach its disused deep water oil
terminal in the northern Gulf today.
    A military spokesman, quoted by the official Iraqi news
agency, said other Iranian boats fled. He did not identify the
vessels.
    Iraq's major oil outlets in the northern Gulf were closed
shortly after the war with Iran started in late 1980.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13074>
Iraq said its forces sank three Iranian
boats that tried to approach its disused deep water oil
terminal in the northern Gulf today.
    A military spokesman, quoted by the official Iraqi news
agency, said other Iranian boats fled. He did not identify the
vessels.
    Iraq's major oil outlets in the northern Gulf were closed
shortly after the war with Iran started in late 1980.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13096>
Brazil will import 30,000 barrels
per day of crude oil from Kuwait, a spokesman for the state oil
company Petrobras said.
    He said that, unlike Saudi Arabia, Kuwait did not impose
any conditions on Brazil.
    Last month, Petrobras cancelled a 40-mln dlr oil purchase
from Saudi Arabia after the Saudis refused to accept credit
guarantees from the official Bank of Brazil.
    The Saudis eventually lifted the condition and Brazil
decided to reconfirm the purchase.
    Brazil currently consumes 1.1 mln barrels of oil per day.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13102>
Texas Petroleum Corp said it issued 14.4
mln shares of restricted common stock in exchange for oil and
gas properties and joint ventures located in the U.S. and
overseas.
    The properties were acquired from &lt;North American Oil and
Gas Corp> and Texas Petroleum Corp in Canada, the company said.
It added the acquisitions were the first step toward creating
an oil and gas exploration and development enterprise.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13115>
Firmer crude oil prices, government aid
packages and corporate spending cuts will help Canada's oil
industry recover from last year sharp downturn, industry
analysts said.
    They said there will be significant earnings gains in 1987
compared to last year's dismal results when oil prices dropped
about 50 pct.
    On Canada's stock exchanges, energy shares have soared to
their highest levels since 1983, with many issues trading at
record highs.
    "This is reflecting a tremendous amount of optimism on the
part of the investment community that the outlook for the
industry for the future is extremely attractive," Peters and Co
Ltd oil analyst Wilf Gobert said.
    Financial statements from Canada's major oil companies,
culminating with Dome Petroleum Ltd's 2.20 billion Canadian dlr
1986 loss reported this week, painted a bleak picture of last
year's results, analysts said.
    "But the financial statements are a snap shot and a
recording of history. The stock market is the indication of the
future," Gobert commented.
    The Toronto Stock Exchange's oil and gas index of 41
companies is up to 4065.4 so far in trading today from 3053.15
at the end of 1986.
    Among Canada's largest oil companies, class A shares of
Imperial Oil Ltd &lt;IMO.A>, 70 pct owned by Exxon Corp &lt;XON>, is
trading at 71, up from a 52-week low of 34-3/4.
    Shell Canada Ltd, 72 pct owned by Royal Dutch/Shell Group,
is at 40-1/2, up from a low during the last year of 18-3/4.
Texaco Canada Inc &lt;TXC>, 78 pct owned by Texaco Inc &lt;TX>, is
at 34-7/8, up from a low of 24-1/2.
    Levesque Beaubien Inc oil analyst Robert Plexman forecasts
operating profit for 10 of Canada's largest oil and gas
companies will rise 37 pct in 1987 to about 1.44 billion dlrs
and operating cash flow will increase 12 pct to 3.24 billion
dlrs, based on an average oil price for the year of 16.50 U.S.
dlrs a barrel. "However, if prices hold about 18 U.S. dlrs a
barrel...1987 net operating income could show a 69 pct increase
with cash flow 27 pct higher," analyst Plexman said.
    "Although it is difficult to forecast the extent of the
profit improvement this year, the gain should be significant,"
he added.
    Those improvements follow a sharp downturn in 1986, when
operating income for the ten companies dropped 47 pct to 1.05
billion dlrs and operating cash flow fell 22 pct to 2.90
billion dlrs.
    But one industry source doesn't think oil prices will hold
recent gains and more government assistance is needed.
    Canadian Petroleum Association technical director Hans
Maciej sees industry cash flow falling another 10 pct in 1987,
after dipping about 60 pct last year. Maciej said he sees crude
oil supply outweighing demand and doesn't believe a recent OPEC
production accord will continue to support prices.
    However, several companies share the optimistic industry
outlook expressed by a majority of analysts.
    Shell Canada and &lt;Norcen Energy Resources Ltd> forecast
improved 1987 earnings in their annual reports issued this
week, assuming oil prices remain at or above 1986 levels.
    "The industry's outlook for 1987 is positive, but not
robust," Texaco Canada said in its annual report.
    "While oil prices have strengthened somewhat and there is
good reason to believe that the general level is sustainable,
continued volatility is likely," Texaco Canada added.
    In the face of short-term uncertainty, many companies have
pared 1987 spending plans from last year's lower levels,
deferring most frontier exploration work.
    "The industry is becoming very selective in investments,
very conservative and cautious, which is not unexpected,"
Canadian Petroleum Association's Maciej said.
    Federal and Alberta goverment aid measures helped cushion
the industry downturn in 1986 and are improving 1987 results.
    The most significant help came last September when the
federal government lifted the 10 pct Petroleum Gas Revenue Tax
(PGRT) 28 months earlier then planned.
    Analysts estimate the tax relief will save larger oil
companies about 1.50 billion dlrs by the end of 1988.
    The PGRT cut helped brake the steep profit and cash flow
decline in 1986 for many oil companies and prevented further
exploration spending cuts, analysts said.
    "For a number of companies, the PGRT cut was absolutely
necessary to even maintain the kind of reduced investments that
were made, otherwise the reduction would have been considerably
more," Maciej said.
 Reuter


</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13142>
Brazil's state oil company
Petrobras is pledging to export 4.6 mln cubic meters of fuel,
or 28.9 mln barrels in 1987, a company spokesman said.
    He said that represents a total sale worth 600 mln dlrs.
The volume is 27 pct higher over 1986 sales, which totalled 3.6
mln cubic meters, or 22.6 mln barrels.
    The United States, Africa and Latin American are Brazil's
main fuel buyers, the spokesman said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13184>
State-run oil company Ecopetrol said
Colombia's main oil pipeline was bombed again and pumping of
170,000 barrels per day was suspended.
    A spokeswoman for the company said that the early morning
dynamite attack was the 31st in the last nine months on the
Cano Limon-Covenas pipeline, which links Colombia's biggest
oilfied at Cravo Norte to the Caribbean.
    She said about 2,000 barrels of crude were spilled and
could not indicate when pumping would resume. The attack was
near Magangue in northeastern Bolivar province.
    Ecopetrol is exploiting Cravo Norte in association with
Occidental Petroleum Corp &lt;OXY> and Shell Petroleum N.V., a
unit of the Royal Dutch/Shell Group &lt;RD> &lt;ST>.
    Ecopetrol said in a communique that bombings since last
July led to a loss of more than 110,000 barrels of crude, or
the equivalent of 10 mln dlrs.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13200>
The Brazilian state oil company
Petrobras has made a second oil discovery in the Amazon region,
President Jose Sarney said.
    He said the well had an initial flow of 150,000 cubic
meters of gas and 220 barrels of oil per day. It is situated 14
kilometres from the first well to be discovered in the region
last year, which is currently yielding 500,000 cubic meters of
gas and 900 barrels of oil daily.
    The wells, the biggest onshore well in the country, are on
the banks of the river Uruc in the Amazon basin 3,600
kilometres (2,250 miles) north of Brasilia.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13256>
Growth in oil consumption in the Western
industrialised countries is likely to slow to around one pct
this year compared with 2.3 pct in 1986, the International
Energy Agency (IEA) said.
    Oil use in the 24 countries of the OECD increased by around
one pct in first quarter 1987 to 35.9 mln bpd, the IEA said in
its Monthly Oil Market Report.
    Growth in OECD countries is expected to come primarily from
transport fuels, as in 1986. But if average consumer prices are
higher than 1986, the rate of growth for these fuels may be
below last year's 3.6 pct, it said.
    The IEA said that assuming crude oil and product prices
stay close to current levels, some destocking by end-users can
be expected. If that happens, natural gas will also regain some
of the market share it lost to heavy fuel in 1986, and there
may be slightly less growth in transport fuels.
    IEA estimates on April 1 put oil stocks in the OECD area at
428 mln tonnes, representing 98 days of forward consumption.
This is about the same level as at the begining of the year.
    The agency said this flat trend is explained by the
projected seasonal consumption decline in the second quarter of
the year which offset a reduction in stocks.
    It said initial estimates indicate that company stocks fell
by 1.2 mln bpd in OECD countries in the first quarter of the
year. This followed a small rise in January of 0.4 mln bpd but
a decline of 1.5 mln bpd in February and 2.5 mln bpd in March.
    It is possible that final data will show a larger draw,
particulary for March, it said. As crude production also fell,
there is likely to have also been a decline in non-reported
stocks, particularly at sea, the IEA said.
    Company stocks on land in the OECD rose to 326 mln tonnes
on April 1 against 316 mln on April 1 1986. Governments built
up strategic stocks to 102 mln tonnes against 97 mln in the
period.
    The year-on-year trend of government stock building is
continuing with year-on-year company stocks also rising, more
or less in line with consumption, after declining for five
years, the IEA noted.
    Oil stocks on land in the U.S. And Canada were put at 206.6
mln tonnes on April 1, down from the 214 mln tonnes on January
1 and equivalent to 94 and 98 days of consumption,
respectively.
    Oil stocks in Western Europe were 147.4 mln tonnes on April
1, down from the 154 mln on January 1 but still equivalent to
94 days of consumption.
    World oil supply fell in the first quarter by about two mln
bpd to 45.2 mln bpd from 47.2 mln bpd in last quarter 1986.
    This drop was mostly due to a decline in OPEC crude
production to around 15.5 mln bpd in February/March from 16.5
mln bpd in January and to the seasonal drop in exports from
centrally-planned Economies, the IEA said.
    Total OPEC crude oil supply was 15.8 mln bpd in the first
quarter, plus 1.4 mln bpd of NGLs, compared with 17.3 mln bpd
of crude in the last three months of 1986 and 17.9 mln average
for the whole of 1986. Supply from non-OPEC countries totalled
28 mln bpd, against 28.5 mln bpd in the fourth quarter 1986.
    A drop in Saudi Arabian output to a tentatively forecast
3.3 mln bpd in March from 3.6 mln bpd in February was the
largest factor behind the OPEC production decline, the IEA
said.
    Saudi Arabia"s Opec-assigned output quota is 4.133 mln bpd.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13266>
Growth in oil consumption in the Western
industrialized countries is likely to slow to around one pct
this year compared with 2.3 pct in 1986, the International
Energy Agency said.
    Oil use in the 24 member countries of the Organization for
Economic Cooperation and Development (OECD) increased by around
one pct in the first quarter of 1987 to 35.9 mln barrels a day,
the IEA said in its latest monthly report.
    Growth in OECD countries is expected to come primarily from
transport fuels, as was the case in 1986. But if average
consumer prices are higher than 1986, the rate of growth for
these fuels may be below last year's 3.6 pct.
    The IEA said assuming crude and product prices remain nar
current levels, some destocking by end-users can be expected.
    If that takes place, natural gas will also regain some of
the market share it lost to heavy fuel in 1986, it said.
    IEA estimates on April one put oil stocks held in the OECD
area at 428 mln tonnes, or 98 days of forward consumption. This
is about the same as at the begining of the year.
    The agency said this flat trend is explained by the
projected seasonal consumption decline in the second quarter of
the year which offset a reduction in stocks.
    Company stocks on land in the OECD rose to 326 mln tonnes
on April one this year compared with 316 mln tonnes in calender
1986 while governments also built up their strategic stocks to
102 mln tonnes against 97 mln in 1986.
    The year-on-year trend of government stock building is
continuing with company stocks rising, more or less in line
with consumption, after declining for five years, IEA said.
    Oil stocks on land in the United States and Canada were put
at 206.6 mln tonnes down from the 214 mln tonnes on January one
and equivalent to 94 and 98 days of consumption, respectively.
    Oil stocks in Western Europe were 147.4 mln tonnes, down
from the 154 mln tonnes on January one but still equivalent to
94 days of consumption.
    The IEA said that initial estimates indicate that company
stocks fell by 1.2 mln bpd in OECD countries in the first
quarter of the year. This followed a small rise in January of
400,000 bpd but a decline of 1.5 bpd in February and 2.5 bpd in
March.
    And it is possible that final data will show a larger draw,
particulary for March, it said.
    As crude production also fell, there is likely to have also
been a decline in non-reported stocks, particularly at sea, the
IEA said.
    World oil supply fell through the first quarter by about
two bpd to 45.2 bpd from 47.5 bpd in the last quarter of 1986.
    This drop was mostly due to a decline in OPEC crude
production to around 15.5 bpd in February/March from 16.5 bpd
in January and to the seasonal drop in exports from Centrally
Planned Economies, the IEA said.
    Total OPEC oil supply totalled 17.2 bpd in the first
quarter of 1987 compare with 19.3 bpd in the last three months
of 1986 while supply from non-OPEC countries totalled 28 bpd as
against 28.2 bpd in the same 1986 period.
    A drop in Saudi Arabian output to a tentatively forecast
3.3 bpd in march from 3.6 bpd in February was the largest
factor behind the OPEC production decline, the IEA said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13542>
Kuwait may re-register part of its
tanker fleet with foreign flag jurisdictions, including the
U.S. And USSR, in an attempt to protect them from Iranian
missile attacks in the Gulf war zone, U.S. Officials were
quoted by the New York Times as saying.
    The transfers would allow the country of registration to
escort Kuwaiti-owned ships in the Gulf. Kuwait had earlier
declined an offer of U.S. Naval escorts as too public an
admission of its need for protection, they said.
    Kuwait is also looking at flagging-out to European
registries, the officials said.
    Soviet flag tankers transporting Kuwaiti oil through the
Gulf may get Soviet escorts, the officials said.
    Kuwait had earlier considered having both USSR and U.S.
Escorts, but the U.S. Was unwilling to give the Soviet Union a
naval role in the region, the newspaper quoted the officials as
saying.
    Kuwait has backed Iraq in the seven-year war against Iran
and its ships have increasingly been the target of Iranian
attacks.
    The U.S. And Kuwait have been negotiating for over a month
on methods of protecting Kuwaiti ships.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13611>
Occidental Petroleum Corp said the
Shiviyacu-23 development well on Block 1-AB in the Peruvian
Amazon jungle is producing 6,593 barrels of 22 degree gravity
oil per day from depths of 9,543 to 9,547 and 9,556 to 9,599
feet.
    The company said it is drilling a new exploration well on
the block, Southeast Shiviyacu-1, 2.5 miles away.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13633>
The British Petroleum &lt;BP.L> Co Plc's
refinery at Grangemouth, Scotland, shut down after an explosion
and fire in the hydrocracker on March 22, will probably be back
in operation towards the week-end, a refinery spokesman said.
    He said the refinery will resume at about half its 178,500
barrels per day (bpd) capacity, as work on overhauling the
North Side of the complex, which began at the end of January,
will not be completed before the end of April.
    He said the refinery had been closed for longer than
originally expected due to the lengthy safety checks being
carried out prior to restarting.
    The explosion and fire, in which one worker was killed,
caused extensive damage to the central part of the 32,000
hydrocracker and the spokesman said today this unit would be
out of operation for several months. The remainder of the
refinery, including the 19,000 catalytic cracker, was
undamaged.
    He said inquiries into the accident, which happened while
the hydrocracker was not in operation, were continuing.
    In an earlier incident, two people were killed in an
explosion and fire at the refinery on March 13.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13963>
Kuwait has asked at least four
countries, including the United States, Soviet Union, Britain
and China, for temporary use of their flags or tankers to
protect Kuwaiti oil shipments in the troubled Persian Gulf,
Reagan Administration officials said.
    The officials confirmed a New York Times report that Kuwait
wants to transfer some of its oil tankers to U.S. or Soviet
registration in hopes Iran would be reluctant to launch new
"Silkworm" missiles at superpower flags.
    The United States has vowed to keep the gulf open to
international oil traffic and has warned Tehran against using
the Chinese-made missiles recently installed in Iran near the
mouth of the gulf.
    "They (the Kuwaitis) have also asked Britain, China and
possibly some other European countries to lease tankers to
carry their oil," one of the administration officials, who asked
not to be identified, told Reuters.
    The United States is considering the request to temporarily
transfer Kuwaiti ships to American registration, but such a
move could create insurance and other problems, the officials
said.
    U.S. defense officials told Reuters yesterday that Kuwait
had decided for at least the time being not to accept a U.S.
offer to use American warships to escort its tankers in the
gulf, where both Iran and Iraq have been attacking shipping.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=14211>
Kuwait has asked at least four
countries, including the United States, Soviet Union, Britain
and China, for temporary use of their flags or tankers to
protect Kuwaiti oil shipments in the troubled Persian Gulf,
Reagan Administration officials said.
    The officials confirmed a New York Times report that Kuwait
wants to transfer some of its oil tankers to U.S. or Soviet
registration in hopes Iran would be reluctant to launch new
"Silkworm" missiles at superpower flags.
    The United States has vowed to keep the gulf open to
international oil traffic and has warned Tehran against using
the Chinese-made missiles recently installed in Iran near the
mouth of the gulf.
    "They (the Kuwaitis) have also asked Britain, China and
possibly some other European countries to lease tankers to
carry their oil," one of the administration officials, who asked
not to be identified, told Reuters.
    The United States is considering the request to temporarily
transfer Kuwaiti ships to American registration, but such a
move could create insurance and other problems, the officials
said.
    U.S. defense officials told Reuters yesterday that Kuwait
had decided for at least the time being not to accept a U.S.
offer to use American warships to escort its tankers in the
gulf, where both Iran and Iraq have been attacking shipping.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=14395>
&lt;Cooperative Energy Development
Corp> said two exploratory oil wells in the Zama area of
Alberta tested 1,020 and 950 barrels a day, and will increase
the company's daily oil production by 30 pct.
    The company did not immediately elaborate on total
production figures.
    The wells, flowing oil from the Keg River formation, will
be constrained to combined production of about 450 barrels a
day to optimize reserve recovery, the company said.
    Permanent production facilities are being installed and the
wells will produce to pipeline by mid-April.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=14698>
Petroleum futures rallied today in a
market that was expecting declines in domestic supplies and
became further unsettled by escalated Mideast fighting.
    Crude oil, gasoline and heating oil all posted gains on the
New York Mercantile Exchange, with crude oil prices matching
life-of-contract highs. Crude for delivery in May closed 17
cents higher at 18.84 dlrs a barrel.
    "Crude futures could jump above 19 dlrs a barrel but will
not remain there long if products are not strong," Robert
Murphy, account executive at E.F. Hutton, said.
    Traders said prices were supported by anticipation that the
American Petroleum Institute would report a decline in domestic
inventories of petroleum products in a weekly report.
    Traders said prices also were supported by an escalation in
the Iran-Iraq war, with the Iranians reportedly launching a new
offensive against Iraqi positions, and Iraq attacking offshore
oil fields and an oil export depot.
    Buying by speculators continued to prompt gains in gold and
silver futures on the Commodity Exchange in New York.
    Gold prices retreated at midday, but rallied before the
close with support from the silver market, which was
approaching two-year highs, traders said.
    Soybean futures posted strong gains on the Chicago Board of
Trade, while corn and wheat were mostly higher.
    Traders said cash sales have been slow in the country, and
the soybean harvest in Brazil has been delayed by rain, which
is limiting supplies.
    In addition, the Agriculture Department last week projected
a substantial drop in soybean acreage this year.     Monday's
report that the USDA inspected 46 mln bushels of corn for
export last week was unexpectedly high and, coupled with a lack
of farm sales, provided support for the corn market, traders
said.
    Live hogs and frozen pork bellies rallied on the Chicago
Mercantile Exchange, while cattle ended lower.
    Live hogs pushed ahead on a lack of supplies because many
farmers are turning their attention to spring planting rather
than marketing livestock, traders said, noting that cash sales
have been lighter than expected this week.
    The lack of marketing also has supported pork bellies, but
prices drifted lower for moderate losses in nearby months as
speculators sold contracts to take profits, traders said.
    Cattle prices closed lower but continued to show strength
related to tight supplies.
    Prices pushed ahead to new contract highs, extending gains
past three-year peaks set Monday, as tight supplies forced meat
packers to bid aggressively for available animals.
    However, some traders sold contracts to take profits after
the extended rally, which has seen the April delivery contract
soar to 69.90 cents a pound from 56 cents a pound at the start
of the year.
    New York coffee futures closed higher on trade talk Brazil
would not be an aggressive seller near term, analysts said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=14732>
Distillate fuel stocks held in
primary storage rose by 628,000 barrels in the week ended April
three to 106.96 mln barrels from a revised 106.33 mln the
previous week, the American Petroleum Institute said.
    In its weekly statistical bulletin, the oil industry trade
group said gasoline stocks rose 2.29 mln barrels to 247.91 mln
barrels from a revised 245.62 mln, and crude oil stocks were up
8.52 mln barrels to 337.73 mln from a revised 329.21 mln.
    It said residual fuel stocks rose 28,000 barrels to 38.25
mln from a revised 37.98 mln barrels.
    API said refinery runs in the week rose to 12.54 mln
barrels per day from 12.21 mln and refinery use of operating
capacity was 80.4 pct, up from 78.3 pct.
    Crude oil imports in the week fell to 3.40 mln bpd from a
revised 3.60 mln, API added.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2007>
&lt;Orbit Oil and Gas Ltd> said
the value of its oil and gas reserves increased by 19 pct to
52.6 mln dlrs from 44.2 mln dlrs reported at year-end 1985,
according to an independent appraisal.
    Orbit said it has reserves of 2.4 mln barrels of oil and
natural gas liquids and 67.2 billion cubic feet of natural gas.
    In addition, 75 pct owned &lt;Sienna Resources Ltd> has
Canadian reserves of 173,000 barrels of oil and 1.6 bcf of
natural gas with a current value of 2.2 mln dlrs, Orbit said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2046>
Diamond Shamrock said it raised its
posted prices for all grades of crude oil one dlr a barrel,
effective yesterday.
    The one dlr increase brings West Texas Intermediate, WTI
the U.S. benchmark crude, to 17.00 dlrs a bbl, the company
said.
    Diamond Shamrock joined Sun Co, Coastal, Citgo and Murphy
Oil in raising crude oil posted prices one dlr a barrel
yesterday.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2061>
Royal Dutch/Shell Group &lt;RD.AS> earnings
for 1986 from the U.S. Fell sharply because of difficult market
conditions, lower crude and gas prices and also due to
different accounting methods, Shell chairman Peter Holmes said.
    The Shell Oil dollar net income fell 47 pct in the year,
while the additional effect of currency movements reduced the
contribution to group net income by 57 pct to 472 mln stg.
    The group earlier reported a drop in net income for the
year to 2.54 billion stg from 3.03 billion previously, with
lower crude prices outweighing the effect of increased sales by
volume.
    Although the figures were lower, they were nonetheless at
the top end of market forecasts. Shell Transport and Trading
Plc &lt;SC.L> shares, the U.K. Arm of the group, rose to 11.39 stg
from a close last night of 11.06 stg. Analysts noted that a
general collapse in exploration and production volumes was
partially offset by earnings from chemicals rising to 462 mln
stg from 205 mln in 1985.
    Also, a windfall tax credit and lower than expected
currency losses had added about 100 mln stg onto fourth quarter
results, which was the main reason for the figures exceeding
forecasts, industry analyst Chris Rowland of Barclays de Zoete
Wedd noted.
    However, he added there could well be a sharp fall in
performance in the first quarter of 1987, due to the
improbability that the group would be able to repeat the high
refining and marketing margins of first quarter 1986.
    The impact of recovering oil prices would come through
faster on the downstream side than on the upstream as such a
high proportion of upstream activity centred on gas, which
typically reacted to oil price changes with about a half-year
lag, analysts said.
    Holmes said that in the upstream U.S. Sector the third
quarter of 1986 had been the worst of all.
    Only two of the oil majors had managed to make a profit in
the period, with Shell Oil being one of them. The decrease in
U.S. Earnings had been accentuated by tax rates but the group
had increased share to become volume market leader, Holmes
added.
    Continued low crude oil prices would continue to subdue
U.S. Exploration activity. "Exploration is currently pretty
flat. We are going to go on, but at 16-18 dlrs there will be no
massive upturn," he said.
    A renewal of exploration in high cost areas of the North
Sea and the U.S. Requires prices of around 25 dlrs a barrel.
    Ultimately this would lead to a rise in U.S. Imports. "If
you are not exploring you are not going to find anything," he
noted.
    U.S. Oil production had dropped some half mln barrels a day
(bbd) in 1986 and would continue to fall if the price stayed
below 20 dlrs a barrel.
    This favored OPEC's attempts to stabilise prices, as the
lower the price the more likelihood there was of non-OPEC
marginal production shutting down. "OPEC has done pretty
extraordinarily well...Everything is moving in (its) direction,"
he added.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2121>
OPEC output in February was "well below"
the 15.8 mln bpd ceiling it set in December and all countries
are strictly adhering to their quotas, the OPEC news agency
Opecna quoted an OPEC secretariat official as saying.
    The official was quoted as saying that lower output was the
result "of member countries' firm determination to defend the
organisation's official price of 18 dlrs per barrel, and to
refrain from selling any quantity below that price."
    The unnamed official was further quoted as saying that no
OPEC meeting was foreseen before the next biannual OPEC session
planned to start on June 25.
    The official gave no figure for February output. The
statement said only that "the reduction in total supplies,
namely actual exports of crude oil and products, plus local
deliveries in member countries, is even more pronounced as
those supplies fell very noticeably during that month."
    "No matter what the pressure on member countries by lifters
to align the official selling price to the ongoing market
price, member countries are, without exception, strictly
adhering to the official selling price in spite of the
financial hardship this may entail," the statement said.
    "The very recent improvement in the price structure is an
indicator of such determination by the organization to stick to
the official selling price," the statement said.
    Free spot market prices rose from around 14.50 dlrs a
barrel in early December last year to near OPEC's official
levels towards the end of the year, after the OPEC pact.
    There has been oil industry speculation that OPEC might
have to hold an extraordinrary meeting prior to its scheduled
June session to discuss reports of overproduction by some
states and strains on the differential matrix, which prices
each OPEC crude according to its quality and distance from main
markets.
    The official said in the statement that no such emergency
session was scheduled "because of member countries' firm
determination to defend the price (system)" agreed in December.
    Opec"s differential committee was to have met in Vienna
starting April 2 but this session has been postponed, with no
new date set, according to an official of the United Arab
Emirates, which chairs the seven-state body.
    Other members are Algeria, Kuwait, Saudi Arabia, Libya,
Nigeria and Qatar.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2175>
A presidential commission that has
been studying oil imports, including their effect on national
security, is to to make its report soon, the White House said.
    Spokesman Marlin Fitzwater said the panel, set up last
October to examine U.S. oil import needs, would make its report
soon, probably within the next few weeks.
    He said National Security Adviser Frank Carlucci "will wait
until that report is in and then see if there is any special
action needed to be taken in the national security area to
implement it."
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2187>
Strong winds and high seas
today closed Alexandria, Egypt's biggest port, and an oil
pipeline terminal nearby, officials said.
    Facilities of the Suez-Mediterranean Arab Petroleum
Pipelines Company at Sidi Kreir, 32 km southeast of Alexandria,
were closed this morning after one tanker loaded and sailed.
    Officials said that five other tankers were waiting outside
the terminal for conditions to improve.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2231>
Non-Opec Egypt produced 40.3 mln tonnes
(about 295 mln barrels) of crude in 1986 against 44.3 mln
tonnes (about 323 mln barrels) in 1985, according to official
figures released today by the Egyptian General Petroleum Corp.
(EGPC).
    Officials say Egypt can produce up to one mln bpd per day,
but production was cut when world prices plunged last year.
    In an attempt to help OPEC stabilize the world market,
Egypt cut its 1987 production target of 940,000 bpd to its
current output of 870,000 bpd.
    Egypt, which exports a third of its output, currently sells
its top Suez and Ras Bahar blends for 17.25 dlrs a barrel.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2383>
Opec Conference President Rilwanu Lukman
said the group was producing well below the 15.8 mln bpd
ceiling it set in December, partly because liftings had been
delayed or postponed by customers unwilling to pay fixed Opec
prices.
    Lukman, during a brief visit to London on his way home from
Jamaica, told Reuters in a telephone interview that in
February, Opec had underproduced partly because members were
strictly abiding by production quotas and partly because they
were resisting the temptation to sell at discounts to official
prices of around 18 dlrs a barrel.
    "We are determined to stand firm by the (December) accord,"
he said. "I have spoken to every other Opec minister and they
are committed to making the accord work," he said.
    Lukman gave no specific figures for February output. He
said the Opec secretariat in Vienna was finalizing these
figures.
    Told of a Reuters survey published today which estimated
that Opec output so far this week was below 15 mln bpd, he
said; "That could well be correct."
    Opec"s news agency Opecna today issued a statement saying
group output was "well below" its ceiling in February. But it
gave no figures.
    But one source close to Opec indicated that February output
may have been between 15.3 and 15.5 mln bpd.
    The Reuter survey estimated Opec February output at around
16 mln bpd.
    Opec agreed in December to cut output by 7.25 pct to 15.8
mln bpd and to return to fixed prices starting February 1.
    Lukman said Qatar, Nigeria, Saudi Arabia and Iran had all
produced in February below their Opec quotas. Iraq, which said
it would not honour its 1.466 mln bpd quota under the December
pact, had produced less than had been anticipated, he said.
    Lukman said that some industry reports "may be correct" that
in February, Nigeria propuced 75-100,000 bpd below its 1.238
mln bpd quota, Saudi Arabia 500,000 bpd less than its 4.133 mln
allocation and Qatar 20 to 30 pct under its 285,000 bpd quota.
    He said that sweet crudes such as those produced by his
country were coming under price pressure because they were
currently officially priced above sweet North Sea grades and
the United States" West Texas Intermediate (WTI) crude.
    However, he said Opec in December had anticipated that
demand would be slack at this time of year for seasonal reasons
and expected the market to firm in two to three weeks.
    "We have to be patient for two or three weeks. The market is
now firming on actual fundamentals," he said, adding that he
expected it to go "up and up" even beyond official prices after
early April. This is when, traditionally, there is more demand
for gasoline-rich crudes such as Nigeria"s.
    The Opec President said producers such as Kuwait, Venezuela
and Indonesia were having less problems with output than
producers like his own country because they exported oil
products.
    Also, some of Venezuela"s heavy grades were outside the Opec
pricing system, he said.
    Lukman said that if refiner-buyers, now refusing to lift
some Opec oil at official prices, instead used their own stocks
and ran them down to "dangerous levels," they would eventually
have to buy Opec oil.
    "When they realise it is not a free-for-all (in the market)
they will realise they should buy now instead of paying more
later on," he said.
    Lukman, asked about industry reports that Nigeria was being
pressured by equity producers for better terms, said it was
important to know that terms with them were negotiable,
flexible and under constant review, not only when the market
seemed weak.
    He said that so far, no meeting of the seven-nation
ministerial differentials committee had been scheduled and that
such a meeting, now twice-postponed, was not a high priority
for Opec at the moment.
    "At this time, we have to get our priorities right," he said.
"The most important thing now is ensuring that the accord is
working, not dealing with a differential of cents between
grades."
    But if any Opec member raised concerns or objections over
the differential system, a meeting would be called, he said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2449>
Renewed confidence in OPEC's ability to
limit production helped U.S. energy futures settle above
yesterday's closing prices, according to analysts.
    They also said the heating oil contract found additional
support from a short-covering rally on the close.
    April crude closed 24 cts higher to 17.75 dlrs. April
heating oil was 1.47 cts higher to 47.91 cts a gallon.
    "Most traders expected follow through profit-taking from
yesterday but the market found suport from bullish reports that
OPEC is producing within its quota," said Simon Greenshields, a
vice president with Morgan Stanley and Co Inc.
    News today, including OPEC President Rilwanu Lukman
statement that OPEC February production did not exceed its
official quota of 15.8 mln barrels per day, helped bouy prices,
traders said. A Reuter survey found OPEC production in early
March was 14.7 mln bpd.
    In addition to short-covering, heating oil found support
from traders buying it against sales of gasoline and crude, as
well as from expectations for continued drawdowns in stocks as
refiners shut down for maintenance, traders said.
    Unleaded gasoline for April finished 0.55 cent higher to
51.24 cts a gallon.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2511>
The Reagan administration wants to
encourage expanded trade with the Soviet Union but does not
believe Moscow yet warrants most-favored-nation treatment,
Deputy Secretary of State John Whitehead said.
    "It seems to me that more trade between us is better than
less trade," he told a forum on U.S.-Soviet trade relations.
    To that end, the administration in January allowed foreign
policy controls on the export of oil and gas equipment to the
Soviet Union to lapse, he said.
    Also, Washington and its allies are reviewing remaining
export controls in hopes of simplifying the list of prohibited
items and speeding up the licensing process, he said.
    Whitehead said, however, the prefential treatment that
comes with most-favored-nation status is out for the moment.
    U.S. law prohibits most-favored-nation status for countries
that restrict emigration and other rights.
    "What we have seen so far (in improved rights under Soviet
Leader Mikhail Gorbachev) are promising trends," he said.
    But, he added: "We don't know if they will continue, we
don't know how significant they will be."
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2515>
South Africa's state-owned energy
firm Soekor said it would continue tests after striking oil
some 120 kms (75 miles) south-southwest of Mossel Bay.
    During production tests, about 5,000 barrels of oil and
five mln cubic feet of gas per day were produced, it said.
    "This oil discovery will be followed-up as soon as possible
by further seismic surveys and drilling. Should further
drilling and tests in the area yield positive results oil
production from a floating platform could be considered."
    Director General of Mineral and Energy Affairs Louw Alberts
announced the strike earlier but said it was uneconomic.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2517>
Greece, replying to a warning from Turkey
that it will stop Athens from seeking oil in the Aegean Sea,
repeated today that it has an exclusive right to decide where
or when to drill in the area.
    A government spokesman said in a statement that if Ankara
believed Greece was contravening international law, it could
bring the issue before the courts.
    The spokesman was responding to a statement by Turkish
Foreign Ministry spokesman Yalim Eralp that Ankara would take
action to stop Greece's oil activities beyond its territorial
waters as they were a violation of the 1976 Berne accord.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2522>
OPEC produced an average 16.1 mln barrels
per day (bpd) of crude oil in February, down from 16.5 mln the
previous month and an overall 17.3 mln bpd in fourth quarter
1986, the International Energy Agency said.
    A few OPEC countries last month exceeded the production
quotas set at their last conference in December, but liftings
were reduced from several countries, it said in its latest
monthly oil market report.
    These cutbacks were due in part to buyer resistance to
fixed prices, introduced from February 1, particularly for
fixed volumes over an extended period.
    It gave this breakdown for OPEC crude output, in mln bpd
                    FOURTH QTR 1986  JANUARY 1987  FEBRUARY
1987
    SAUDI ARABIA    4.9              3.7           3.8
    IRAN            1.6              2.2           1.9
    IRAQ            1.6              1.6           1.7
    UAE             1.3              1.2           1.2
    KUWAIT          1.0              1.0           1.0
    NEUTRAL ZONE    0.5              0.4           0.4
    QATAR           0.3              0.3           0.2
    NIGERIA         1.3              1.2           1.2
    LIBYA           1.0              1.0           1.0
                    FOURTH QTR 1986  JANUARY 1987  FEBRUARY
1987
    ALGERIA         0.6              0.6           0.6
    GABON           0.1              0.2           0.2
    VENEZUELA       1.6              1.6           1.6
    ECUADOR         0.2              0.2           0.2
    INDONESIA       1.3              1.2           1.2
    TOTAL           17.3             16.5          16.1
    The IEA said while Saudi production stayed below its quota
of 4.133 mln bpd, actual sales might exceed output due to
Norbec stock disposals. Contracts for Saudi crude have been
signed, but it is understood they have much leeway in required
liftings.
    The report said the reduction in Iraqi air attacks on
Iranian export facilities allowed Iran's output to reach 2.2
mln bpd in January, but buyer resistance to fixed prices
apparently cut February production.
    It said Iraqi exports are about 1.0 mln bpd through the
Turkish pipeline, 0.1-0.2 mln by truck through Jordan and
0.2-0.3 mln via the Saudi pipeline to Yanbu. Internal
consumption is some 0.3 mln bpd.
    The IEA estimated total non-communist world oil supply in
February at 45.0 mln bpd, down from 45.4 mln in January and
47.0 mln in the fourth quarter.
    The February world supply figure is made up of 16.1 mln bpd
OPEC crude production, 1.4 mln bpd OPEC natural gas liquids
(ngls), 16.6 mln bpd OECD crude and ngls, 8.3 mln bpd other
developing countries' crude and ngls, net trade of 1.1 mln bpd
with centrally planned economies, 0.5 mln bpd of
non-conventional crudes (such as tar sands and oil from coal)
and 1.0 mln bpd from processiing gains.
    Within the OECD, preliminary Norwegian data show record
1.06 mln bpd output in January, with lower production expected
in February in accordance with government curtailments of
approximately 80,000 bpd, announced in support of OPEC.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2530>
The Mexican state oil company
Petroleos Mexicanos (PEMEX) said its Far East customers would
be charged 17.25 dlrs per barrel for Isthmus crude in February
and 14.45 dlrs for the heavier Maya.
    Pemex said this was 32 cts less than January Isthmus and 15
cts less than January Maya.
    Far East customers, primarily Japan which buys an average
180,000 barrels per day of which 150,000 is Isthmus, pay
retroactively while European and U.S. clients are charged per
delivery.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2585>
Permian Corp said that effective march 5
it raised its posted prices for crude oil 50 cts a barrel.
    The raise brought its posted prices for West texas
Intermediate up by 50 cts to 17.00 dlrs a barrel.
    West Texas Sour was also raised by 50 cts to 17.00 dlrs a
barrel.
    A Permian spokesman said that the South Louisiana sweet
posted prices was also raised 50 cts a barrel to 17.35 dlrs.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2688>
Ecuador today suspended its crude oil
exports indefinitely due to an earthquake last night that
damaged pumping and crude transport installations, an Energy
and Mines MInistry statement said.
    It said the state oil firm Corporacion Estatal Petrolera
Ecuatoriana (CEPE) notified foreign customers that it was
declaring force majeure on its crude exports due to the tremor.
    Ecuador"s OPEC oil output quota is 210,000 barrels per day
(bpd).
    A senior energy ministry official said that one pumping
station at El Salado on Ecuador's main pipeline was damaged.
    He also said an 180 metre section of the pipeline attached
to the bridge over the Aguarico river collapsed.
    The pumping station was about 20 km from the Reventador
volcano, near the epicentre of the quake, which Ecuadorean
seismologists said registered six on the 12-point international
Mercalli scale. The Aguarico bridge was also close to the
volcano, he said.
    The quake struck northern Ecaudor and southern Colombia,
according to Ecuadorean officials. No injuries were reported.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2767>
Colombian oil installations were not
damaged by an earthquake which shook Ecuador and southern
Colombia last night and there are no plans to suspend exports,
a spokesman for the state-run oil company Ecopetrol said.
    He said no damage was reported, unlike in Ecuador where
indefinite force majeure was declared on crude exports.
    Colombia currently produces about 360,000 barrels per day
(bpd) of crude. Exports in january totalled 123,000 bpd.
    The quake, which in Colombia measured between 6.5 and seven
on the 12-point international Mercalli scale, caused panic
among residents but no injuries were reported.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2775>
U.S. crude oil prices rose above 18 
dlrs a barrel this week and industry analysts said the price
could rise another dollar as inventories fall.
    "OPEC is keeping its production down, and in the cash market
there is tight supply of crude with short transportation time
to major refining centers," said Daniel McKinley, oil analyst
with Smith Barney, Harris Upham and Co. "That could send prices
50 cts to a dollar higher," he added.
    The U.S. benchmark crude West Texas Intermediate rose to
18.15 dlrs a barrel today, a rise of 1.50 dlrs this week.
    The rally in oil prices this week came after prices fell in
February more than two dlrs from its high of 18.25 dlrs a
barrel.
    "Oil traders were pulling prices down on the assumption that
oil stocks were building and OPEC was producing well above its
15.8 mln bpd quota, but now both of those assumptions have come
under question," McKinley said.
    Yesterday the International Energy Agency in its monthly
report said that oil stocks in the OECD area, or in
industrialized nations, were drawn down by 1.3 mln bpd during
the first quarter of this year.
    IEA estimates that the draw in oil stocks during the first
quarter of this year will come largely from oil companies whose
inventory levels by April one will be an estimated 326 mln
tonnes, or about 74 days consumption.
    Industry analysts also said the estimate of a 3.5 mln bpd
draw in stocks made by Shell Chairman Peter Holmes yesterday
fed speculation that other major companies were destocking.
    Traders said the destocking has come about as a result of a
so-called buyers strike, which kept refiners from buying
officially priced OPEC oil in an effort to get the organization
to offer discounts to the official price.
    "This struggle between the companies and OPEC is the
ultimate game of chicken but it will be resolved relatively
soon. I would imagine by about the middle of the month (March),"
the general trading manager of an international oil company
told Reuters in a telephone interview.
    For its part OPEC has moved to win this game by cutting
excess supplies from the market by a reduction of its own
output, traders said. A Reuter survey estimates OPEC output to
be 14.7 mln bpd this week.
    Also, an earthquake in Ecuador yesterday led it to suspend
oil exports indefintiely and force majeure its shipments.
    "This will reduce short-haul availabilities by about 250,000
bpd almost immediately and the longer the suspension continues,
the larger the draw in stocks will be for companies expecting
it to be there," McKinley said.
    International oil traders said that other short-haul
crudes, such as North Sea Brent, were also scarce because Asian
refiners bought the oil after absorbing a lot of the readily
available Mideast crudes earlier this week.
    If this pattern continues then oil companies will bid up
the price of oil as they purchase for their refineries, trading
managers at several companies told Reuters.
    But there were skeptics who said they wondered how long
OPEC can retain its unity if buyer resistance continues.
    Stephen Hanke, chief economist at Friedburg Commodity
Management, said OPEC production was lower "because of the
Saudi cut (to 3.1 mln bpd) and this could spell trouble if it
gives other members an incentive to exceed their quotas."
     He added, "The Saudis will be picking up the tab for other
members who produce over their quota, and the drain on the
Saudis will continue, forcing them to cut output maybe as low
as 2.5 mln bpd to support the 18 dlrs average price," he added.
    There are also signs of some OPEC crudes being sold in the
spot market at below OPEC official prices, traders said.
    Oil traders said Nigerian Brass River sold for delivery
into the U.S. Gulf at a price related to North Sea brent, which
traded this week at 17.60 dlrs, far below the official price of
18.92 dlrs for the similar quality Bonny Light.
    Iranian oil is also surfacing in the U.S. Gulf and the Far
East at reported discounts to its 17.50 dlrs official price.
    "There is a lot of oil priced on government-to-government
deals, which are below official prices and this is probably
being resold," one international trader said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2838>
Iranian Oil Minister Gholamreza Aqazadeh
arrived in Algiers at the head of a large delegation for talks
on stabilizing oil prices, the official news agency APS said.
    In a brief arrival statement, he said Iran and Algeria were
engaged in "continuous and stronger cooperation" on the world
petroleum market and had "deployed considerable efforts to
stablise petroleum prices."
    He was greeted on arrival by Belkacem Nabi, the Algerian
Minister of Energy, Chemical and Petro-Chemical Industries.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2925>
Higher oil prices and stronger than
expected U.S. employment growth led to sharp losses in U.S.
interest rate futures and diminished what had been a positive
chart outlook, financial analysts said.
    The increase of 319,000 in non-farm payroll employment
during February was above market expectations for a rise of
170,000 to 200,000 jobs and sparked selling in Treasury bond
futures that drove the June contract through key technical
support at 101-2/32 at the opening Friday, they noted.
    "I don't like that fact that we had a close below 101,"
said Prudential Bache analyst Fred Leiner. The 101-2/32 level
in the June bond contract had been the top of a three-month
trading range, which when penetrated during the rally Wednesday
led to bullish forecasts by chartists.
    But analysts called it a false breakout on the weekly
charts when the June bond closed at 100-10/32 Friday.
    Some also forecast that the high of the week at 101-19/32
may signal a bearish double top formation portending steep
losses.
    "I tend to go along with the double top scenario," said
Northern Futures analyst Eileen Rico.
    Rico noted that the possible formation, along with the fact
that the rally of the last two weeks in bond futures has
occurred on relatively low volume, were negative signals.
    Despite what could be a negative chart outlook, Leiner
remains cautiously optimistic, and June bonds should find
support between 100 and 99-16/32 next week.
    The optimistic outlook, as well as Leiner's expectation
that the yield curve will flatten in the near term, is based on
an improving inflation outlook.
    With the dollar stable and economic data giving the Federal
Reserve little room to ease monetary policy, "the inflation
outlook is improving," Leiner said, and that should lead to
relatively stronger bond prices than bill and Eurodollar
prices.
    Still, Leiner noted that the recent rise in oil prices
remains a concern for the inflation outlook.
    Oil rose during the week on reports that OPEC nations were
maintaining production quotas and official prices, and got an
extra boost Friday due to the suspension of oil exports from
Ecuador after an earthquake Thursday.
    "The runup in crude oil will be a short-lived phenomenon,"
said Carroll McEntee and McGinley analyst Brian Singer.
    The rise in oil prices over the past week has been largely
"media induced," Singer said. He noted that even though OPEC
production may be within quotas, "oil stocks are at
tremendously high levels."
    Although the Ecuador situation could cause a delay, oil
prices will eventually decline to the lows of late February, he
said, and that will be a supportive influence for bond prices.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2957>
OPEC member Ecuador adopted austerity
measures to conserve fuel after oil production was paralyzed by
a strong earthquake.
    Energy and Mines Minister Javier Espinosa announced on
television the country would cut domestic fuel sales by 30 pct.
A ministry statement had earlier announced indefinite
suspension of crude oil exports, declaring force majeure.
    Deputy Energy Minister Fernando Santos Alvite told a
television interviewer that it could possibly take more than a
month to repair Ecuador's main pipeline linking Amazon basin
oil fields to the Pacific Ocean coast.
    The quake on Thursday, which registered six on the 12-point
Mercalli scale, killed at least six people and was centred near
the Reventador volcano about 90 km (50 miles) east of Quito.
    Ecuador had recently been pumping 260,000 barrels per day.
    The government's austerity measures ban the sale of
aviation fuel to foreign airliners on international routes and
no fuel will be available for ships owned by foreign lines.
    Ecuador also banned the sale of petrol on weekends and
holidays and limited sales on weekdays, an Energy and Mines
Ministry communique said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2970>
Turkey oil pipeline near the southern town of Adana after it
was cut by a landslide, the Hurriyet and Anatolian news
agencies said.
    Little oil was lost in the landslide Friday night because
taps on the one mln bpd line were switched off after the
accident, they said.
    The pipeline, which carries oil for Turkey and other
customers from Iraq's Kirkuk field to the Yumurtalik terminal
on the Turkish Mediterranean coast, is Iraq's main oil outlet.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2973>
The suspension of Ecuador's crude oil
shipments after an earthquake cut an oil pipeline will last at
least four months, a senior Energy Ministry official said.
    The official said Ecuador could resume exports after
repairing a 40 km section of the 510 km pipeline, which links
jungle oil fields at Lago Agrio to Balao on the Pacific coast.
It would take about 100 mln U.S. Dlrs to repair the pipeline,
the official, who did not want to be named, told Reuters.
Ecuador had enough oil to meet domestic demand for about 35
days and would have to import crude to supplement stocks.
    The earthquake last Thursday night registered six on the
12-point international Mercalli scale. The damage to the
pipeline was a severe economic blow to Ecuador, where oil
accounts for up to two-thirds of total exports and as much as
60 pct of government revenues.
    Financially pressed Ecuador, a member of the Organisation
of Petroleum Exporting Countries (OPEC), was recently pumping
about 260,000 barrels per day (bpd) of crude, about 50,000 bpd
above the output quota assigned by the cartel, another Energy
Ministry spokesman said. Last year, it exported an average of
173,500 bpd, according to the central bank.
    However, Ecuador might build an emergency 25 km pipeline,
costing 15 to 20 mln dlrs, to hook up with a Colombian
pipeline, the first official said. He estimated it could take
about 60 days to build.
    Ecuador, squeezed by the slide in world oil prices in 1986,
had only 138 mln dlrs in net international reserves at the end
of January, about equal to one month's imports.
    It suspended interest payments in January on 5.4 billion
dlrs owed to about 400 private foreign banks. The country's
total foreign debt is 8.16 billion dlrs, the eighth largest in
Latin America.
    In Caracas, President Jaime Lusinchi said Venezuela would
loan five mln barrels of crude to Ecuador over the next three
months to make up for losses from damage to the pipeline.
    Ecuador asked for the loan to guarantee domestic supplies
and would ship an equivalent volume back to Venezuela in
repayment in May, Lusinchi said.
    A commission headed by Venezuelan Investment Fund Minister
Hector Hurtado and including representatives from the interior
and defence ministries and the state oil company Petroleos de
Venezuela will travel to Ecuador Tuesday to evaluate and
co-ordinate an emergency relief program, he said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2998>
Japanese customers have bought nearly six
mln barrels of crude oil from the National Iranian Oil Company
(NIOC) at a substantial discount to the official price, and
Western traders have received even larger discounts, Japanese
traders involved in the transactions told Reuters.
    NIOC has sold its crude for March shipment to Japanese
customers with different formulas. One company has bought
800,000 barrels of Iranian Heavy at a straight discount of
30-35 cents below the official price, the sources said.
    Other deals have been fixed with prices linked to Oman and
Dubai spot prices less a discount, they said.

    Iran's discounted sales have not, however, managed to
reverse the bullish tone in the crude oil and products spot
markets, oil traders said.
    Market sentiment is being influenced more by the colder
weather in Europe, and reports that OPEC's February output was
below its self-imposed quota of 15.8 mln barrels per day.
    Firmer gas oil on the London futures, and more bullish
sentiment on the New York Mercantile Exchange futures market
are supporting spot price levels, they said.

    Another Japanese trading house has paid the official price
but through a processing arrangement will effectively receive a
discount, the sources said. "It's just disguised cheating," one
Japanese trader said.
    The sources said only one Japanese company had paid the
official price for Iranian oil. It has purchased 1.5 mln
barrels of Iranian Heavy for April shipment for refining in
Singapore. They said about nine VLCCs of Iranian crude have
been sold to Western traders with pricing based 60 pct on the
official price and 40 pct on spot prices, or with part of the
price related to processing arrangements.

</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3003>
The U.S. &lt;Amoco Petroleum Corp> has
reported an offshore oil find at its Pearl River basin
concession in the South China Sea, the New China News Agency
said.
    It said the Liu Hua 11-1-1 A well produced at around 2,240
barrels per day at a depth of 305 metres.
    The news agency said Amoco plans to drill a second well in
the area this year, but gave no further details.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3015>
Estimated oil and gas drilling
completions in the United States dropped by almost 41 per cent
in 1986 from 1985, the American Petroleum Institute said.
    API, an industry group, said that of the 42,387 wells
completed last year, a total of 19,741 were oil wells, 8,645
were natural gas wells and 14,001 were dry holes.
    In 1985, a total of 71,539 wells were drilled - 36,834 oil
wells, 13,036 gas wells and 21,669 dry holes.
 reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3017>
A strike by Brazil's 40,000 seafarers
who want pay rises of up to 180 pct may have cost the
state-owned oil company Petrobras 20 mln dlrs in lost export
orders, the company's commercial director Arthur de Carvalho
was quoted as saying in press reports.
    More than 170 ships in Brazil, and about nine more in
foreign ports, have been halted by the strike, which began on
February 27.
    Marines began blockading the ships on Friday after the
strike was ruled illegal, and some strikers are running short
of food, National Merchants Marine Union president Edson Areias
said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3048>
The suspension of Ecuador's crude oil
shipments after an earthquake cut an oil pipeline will last at
least four months, a senior Energy Ministry official said.
    The official said Ecuador could resume exports after
repairing a 40 km section of the 510 km pipeline, which links
jungle oil fields at Lago Agrio to Balao on the Pacific coast.
It would take about 100 mln U.S. Dlrs to repair the pipeline,
the official, who did not want to be named, told Reuters.
Ecuador had enough oil to meet domestic demand for about 35
days and would have to import crude to supplement stocks.
    The earthquake last Thursday night registered six on the
12-point international Mercalli scale. The damage to the
pipeline was a severe economic blow to Ecuador, where oil
accounts for up to two-thirds of total exports and as much as
60 pct of government revenues.
    Financially pressed Ecuador, a member of the Organisation
of Petroleum Exporting Countries (OPEC), was recently pumping
about 260,000 barrels per day (bpd) of crude, about 50,000 bpd
above the output quota assigned by the cartel, another Energy
Ministry spokesman said. Last year, it exported an average of
173,500 bpd, according to the central bank.
    However, Ecuador might build an emergency 25 km pipeline,
costing 15 to 20 mln dlrs, to hook up with a Colombian
pipeline, the first official said. He estimated it could take
about 60 days to build.
    Ecuador, squeezed by the slide in world oil prices in 1986,
had only 138 mln dlrs in net international reserves at the end
of January, about equal to one month's imports.
    It suspended interest payments in January on 5.4 billion
dlrs owed to about 400 private foreign banks. The country's
total foreign debt is 8.16 billion dlrs, the eighth largest in
Latin America.
    In Caracas, President Jaime Lusinchi said Venezuela would
loan five mln barrels of crude to Ecuador over the next three
months to make up for losses from damage to the pipeline.
    Ecuador asked for the loan to guarantee domestic supplies
and would ship an equivalent volume back to Venezuela in
repayment in May, Lusinchi said.
    A commission headed by Venezuelan Investment Fund Minister
Hector Hurtado and including representatives from the interior
and defence ministries and the state oil company Petroleos de
Venezuela will travel to Ecuador Tuesday to evaluate and
co-ordinate an emergency relief program, he said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3065>
The 24 nations of the Organisation for
Economic Cooperation and Development (OECD), hampered by
sluggish industrial output and trade, face slower economic
growth, and their joint balance of payments will swing into
deficit in 1987, the Economist Intelligence Unit (EIU ) said.
    The EIU said in its World Trade Forecast it revised OECD
economic growth downwards to 2.5 pct this year, compared with a
2.8 pct growth forecast in December.
    It said the new areas of weakness are West Germany and the
smaller European countries it influences, and Japan, hardest
hit by currency appreciation this year.
    The independent research organisation cut its 1987 growth
rate forecasts for West Germany to 2.2 pct from 3.2 pct in
December and to 2.3 pct from three pct for Japan.
    It said it expected the OECD to post a current account
deficit of some 13 billion dlrs in both 1987 and 1988, due in
large part to a 1.50 dlrs a barrel rise in 1987 oil prices.
    It said the U.S. Current account deficit looked likely to
fall even more slowly than forecast, to 125 billion dlrs in
1987 and 115 billion in 1988 from 130 billion in 1986.
    It said it expected West Germany to post a 31 billion dlr
payments surplus and Japan a 76 billion dlr surplus this year.
    The EIU said it saw oil prices dropping to around 16.50
dlrs a barrel by end-1987 and 15.50 dlrs in 1988 from about 18
dlrs last year, as adherence to OPEC output policy becomes
increasingly ragged.
    It said the dollar is poised to resume its decline in
foreign exchange markets, and will lose a further 13 pct on its
trade-weighted index this year and five pct in 1988 after last
year's 18.4 pct drop.
    The average mark/dollar rate is put at 1.80 marks this year
and 1.70 in 1988 while the yen/dollar rate is expected to break
through the 150 yen barrier with an average value of 150 yen in
1987 and 146 yen in 1988, it said.
    "This is not a crash scenario but the dollar's steeper angle
of descent increases the risk of ending with a fireball rather
than a three-point landing," the EIU said.
    "Talking will not stop the dollar's slide for long and the
February meeting (of finance ministers of the Group of Five and
Canada) produced scant promise of either a decisive shift to
more expansive policies in West Germany and Japan, or a tighter
U.S. Fiscal policy," it said.
    It said the key to the dollar's fortunes was the
willingness of Japanese institutions to buy U.S. Government
assets despite prospects of sustaining a currency loss.
    "Thus far they have been willing," the EIC said, adding that
if Japan was deterred from buying U.S. Bonds the dollar would
collapse.
    To contain such a currency crisis, dollar interest rates
would have to soar, bringing recession and a Third World debt
crisis, it said.
    On trade, the EIU said prospects for 1987 look "increasingly
sick."
    Import growth, forecast in December at 4.5 pct, is now seen
slowing down to around 3.8 pct in 1987 with a recovery only to
4.2 pct in 1988, it said.
    The weakness of the West German economy is the biggest
single factor, with import growth there expected to feature a
sluggish 3.5 pct growth in 1987 against the 6.5 pct forecast in
December, the EIU said.
    On the export side, it said it saw weak demand in West
Germany affecting export prospects elsewhere in Europe, while
Japan's exports in 1987 would remain flat and sales by U.S.
Exporters would respond only marginally to a lower, more
competitively-priced dollar.
    It said in most of Europe and in Japan, raw materials and
oil will cost less in domestic currency in 1987 than in 1986.
    However, rates of inflation will edge up in 1988 to over
the current OECD average of three pct. Non-oil commodity prices
will show a modest dollar price increase in 1988 for the first
time since 1984, the EIU said.
    After a rise of 18 pct in 1986, the dollar price of
internationally traded manufactures will go up by 8.5 pct in
1987 and by five pct in 1988, it said.
    It said OECD industrial production would rise by only 1.6
pct in 1987 after a weak 1.5 pct increase in 1986.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3115>
Petro-Canada, Canada's
state-owned oil company, said it will drill two delineation
wells this summer at the Terra Nova oil field offshore
Newfoundland.
    Evaluation of test results and preliminary engineering work
should put Petro-Canada in a position to propose a development
plan for the Terra Nova field in 1988, the company said.
    Depending on time required for regulatory approvals,
construction could begin in 1989, with first oil production as
early as 1991, Petro-Canada said.
    "We have a high degree of confidence that the western
portion of the (Terra Nova) field contains at least 11 mln
cubic meters of recoverable oil, or more than 70 mln barrels,
and that we could produce it economicly using a floating
production system," Petro-Canada said.
    The Terra-Nova field, lying 350 kilometers east of St.
John's and 35 kilometers southeast of Hibernia field, was
discovered by Petro-Canada in 1984.
    "We've had encouraging results from the eastern portion of
the field, and we hope this summer's drilling will prove up
additional reserves there," the company said.
    Petro-Canada believes Terra Nova field is a good commercial
prospect and the company wants to move some of those resources
towards development so it can start generating a return on
investments, Petro-Canada said.
    Petro-Canada, which will act as operator of the two wells,
has a 75 pct interest in the western portion of Graven block of
the Terra Nova field and a 26 pct interest in the field's East
Flank block, a company spokesman said later. Other field
participants include Canterra Energy Ltd, Mobil Oil Canada Ltd,
Gulf Canada Resources Inc, ICG Resources Ltd, Trillium
Exploration Corp and general partnership PAREX.
    Petro-Canada estimates reserves in the Terra Nova field's
Graven block of between 68 mln and 70 mln barrels of oil,
company spokesman Bob Foulkes said from Petro-Canada's Calgary
office.
    Combined reserves for Graven Block and the field's East
Flank block are estimated between 70 mln and 130 mln barrels,
he added.
    Petro-Canada expects to spend about 500 mln Canadian dlrs
to bring the field to production by about 1991, and the
development budget could double if the company builds a
production system combining both blocks in the field, he said.
    Petro-Canada estimates the Terra Nova field Graven block
would produce between 25,000 and 26,000 barrels average daily
production, with a production system that would have maximum
capacity of 40,000 bpd, company spokesman Foulkes said in
answer to a query.
    The company estimates a production system combining both
Graven and East Flank blocks in the Terra Nova field could
produce about 45,000 bpd average daily production, he said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3145>
Ranger Oil Ltd said it
completed on March 2 the previously announced sale of its U.S.
oil and gas properties held by subsidiaries Ranger Oil Co and
Ranger Inc to Ampol Exploration Ltd, of Australia, for 18.5 mln
U.S. dlrs.
    Ranger said that under the deal, it would retain a five pct
gross overriding royalty on its stake from blocks east cameron
65 and 82 in the Gulf of Mexico offshore Lousiana.
    It said the sale did not include U.S. properties acquired
from &lt;Berkeley Exploration and Production PLC> last December.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3169>
Hamilton Oil Corp said reserves at the
end of 1986 were 59.8 mln barrels of oil and 905.5 billion
cubic feet of natural gas, or 211 mln barrels equivalent, up 10
mln equivalent barrels from a year before.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3174>
Graham-McCormick Oil and Gas
Partnership said it completed the sale of interests in two
major oil and gas fields to &lt;Energy Assets International Corp>
for 21 mln dlrs.
    The company said it sold about one-half of its 50 pct
interest in the Oak Hill and North Rucias fields, its two
largest producing properties.
    It said it used about 20 mln dlrs of the proceeds to prepay
principal on its senior secured notes. Semi-annual principal
payments on the remaining 40 mln dlrs of notes have been
satisfied until December 1988 as a result, it said.
    The company said the note agreements were amended to
reflect an easing of some financial covenants, and an increase
of interest to 13.5 pct from 13.0 pct until December 1990.
    It said the noteholders exercise price for 1,125,000
warrants was also reduced to 50 cts from 1.50 dlrs.
    The company said Energy Assets agreed to share the costs of
increasing production at the Oak Hill field.

 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3189>
Shell Canada, a wholly owned subsidiary
of the Royal Dutch/Shell Group &lt;RD> said that it raised crude
oil prices by about 47 Canadian cts a barrel today.
    The increase riased its posted price for Light sweet crude
oil to 21.95 dlrs a barrel from its march one level.
    Light sour crudes were raised to 19.95 dlrs a barrel, the
company said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3204>
White House spokesman Marlin
Fitzwater said President Reagan's record in opposing tax hikes
is "long and strong" and not about to change.
    "We're opposed to tax increases.... We will fight tax
increases.... We will deal with it politically in every forum
possible," said Fitzwater when questioned about whether there
was any change in the administration's position.
    Fitzwater said Reagan's strong feelings against a tax hike
included opposition to an oil import fee.
    "The President's position is that he is opposed to it," he
said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3303>
Petro-Canada, the state-owned oil
company, said it raised the contract price it will pay for
crude oil 64 Canadian cts a barrel, effective March six.
    Petro-Canada's posted price for the benchmark light sweet
grade, Edmonton/Swann Hills at 40 api gravity, now stands at
21.95 Canadian dlrs/bbl. Their light sour grade is posted at
19.88 Canadian dlrs/bbl.
    Earlier today, Shell Canada &lt;SHC> said it raised its crude
postings about 47 Canadian cts/bbl, bringing Edmonton light
sweet to 21.95 Canadian dlrs/bbl, and the light sour crude to
19.95 Canadian dlrs/bbl.
    Imperial oil &lt;IMO.A>, a 70 pct owned subsidiary of Exxon
Corp, said that effective March five it also raised its light
sweet crude posting to 21.95 Canadian dlrs/bbl.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3332>
up to 300 people were feared dead and more
than 15,000 people left homeless by thursday's earthquake,
which will cost Ecuador close to 800 mln dlrs in lost petroleum
revenues, authorities said.
    They estimated the cost of repairing a damaged oil pipeline
at 150 mln dlrs.
    "the magnitude of the damages caused by the earthquake is
gigantic," president leon febres cordero said after inspecting
the damages in napo, the hardest-hit jungle province, 100 miles
from here.
    The quake damaged 40 km of an oil pipeline, forcing this
opec nation to suspend crude exports for four months, president
febres cordero said in a statement issued today by the
presidential press office.
    The country would lose an estimated 800 mln dlrs in crude
exports until the pipeline was repaired, the president said. It
would cost 150 mln dlrs to repair the pipelline which carries
oil from jungle oil fields over the andes to Balao, a pacific
ocean port.
    Crude traditionally accounts for up to two-thirds of
ecuador's exports.
    the quake triggered landslides, swelling the aguarico river
which burst it banks carrying away homes and huts in napo
province, health minister jorge brancho told reuters.
    "we fear that up to 300 people died in napo though there is
no way of now knowing the exact figure because many people have
disappeared," he said.
    Other estimates ranged as high as 500 dead.
    So far 20 corpses have been recovered, bracho said.
    Information Minister Marco Lara told reporters: "the number
of dead and injured is not known ... because we do not know how
many people lived in the homes hit by the landslides."
    Bracho said at least 15,000 were left homeless in the
cayambe district.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3342>
Marathon Petroleum Company, a
subsidiary of USX Corp &lt;X>, said it raised the contract price
it pays for three grades of crude oil, effective March 6.
    Illinois Sweet and Indiana Sweet are both being raised 50
cts a barrel to 16.75 dlrs/bbl, and the Southern Michigan grade
is being raised 25 cts/bbl, also to 16.75 dlrs a bbl.
    The West Texas Intermediate grade was unchanged.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3364>
American Petroleum Institute President
Charles DiBona said no options should be rejected to combat 
growing U.S. dependence on foreign oil.
    "No action should be ruled out--import fees or quotas,
floor prices, tax incentives or other alternatives--while a
national dialogue on the issue continues," DiBona said at a 
paper institute conference in New York today.
    DiBona said there is no unanimity within the industry on
how to stimulate energy production but there is consensus on
removing several government policies that hinder investments in
new prospects.
    DiBona said the windfall profit tax should be abolished
immediately and current proposals for increased environmental
regulations on acid rain and waste disposal should be not
adopted. He also suggested that the Arctic National Wildlife
Refuge in Alaska should be opened up for leasing to oil
companies, DiBona said.
    "This is a battle the industry cannot afford to lose if the
nation is to continue to benefit from Alaskan oil," DiBona
said. Since 1986 U.S. oil production has fallen while
consumption rose and that has raised dependence on imported
oil, particularly from OPEC, DiBona said.
   
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3389>
Conoco Inc, a subsidiary of DuPont
Corp, said it was increasing its contract prices for crude oil
between 10 cts and one dlr a barrel, effective today.
    Conoco said the increase brings its price for the U.S.
benchmark crude West Texas Intermediate to 17.50 dlrs a barrel,
up one dlr.
    South Louisiana Sweet, also up one dlr, is now 17.85 dlrs.
West Texas Sour was up 10 cts to 16.60 dlrs a barrel.
    Conoco was the last company to raise prices following a
series of increases initiated last week by Sun Co &lt;SUN>, which
reversed the posted price cuts made at the end of February.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3430>
T. Boone Pickens, the Texas oilman and
financier, said he believes the heady days the oil service
industry had in the early 1980s, when over 4,500 oil rigs were
once reported operating, will not return in his lifetime.
     Pickens told Reuters he expects the rig count to drop to
below 600 before recovering. He added that oil prices will
eventually rise to 35 dlrs, then to 50 dlrs after 1990.
     Currently, some 700 oil rigs are operating in the U.S.,
down sharply after oil prices slipped from 30 dlrs in late 1985
to around 10 dlrs in 1986. Prices are now around 18 dlrs. The
highest number of working rigs was 4,500 in December 1981.
     "The rigs won't go back to work until the price of oil
gets above 30 dlrs," he said, adding that while he expects to
see 50 dlr a barrel oil, he does not expect to see 2,000 rigs
operating in his lifetime. Pickens is 58.
     Pickens, who is currently touring the country promoting
his autobiography "Boone," said he does not believe the U.S.
should impose an oil import fee in order to stimulate the
domestic oil industry.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3452>
Iranian Oil Minister Gholamreza
Aqazadeh is in the United Arab Emirates (UAE) to discuss oil
prices and the general market situation, Iranian officials
accompanying him said.
    He will meet UAE President Sheikh Zaid bin Sultan
al-Nahayan and Oil Minister Mana Said al-Oteiba.
    Aqazadeh arrived last night after a brief stopover in
Riyadh, where he met Saudi Arabia's Oil Minister Hisham Nazir.
    The official Saudi Press Agency quoted him as saying his
talks at Riyadh with Nazir had been constructive and good.
    Aqazadeh said Organisation of Petroleum Exporting Countries
(OPEC) members were agreed on holding production stable and he
reiterated the importance of maintaining oil prices.
    OPEC members agreed in December to limit production to 15.8
mln barrels per day for the first half of this year and on a
benchmark price of 18 dlrs a barrel from February 1.
    Aqazadeh also visted OPEC members Gabon, Algeria and Libya.
The Iranian news agency, IRNA, quoted him as saying before
leaving Tripoli that OPEC should do everything possible to make
oil prices permanently stable.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3455>
King Fahd said today Saudi Arabia wants
oil price stability and he called on non-OPEC producers to
avoid harmful competition with the 13 nation group.
    His plea, in an interview with Reuters and the television
news agency Visnews, came ahead of a state visit he will make
to Britain later this month.
    King Fahd was asked whether Saudi Arabia would be prepared
to reduce its oil output below its OPEC quota of 4.133 mln
barrels per day (bpd) to defend the 18 dlr benchmark price
agreed to by OPEC last December.
    The King replied: "Saudi Arabia doesn't decide prices by
itself but certainly desires price stability."
    Non-OPEC countries "must help us in a framework of common
interest so that there is no type of competition which could
prove harmful to everyone," he said.
    Asked if he saw the 18 dlr per barrel benchmark as a first
step towards higher world oil prices, King Fahd said it was not
for Saudi Arabia but for all OPEC countries to determine such
issues. Iran and Algeria have already called for a higher
benchmark.
    In recent weeks the 18 dlr level has come under pressure,
due partly to quota violations by some OPEC members. King Fahd
said Saudi Arabia, the world's largest oil exporter, was
adhering to decisions made at OPEC's December conference which
set a 15.8 mln bpd output ceiling for the first half of 1987.
    A major non-OPEC producer, Britain has so far resisted the
group's pleas to curb its North Sea oil output.
    The King also urged the world community to help the
Palestinians return to their homeland and called for a peaceful
end to the Iran-Iraq war. The 6-1/2-year-old war could not be
resolved on the battlefield, he said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3507>
Foreign oil companies will spend less
on exploration in Indonesia this year than last, budgeting 2.7
billion dlrs for calendar 1987 against 1986 spending of 2.8
billion dlrs, the state oil company Pertamina said.
    Actual spending last year fell short of the budgeted figure
of 3.2 billion dlrs, as oil companies slashed expenditure
because of the crash in world oil prices.
    Jumardi Jukardi, head of Pertamina's coordinating board for
foreign contractors, said foreign companies will drill 110
exploration wells and 431 development wells this year, against
108 and 330 last year.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3509>
Negotiations between Indonesia's state
oil company Pertamina and foreign oil contractors on extension
of the standard 30-year production sharing contract will be
concluded by the end of this month, a Pertamina official said.
    Jumardi Jukardi, head of Pertamina's foreign contractors
coordinating board, gave no details about the outcome of the
talks.
    But Pertamina President Abdul Rachman Ramly has said
priority will be given to extending contracts for companies
whose exploration and production contracts expire within the
next seven to 10 years.
    Jukardi, speaking to Indonesian reporters, said the
negotiations would determine whether the 85-15 production
sharing split in favour of Pertamina would be adhered to or
altered in some cases as oil companies are asking for.
    Hardjoko Seputro, spokesman for the Mines and Energy
Ministry, has said that President Suharto has agreed in
principle to extension of the standard 30-year production
sharing contract to reflect better current depressed conditions
on the international oil market.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3556>
Ecuador needs 120 mln dlrs to repair the
damage to its oil export pipeline caused by last week"s
earthquake, which will stop crude exports for five months,
energy and mines minister Javier Espinosa Teran said.
    Espinosa said yesterday the pipeline, which carries crude
from jungle fields to the Pacific Ocean coast of Balao, would
be repaired with the help of Texaco Inc &lt;TX.N> and a Mexican
and an Argentine firm.
    President Leon Febres Cordero said two days ago that
Ecuador, an OPEC member, would have to suspend crude exports
for four months due to the quake.
    Oil traditionally accounts for up to two-thirds of
Ecuador's total exports and as much as 60 pct of government
revenues.
    Deputy energy minister Fernando Santos Alvite said Ecuador
would have to import six to seven mln barrels of crude oil to
meet its needs until the line was repaired.
    The Ecuadorean minister at the Presidency, Patricio
Quevedo, told reporters that Venezuela will lend Ecuador five
mln barrels of crude, which would repaid in kind after a
180-day period.
    He added the Caracas-based Andean Development Corp had
granted a loan of 11.7 mln dlrs towards repairing the pipeline,
50 km of which had been damaged in the quake.
    In Quito, Foreign Minister Rafael Garcia Velasco yesterday
summoned ambassadors from about 40 countries to whom he issued
appeal for emergency aid for the country. Only three countries,
the U.S., Colombia and Venezuela, had offered assistance.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3563>
The oil services industry is on the
verge of a recovery because of rising crude prices, oil
industry analysts said.
    The analysts, who issued buy recommendations on some
stocks, said the recovery in oil services should begin in the
second half of 1987, after drilling activity bottoms out in the
first half, and continue into the next decade.
     "People, however, cannot afford to wait for drilling to go
up to start buying," said Sandi Haber Sweeney, senior research
analyst at Sanford C. Bernstein and Co Inc.
    Among the recommended buys are Schlumberger Ltd &lt;SLB>,
Halliburton Co &lt;HAL>, Dresser Industries &lt;DI>, Baker
International &lt;BKO>, and McDermott International Inc &lt;MDR>,
which may be the target of a takeover by Harold Simmons, a
Dallas-based investor.
    Analysts said although major oil companies are increasing
exploration and development overseas, they expect the pickup in
oil services will begin in the U.S.
    "Activity in the U.S. is so depressed it should move up
faster," said Vishnu Sharp of Goldman Sachs.
    The number of active oil drilling rigs in the U.S. was 766
last week compared with 1,212 rigs one year ago, Huges Tool Co
&lt;HT> figures show.
    The average number of working rigs in the U.S. for 1987 is
projected at 978 versus 964 in 1986, according to Ike Kerridge,
vice president of stockholder relations at Hughes Tool. "The
first significant pickup in drilling activity will occur in the
second half of 1988," Kerridge said.
    Overseas drilling activity is expected to follow a similar
pattern, Kerridge said.
    "Halliburton is the best value," said Jeffrey Freedman,
vice president at Smith Barney, Harris and Upham Inc, adding
the company controls the greatest amount of liquidity of common
stock market value, is diversifed in non-oil field businesess,
and has the lowest multiple of stock price to operating cash
flow including debt.
    Schlumberger is Freedman's second favorite oil service
stock.
    "Schlumberger is expected to continue to be the dominant
technical leader in the industry," Freedman said.
    "Schlumberger's management shift, asset restructuring,
including a pending merger of Fairchild Semiconductor, and its
considerable cash horde sets the stage for the company to
maximize its significant industry advantage and capitalize on
the project upturn in exploration and development activity,"
according to a report by George Gaspar, first vice president at
Robert W. Baird and Co Inc.
    Gaspar estimates earnings per share for Schlumberger at 25
cts for 1987 and one to 1.75 dlrs in 1988 compared with 20 cts
in 1986 excluding a fourth quarter special charge of 1.87
billion dlrs.
    Bernstein's Sandi Sweeney is recommending a group of oil
service companies and said choosing among them is difficult.
Her favorite is Baker International, which is involved in a
possible merger with Hughes Tool Co.
    Dresser Industries will also benefit from the recovery but
possibly not as much as other companies because it is not a
pure service company, Sweeney said.
    Dresser is expected to improve profitability owing to cost
reductions and streamlined operations, including the sale and
leaseback of its headquarters, said Swarup.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3571>
OPEC has reaffirmed its commitment to
fixed crude oil prices of around 18 dlrs a barrel and an
overall output ceiling of 15.8 mln barrels per day (bpd) to
defend prices, its president Rilwanu Lukman said.
    He told a news conference here "After due consultation with
my colleagues in OPEC, I hereby wish to emphasize that Nigeria
and all member countries of OPEC remain determined to uphold
the December agreement by adhering strictly to their various
quotas and official selling prices."
    Lukman added no extraordinary OPEC conference was planned.
    "We are in a position to re-confirm that, despite misleading
news in foreign media to the contrary, ... OPEC member
countries as a whole produced below their agreed quota in the
month of February," Lukman, who is Nigerian oil minister, said.
    Lukman put the overall OPEC output shortfall in February at
900,000 bpd and said this was as a result of their firm
determination to defend official selling prices of 18 dlrs
agreed upon last December in Geneva.
    The December agreement set an overall output ceiling for
OPEC of 15.8 mln bpd for first half 1987 and restored fixed
prices as from February 1 around a reference point of 18 dlrs.
    Oil prices rallied immediately after the Geneva accord but
fell again last month on reports that OPEC was producing more
than the agreed level.
    "The idea was to suggest that OPEC's agreement would not
hold and this caused some customers to hold back purchases of
OPEC oil and resort to destocking to meet their needs," Lukman
said.
    He said the 900,000 bpd shortfall last February was based
on the verified figure for 10 out of OPEC's 13 members, adding
that Nigeria alone had a shortfall in production of 100,000
bpd.
    Iraq disassociated itself from the December agreement,
while the production figures of Ecuador and the United Arab
Emirates needed to be verified, Lukman said.
    "If that is the price we have to pay to make the agreement
succeed, we are ready ... OPEC is not changing its price level
of 18 dlrs," the group's president said.
    He said the OPEC price differentials committee meeting
formerly postponed to April had been put off indefinitely.
    "Furthermore, no extraordinary meeting of the conference is
at the moment contemplated since most agreements reached in
December are being adhered to," he said.
    Asked if the committee did not need to meet soon to narrow
the gaps in the prices of the various OPEC crudes -- fixed in
relation to the 18 dlr benchmark -- Lukman replied "We consider
the defence of our prices much more crucial than differentials."
    Lukman said OPEC was aware that consumers had heavily drawn
on stocks of both crude oil and refined products to levels well
below this time last year and soon they would return to the
market in search of crude.
    "We don't see that there is going to be any difficulty in
maintaining the 18 dlr price throughout the rest of the year,"
Lukman said.
    The OPEC president praised non-OPEC oil producers, which he
said had contributed to the group's efforts to stabilise
prices, but he criticised Britain for maintaining its long-held
view not to do anything to help the market.
    "We are quite confident, however, that in the long-term with
two-thirds of the world's reserves in OPEC hands, the future is
ours. We will use that advantage responsibly," he said.
    Lukman described the disruption in Ecuador's output
following an earthquake as tragic, but refused to say if the
South American country would be allowed a higher output quota
when it recovered from the disaster.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3592>
Triton Energy Corp said its 70 pct owned
&lt;Canadian Worldwide Energy Ltd> affiliate's Lasmo et al
Tableland 4-36-2-10W2 well in Saskatchewan flowed 567 barrels
of 37 degree gravity oil through a 17/64 inch choke from depths
of 8,531 to 8,548 feet and 636 barrels of oil per day through a
20/64 inch choke from depths of 8,500 to 8,507 feet.
    Triton said because of the well's status as a deep
exploratory well, production qualifies for a five-year royalty
holiday under the Saskatchewan drilling incentive products.
    It said the well's initial production is expected to be
restricted to an allowable level of about 300 barrels a day,
although it is capable of sustaining much higher rates.
    The company said London and Scottish Marine Oil PLC owns a
50 pct interest in the well and its spacing unit, Canadian
Worldwide 25 pct, &lt;Saskatchewan Oil and Gas Corp> 10 pct,
&lt;Interprovincial Pipeline Ltd's> Home Oil Co Ltd 7.5 pct and
Scurry-Rainbow Oil Ltd &lt;SRB> 7.5 pct.
    Triton said Royal Dutch/Shell Group's &lt;RD> &lt;SC> Shell
Canada Ltd &lt;SHC> affiliate retains a convertible overriding
interest in the well.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3594>
Ecuador's deputy energy minister
Fernando Santos Alvite arrived here last night for talks on
further Venezuelan assistance to his country's oil industry
following last week's earthquake, officials said.
    Ecuador was obliged to suspend crude oil exports for an
expected five months as a result of damage to 25 miles of
pipeline linking its jungle oil fields with the Pacific port of
Balao. Oil normally accounts for 60 pct of its exports.
    Fellow OPEC member Venezuela has already agreed to lend
Ecuador five mln barrels of crude, to be repaid in kind after
180 days, to help meet its domestic consumption needs.
    The officials could neither confirm nor deny reports that
Venezuela will temporarily produce Ecuador's entire OPEC quota,
set at 210,000 barrels per day for first half 1987.
    "All options are open at this moment in the context of
cooperation on oil production," a Venezuelan energy and mines
ministry source said.
    Discussions are also under way to arrive at a formula to
compensate Ecuador for the loss in oil export revenue while the
pipeline is repaired, officials said.
    Santos Alvite last night met Venezuelan energy and mines
minister Arturo Hernandez Grisanti and will today hold talks at
technical level, officials said.
    Industry sources said that among the options are for
Venezuela to produce Ecuador's entire quota, or for Venezuela
and non-OPEC Mexico to share it and for the latter to supply
Ecuador's Far Eastern clients.
    But the ministry source said that no decision has yet been
reached on the matter, and that an announcement would be made
in due course.
    Santos Alvite said earlier in Quito that Ecuador would have
to import six to seven mln barrels of crude oil to meet its
needs until the line was repaired.
    Ecuador energy and mines minister Javier Espinosa Teran
said last night his country needs 120 mln dlrs to repair the
damage to the export pipeline caused by the earthquake.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3609>
Ecuador's deputy energy minister
Fernando Santos Alvite arrived here last night for talks on
further Venezuelan assistance to his country's oil industry
following last week's earthquake, officials said.
    Ecuador was obliged to suspend crude oil exports for an
expected five months as a result of damage to 25 miles of
pipeline linking its jungle oil fields with the Pacific port of
Balao. Oil normally accounts for 60 pct of its exports.
    Fellow OPEC member Venezuela has already agreed to lend
Ecuador five mln barrels of crude, to be repaid in kind after
180 days, to help meet its domestic consumption needs.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3798>
Lured by the weakening dollar and the
conviction that oil prices are poised for a rebound, European
energy companies are buying up cheap U.S. oil and gas reserves
to replenish their supplies, oil industry analysts said.
    They said owning oil reserves in a politically stable
United States is good insurance against future shortages.
However, the quick pace of foreign investment has heated up
competition among European firms, well-heeled U.S.
institutional investors and major oil companies to snare choice
domestic oil properties.
    Strevig and Associates, a Houston firm that tracks oil and
gas reserve sales, said growing interest among foreign buyers
had helped push reserve prices in recent months higher. All
buyers of U.S. reserves paid a median price of 6.45 dlrs a
barrel of oil during the fourth quarter of 1986 for
acquisitions, up from 5.33 dlrs in the third quarter and five
dlrs in the second quarter, according to the firm's research.
    "Foreign investors have been here nibbling a long time, but
we're seeing new names and smaller companies coming in," said
Arthur Smith, an oil property appraisal specialist and
president of John S. Herold Inc in Greenwich, Conn.
    "Europeans, especially, do not have much indigenous oil and
gas and realize the tide will eventually turn in favor of the
Organization of Petroleum Exporting Countries," he added.
    Smith and other oil industry analyst and economists believe
the trend in foreign investments will continue in 1987 because
of the fall in value of the U.S. dollar, the perception that
oil prices have hit bottom and the fact that it is cheaper to
buy new reserves than to explore for them.
    Plenty of properties are available on the market, thanks to
the need of many companies to raise cash for debt payments and
general restructuring throughout the oilpatch.
    In two of the biggest transactions of recent months,
French-owned Minatome Corp., a unit of &lt;Total Compagnie
Francaise des Petroles>, spent more than 230 mln dlrs to
separately acquire oil assets of Texas International &lt;TEICC>
and Lear Petroleum Partners &lt;LPP>. A spokesman for Minatome
said the company is searching for additional acquisitions.
    A partnership of two Belgian-owned firms, &lt;Petrofina S.A.>
and &lt;Cometra Oil S.A.> paid 150 mln dlrs late last year to buy
virtually all the exploration assets of the Williams Cos &lt;WMB>,
the Oklahoma pipeline firm.
    But Japanese investors prefer entering into joint ventures
with experienced U.S. companies to explore for new oil. Japan's
&lt;Nippon Oil> is a partner of Texaco Inc's &lt;TX> Texaco USA in a
100 mln dlrs U.S. drilling program, and has joined with
Dupont's &lt;DD> Conoco Inc in a similar 135 dlrs mln deal.
    Most buyers said the pay-back period of a property, its
geographic location and the lifting cost of the crude oil are
more important factors in evaluating potential acquisitions
than relying on a simple price-per-barrel formula.
    Rich Hodges, a Houston-based land manager representing
International Oil and Gas Corp, a partnership of &lt;Preussag
Corp> and &lt;C. Deilmann Inc> of West Germany, said the firm had
earmarked at least 50 mln dlrs to spend on oil reserves in
Texas, Oklahoma or Louisiana in the coming months.
    But he called that a small amount compared to the amount
other investors have for acquisitions. PaineWebber's Geodyne
Energy Income Fund, for example, has said it plans to spend up
to 300 mln dlrs on oil and gas properties.
    "The competition is stiff, not only from other foreign
investors but from the brokerage houses and U.S. oil
companies," he said. "Our company is shopping around because we
feel it's substantially less risky than pure exploration. If
you're going to take the risk inherent in exploration, you need
prices higher than the current market," he added.
    In addition to the foreign investors and U.S. brokerage
houses, analysts said many of the major oil companies were also
competing for prime properties.
    Houston-based Shell Oil Co, a unit of Royal Dutch/Shell Group
&lt;RD>, has been one of the most active companies in buying and
selling reserves, Smith said. Since 1982, Shell has acquired
two billion dlrs in new reserves, including 470 mln barrels of
oil equivalent at a net cost of 2.80 dlrs a barrel, he said.
    "Buying reserves is a good strategy for most of these
companies," Smith said. "Domestic production has dropped by one
mln barrels a day because of cutbacks in drilling and it may
drop by another one mln barrels a day in 1988."
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3843>
A two-year project to search for oil and
gas in Jordan was agreed in Amman by Jordan's Natural Resources
Authority (NRA) and the Canadian company, Petrocanada
International Assistance Corporation (PCIAC).
    The 19.1 mln dlr assistance agreement was signed by
Jordan's Minister of Energy Hisham al-Khatib and PCIAC chairman
Peter M. Towe.
    PCIAC is a Canadian government corporation providing
assistance to countries like Jordan to reduce their dependence
on oil imports, Towe said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3869>
With troops in place in Brazil's
ports and oil installations, the government of Prersident Jose
Sarney today sought to end a wave of labour unrest by a show of
force.
    Yesterday the government sent thousands of troops supported
in some instances by tanks to occupy nine oil refineries and
six areas of oil production.
    The state-oil company Petrobras requested the intervention
because of a threatened strike by 55,000 oil industry
employees.
    The government had already dispatched more than 1,000
marines to occupy the country's main ports after a national
seamen's strike was ruled illegal last Friday.
    The strike by 40,000 seamen, now in its 13th day,
represents a stern challenge to the government.
    The stoppage has delayed exports at a time when Brazil
desperately needs foreign exchange.
    It was a deterioration in the country's trade balance which
precipitated Brazil's current debt crisis and the decision on
February 20 to suspend interest payments on 68 billion dlrs of
commercial debt.
    There was no sign today of an early end to the seamen's
strike, which has badly hit the port of Santos -- the most
important in South America -- and the country's other main
ports.
    Small groups of marines armed with submachineguns stand on
the quays near the strike-bound ships, but the military
presence here is generally discreet.
    A total of 800 marines are inside the docks but most are
out of sight.
    Yesterday marines and police occupied one ship, the
Docemarte, seamen's leaders said. After explaining to the
captain that the strikers faced up to one year in jail because
the strike was illegal, the men returned to work.
    One of the strike leaders, Elmano Barbosa, said "it is a
psychological war. They are using force and we are using
peaceful methods."
    Port sources said only two Brazilian ships in Santos, the
Docemarte and the Henrique Leal, were working.
    At the seamen's national strike headquarters in Rio de
Janeiro, spokesmen say a total of about 190 ships are
strike-bound in Brazil and in foreign ports.
    Contradicting earlier reports from strike headquarters in
Rio de Janeiro, seamen in Santos said the strikers on board
ships here were not running out of food.
    The current labour unrest is the worst faced by Sarney's
civilian government since it came to power two years ago.
    Yesterday, in a separate protest, hundreds of thousands of
farmers held rallies directed largely against high bank
interest rates.
    The current rash of labour unrest in industry and
agriculture stems from the failure of the government's
now-collapsed Cruzado Plan price freeze.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3906>
the council of ministers approved
petroleos de venezuela's planned purchase of a half interest in
the champlin petroleum refinery at corpus christi, texas,
government sources said.
    The cabinet authorized energy and mines minister arturo
hernandez grisanti to approve the purchase in the shareholders
assembly of the state oil company petroleos de venezuela
(pdvsa).
    Pdvsa last april 14 signed a letter of intent to buy a half
interest in champlin's corpus christi refinery for an
undisclosed sum.
    Under the terms of the provisional agreement, venezuela
would supply up to 160,000 barrels a day to the plant through a
new company which would be jointly owned by the pdvsa and
champlin, a subsidiary of the union pacific corp &lt;unp>.
    The deal would also allow pdvsa a joint share in champlin's
refinery and distribution network.
    The purhcase is one of a series of overseas joint ventures
by which venezuela has managed to assure markets for some
400,000 barrels of its approximately 1.5 mln bpd exports.
    Hernandez grisanti told reporters after the cabinet meeting
that pdvsa will pay 93 mln dlrs for its half ownership in the
champlin refinery - 33 mln dlrs in cash and 60 mln dlrs crude
oil and products.
    Through the deal, he said, venezuela will be assured the
sale of at least 140,000 bpd of crude and products.
    Hernandez said pdsva has entered similar joint ventures
with veba oel of west germany, nynas petroelum in sweden, and
citgo in the united states.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3980>
Distillate fuel stocks held in
primary storage fell by 8.8 mln barrels in the week ended March
six to 119.6 mln barrels, the Energy Information Administration
(EIA) said.
    In its weekly petroleum status report, the Department of
Energy agency said gasoline stocks were off 500,000 barrels in
the week to 251.0 mln barrels and refinery crude oil stocks
fell 1.2 mln barrels to 331.8 mln.
    The EIA said residual fuel stocks fell 1.5 mln barrels to
36.4 mln barrels and crude oil stocks in the Strategic
Petroleum Reserve (SPR) rose 200,000 barrels to 516.7 mln.
    The total of all crude, refined product and SPR stocks fell
10.3 mln barrels to 1,564.8, it said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3985>
USX's subsidiary, Marathon Petroleum
Co, said it will raise its contract prices for eleven grades of
crude oil 50 cts a barrel, effective tomorrow.
    The increase brings Marathon's posted price for West Texas
Intermediate and West Texas Sour grades to 17.50 dlrs a barrel.
    The Light Louisiana grade was also raised 50 cts to 17.85
dlrs a barrel.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3995>
U.S. oil demand as measured by
products supplied rose 1.9 pct in the four weeks ended March
six to 16.39 mln barrels per day from 16.08 mln in the same
period a year ago, the Energy Information Administration (EIA)
said.
    In its weekly petroleum status report, the Energy
Department agency said distillate demand was down 2.2 pct in
the period to 3.33 mln bpd from 3.40 mln a year earlier.
    Gasoline demand averaged 6.75 mln bpd, up 3.3 pct from 6.53
mln last year, while residual fuel demand was 1.40 mln bpd, off
2.7 pct from 1.43 mln, the EIA said.
    Domestic crude oil production was estimated at 8.38 mln
bpd, down 8.5 pct from 9.15 mln a year ago, and gross daily
crude imports (excluding those for the SPR) averaged 3.67 mln
bpd, up 23 pct from 2.97 mln, the EIA said.
    Refinery crude runs in the four weeks were 12.05 mln bpd,
up 1.5 pct from 11.87 mln a year earlier, it said.
    Year-to-date figures will not become available until March
26 when EIA's Petroleum Supply Monthly data for January 1987
becomes available, the agency said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4016>
USX Corp said proved reserves of oil
and natural gas liquids fell 28 pct to 802.8 mln barrels at the
end of 1986 from 1.12 billion barrels at year-end 1985.
    The figures, in USX's just-released 1986 annual report,
indicate much of the drop resulted from the exclusion of 293.7
mln barrels of Libyan reserves, after the U.S. government last
June directed U.S. oil companies to end Libyan operations.
    USX, which owns Marathon Oil Co and Texas Oil and Gas Corp,
had 60 pct of its 1986 sales of 14.94 billion dlrs from its oil
and gas operations.
    About 24 pct of total sales came from USX's USS steel unit
and 16 pct from diversified businesses, which include oilfield
services, raw materials, minerals, chemicals and real estate.
    According to the report, domestic liquids reserves fell
slightly to 628.5 mln barrels from 628.9 mln and foreign
reserves fell to 174.3 mln from 486.4 mln barrels. The large
drop in foreign reserves was in the Middle East and Africa,
where they fell to about 9.3 mln barrels from 316.7 mln,
reflecting the exclusion of Libya.
    Total natural gas reserves fell to 4.82 trillion cubic feet
at year-end 1986 from 5.18 trillion at the end of 1985.
    Again, most of the drop came from the Middle East and
Africa, where reserves fell to zero from 71.9 billion cubic
feet, excluding Libyan reserves.
    U.S. natural gas reserves fell to 3.44 trillion cubic feet
from 3.65 trillion and foreign reserves fell to 1.38 trillion
from 1.53 trillion.
    In other areas, USX said total capital spending fell to 962
mln dlrs in 1986 from 1.78 billion dlrs in 1985. The 1986
audited figure is eight mln dlrs higher than the unaudited
figure the company reported on Jan 27.
    USX also said it expects to record a gain of 150 mln dlrs
in 1988, representing 50 pct of previously existing investment
tax credits allowable under the new tax law. The loss of the
other half of the credits was reflected in the fourth quarter.
    In a discussion of steel results, USX said plants that were
shut down last month and some previously idled plants may be
permanently closed. USX took a fourth quarter charge of 1.03
billion dlrs to restructure its steel operations. The charge
included the "indefinite idling" last month of four plants in
Utah, Pennsylvania and Texas.
    Other plants or parts of plants in Pennsylvania, Indiana,
Alabama, Ohio and Chicago had been previously idled.
    "These operations are not permanently shut down. Improved
market conditions for the products from these plants may make
it feasible to reopen some of them," USX said in the report.
    "On the other hand, a lack of any future market improvement
may necessitate their permanent closing," it added.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4028>
venezuela will supply ecuador with an
as yet undetermined amount of crude oil to help it meet export
commitments, seriously affected by last week's earthquake,
energy and mines minister arturo hernandez grisanti said.
    He gave few details about the deal, but said a crude oil
loan agreement will be made between state oil companies
petroleos de venezuela (pdvsa) and ecuador's cepe.
    Ecuador was forced to suspend oil exports for an expected
four months after an earthquake damaged a pipeline. Oil
accounts for 60 per cent of its export income.
     Hernandez was speaking to reporters at miraflores palace
on the results of talks with ecuador's deputy energy minister
fernando santos alvite, who arrived here last night.
    "the volume lent to ecuador would be discounted from its
opec quota and would not affect venezuela's," he said. "we would
from august on produce our own quota and sell the additional
amounts that ecuador would be repaying us," he said.
    He did not elaborate on the quota arrangements but did say
ecuador would notify opec by telex that venezuela would be
lending it a certain amount over so many days.
    Venezuela's opec output quota is currently 1.495 million
barrels a day, and ecuador's has been set at 210,000 bpd.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4039>
Ecuador will ask OPEC to raise its oil
export quota by 100,000 barrels per day to 310,000 to
compensate for lost output due to last week's earthquake,
deputy Energy Minister Fernando Santos Alvite said.
    Santos Alvite, who arrived in Caracas last night to discuss
an aid plan for Ecuador, did not say when the Organisation of
Petroleum Exporting Countries (OPEC) would be approached.
    The additional output would be related to plans now under
discussion for Venezuela and Mexico to lend Ecuador crude while
it repairs a pipeline damaged by the quake.
    Earlier, Venezuelan Energy and Mines Minister Aturo
Hernandez Grisanti said his country would supply an unspecified
part of Ecuador's export commitments.
    But Santos Alvite told reporters he hoped a first cargo of
300,000 barrels could leave Maracaibo this weekend to supply
refineries near Guayaquil. He added Ecuador also wanted to make
up for 50,000 bpd it shipped to Caribbean destinations. Mexico
might supply Ecuador's South Korean market.
    Ecuador may be unable to export oil for up to five months
due to extensive damage to a 25 mile stretch of pipeline
linking jungle oilfields to the Pacific port of Balao.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4041>
China has closed the second round of
bidding by foreign firms for offshore oil exploration rights,
the China Daily has reported.
    It quoted a spokesman for the China National Offshore Oil
Corp (CNOOC) as saying China signed eight contracts with 15
foreign firms for blocks in the Pearl River mouth and south
Yellow Sea covering a total area of 44,913 sq km.
    Second round bidding began at the end of 1984 and only one
well has so far produced results -- Lufeng 13-1-1, 250 km
south-east of Shenzhen, with an output of 6,770 barrels a day.
The well was drilled by a group of Japanese companies.
    The spokesman added CNOOC was ready to enter into contracts
for offshore blocks before third round bidding began. He did
not say when this would be, but added the contracts would not
be bound by restrictions imposed during the second round.
    China has signed 36 oil contracts and agreements with 37
companies from 10 countries since 1979, when offshore
exploration was open to foreigners. Eleven contracts were
terminated after no oil was discovered.
    Foreign firms have invested 2.1 billion dlrs on offshore
China since 1979.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4125>
China has closed the second round of
bidding by foreign firms for offshore oil exploration rights,
the China Daily has reported.
    It quoted a spokesman for the China National Offshore Oil
Corp (CNOOC) as saying China signed eight contracts with 15
foreign firms for blocks in the Pearl River mouth and south
Yellow Sea covering a total area of 44,913 sq km.
    Second round bidding began at the end of 1984 and only one
well has so far produced results -- Lufeng 13-1-1, 250 km
south-east of Shenzhen, with an output of 6,770 barrels a day.
The well was drilled by a group of Japanese companies.
    The spokesman added CNOOC was ready to enter into contracts
for offshore blocks before third round bidding began. He did
not say when this would be, but added the contracts would not
be bound by restrictions imposed during the second round.
    China has signed 36 oil contracts and agreements with 37
companies from 10 countries since 1979, when offshore
exploration was open to foreigners. Eleven contracts were
terminated after no oil was discovered.
    Foreign firms have invested 2.1 billion dlrs on offshore
China since 1979.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4129>
Ecuador will ask OPEC to raise its oil
export quota by 100,000 barrels per day to 310,000 to
compensate for lost output due to last week's earthquake,
deputy Energy Minister Fernando Santos Alvite said.
    Santos Alvite, who arrived in Caracas last night to discuss
an aid plan for Ecuador, did not say when the Organisation of
Petroleum Exporting Countries (OPEC) would be approached.
    The additional output would be related to plans now under
discussion for Venezuela and Mexico to lend Ecuador crude while
it repairs a pipeline damaged by the quake.
    Earlier, Venezuelan Energy and Mines Minister Aturo
Hernandez Grisanti said his country would supply an unspecified
part of Ecuador's export commitments.
    But Santos Alvite told reporters he hoped a first cargo of
300,000 barrels could leave Maracaibo this weekend to supply
refineries near Guayaquil. He added Ecuador also wanted to make
up for 50,000 bpd it shipped to Caribbean destinations. Mexico
might supply Ecuador's South Korean market.
    Ecuador may be unable to export oil for up to five months
due to extensive damage to a 25 mile stretch of pipeline
linking jungle oilfields to the Pacific port of Balao.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4162>
Dune Resources Ltd said its oil
reserves increased 225 pct during 1986 while its natural gas
reserves were up six pct.
    The company said its proven oil reserves were estimated at
605,682 barrels on December 31, up from 186,655 barrels a year
earlier boosted by discoveries during the year put at 423,659
barrels.
    It said gas reserves rose to 8.8 mln cubic feet from 8.3
mln on Dec 31, 1985, as discoveries of nearly 1.3 mln cubic
feet were partialy offset by production of 287,391 cubic feet
and downward revisions of previous estimates totaling 491,694
cubic feet.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4171>
Iran attacked the Saudi Arabian
supertanker Arabian Sea off the United Arab Emirates last night
but the vessel was able to proceed after the incident, Lloyds
Shipping Intelligence reported.
    The 315,695-dwt Arabian Sea had set sail on Tuesday after
loading oil at the Saudi port of Ras Tannurah. Lloyds said the
attack occurred at about 2200 hrs local time (1800 GMT).
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4174>
Most Japanese companies have decided not
to renew term contracts to lift Iranian crude oil because spot
prices remain considerably lower than OPEC's official levels,
industry sources said.
    They said a cargo of the Mideast benchmark crude Dubai
traded yesterday at 16.50 dlrs a barrel, compared to its
official price of 17.42 dlrs.
    Only one Japanese company has renewed its term contract for
Iranian crude oil for the second quarter, the sources said.
    The sources said Japanese companies had been lifting a
total of about 185,000 barrels per day (bpd) of Iranian crude
under term contracts, but only one firm has agreed to lift in
the second quarter. It is lifting just 10,000 to 15,000 bpd.
    They said this move could inspire Iran to offer discounts
on cargoes loading in April, but the likelihood of discounts
depended largely on the levels of spot prices.
    "If the spot price of Dubai goes above 17.30 dlrs we would
probably buy Iranian crude at the official price," one Japanese
refiner said.
    "We don't intend to put pressure on them," he added.
    Buyers have little incentive to renew contracts to lift oil
at official OPEC prices while spot prices on all grades are
considerably lower, oil traders said.
    They said if spot prices move higher there will be no
problem finding OPEC crude to purchase at the official prices.
Qatar has chartered floating storage for its crude oil after
finding no buyers at official prices in March. The problem is
likely to recur in April, adding to that country's surplus.
    The traders added that Iraq had dissociated itself from
OPEC's December production agreement, while agreeing to the
fixed prices.
    But oil analysts said if OPEC keeps group output close to
its first-half 1987 ceiling of 15.8 mln bpd, supply and demand
would be balanced by the end of the second quarter.
    They also said if OPEC holds its official price structure
based on a reference price of 18 dlrs, spot price fluctuations
should be limited to a 16.50 to 17.20 dlrs range for Dubai and
a 17 to 18 dlrs range for the North Sea's Brent blend.
    One Japanese refiner said, "At the moment there's a lot of
pressure on OPEC, particularly on Qatar. But if they hold out
there will be no problem, and I'm beginning to trust their
ability."
    Nigerian oil minister and OPEC president Rilwanu Lukman
told a news conference in Lagos yesterday, "Nigeria and all
member countries of OPEC remain determined to uphold the
December agreement by adhering strictly to their various quotas
and official selling prices."
    He said OPEC believed consumers had drawn heavily on stocks
of both crude oil and refined products, reducing them to levels
well below this time last year. He said consumers would soon
return to the market in search of crude.
    A Japanese refiner said, "The European and U.S. Markets are
beginning to look better so OPEC might be quite lucky."
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4232>
Phillips Petroleum Co will emphasize
improving its short-term cash flow this year to pare its debt,
C.J. "Pete" Silas, chairman, told Reuters in an interview.
    "Our priority is to get cash flow increased from the assets
already installed," he said, but he declined to estimate annual
cash flow for 1987.
    Analysts estimate Phillips" cash flow at over one billion
dlrs for 1987, while long term debt, which resulted from
restructuring to find off corporate raiders in 1985, hovers
about 5.9 billion dlrs as of December 1986.
     Silas said Phillips hope to achieve its goal by raising
the capital expenditures budget to develop its oil and gas
properties.
    "We plan to develop the properties with short-term high cash
flow prospects," he said. He projected a capital expenditure
budget of 730 mln dlrs, up from the 1986 expenditure of 655 mln
dlrs.
    Nearly half of that will be spent on exploration and
production, and most of that will be spend overseas, Silas
said.
    "Phillips' top priority in 1987 will be to get the
waterflooding in Norway and jack up the (Ekofisk) oil fields to
improve our ability to extract oil and increase earnings," Silas
said.
     Phillips estimates that the project, which is expected to
cost 1.5 billion dlrs, will increase recovery by 170 mln gross
barrels of oil over a period of 24 years.
    Phillips is also pursue opportunities in China where Silas
said he was seeking "a modification of terms with the Chinese
government to make oil discoveries (in the offshore Xijang
fields) commercially viable."
    In the U.S. Silas said Phillips hopes to get the Point
Arguello, Calif., field started up by the fourth quarter. "We
expect to start up the first platform then," Silas said.
    But emphasis on short-term cash flow has also forced the
company to part with several oil and gas assets.
    Phillips sold its interests in the T-Block in the U.K.
North Sea and U.S. reserves totaling about 1.3 billion dlrs in
1986 as part of a two billion dlrs asset sales program that is
now completed, Silas said.
     "We sold high cost producing assets. They were not good
value for us but possibly so for someone else," Silas said.
    Silas said the 1986 assets sales will not affect earnings
for the company.
    "Everything we are doing is to manage our cash flow and we
are using that to manage our debt. Even the asset sales, while
regrettable, were necessary to reduce debt," Silas said.
    He said no asset sales are planned this year as long as oil
prices don't fall sharply lower and stay at lower levels  for
several months. "Then, everyone would be looking at sales (of
assets), and we're no different from the others," Silas said.
    In other areas, Silas looks for improved earnings from
Phillips chemical operations, which provided 299 mln dlrs in
earnings for 1986, up from 219 mln dlrs in 1985.
    "This was our second best year pushed by a good supply and
demand balance for products, low feedstocks and energy costs
for our operations," Silas said, "In 1987 we think the market's
supply and demand balance will be just as good but feedstock
and energy costs will rise due to price recovery."
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4246>
Saudi Arabian oil output has fallen to
its lowest level in more than a year, giving fresh evidence of
the kingdom's determination to keep oil prices at 18 dlrs a
barrel, as agreed by Opec last December, oil industry sources
said.
    They said Saudi output in the first eight days of March
averaged 2.6 mln barrels per day (bpd) including oil from the
neutral zone shared with Kuwait, compared to a February average
of 3.5 mln bpd.
    They said Saudi Arabia was also selling oil from its crude
oil stocks in tankers around the world, which OPEC says must be
counted towards a member's production quota. Saudi Arabia's
quota is 4.133 mln bpd.
    The lower production levels indicated Saudi Arabia, the
world"s largest oil exporter, was insisting on getting Opec
official prices, even at the cost of lower production, the
sources said.
    King Fahd reiterated yesterday, in an interview with
Reuters and the television news agency Visnews, the Saudi
commitment to OPEC's December pact to boost oil prices to an
average 18 dlrs.
    "Saudi Arabia is completely sticking to OPEC decisions," he
said.
    The sources said the kingdom's exports from Gulf ports
averaged one mln bpd during the eight days ending last Sunday,
down from a February average of 1.9 mln bpd.
    They said Saudi Arabia was allowing production to fluctuate
with lifting nominations and was not trying to maintain
artificially high levels by putting oil into storage.
    The kingdom's main buyers, the four U.S. Oil firms with
past stakes in the national oil company Aramco -- Mobil, Exxon,
Texaco and Chevron -- enjoy considerable flexibility in the
timing and volume of their liftings but are bound to pay
official prices, the sources said.
    Spot market prices have firmed in the past two weeks but
still remain below OPEC levels and major buyers have delayed
liftings in the hope they would improve, the sources said.
    They expected low early March output to pick up towards the
end of the month as buyers sought to fulfill their contractual
obligations.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4315>
Union Pacific Corp said it will sign a
pact in Caracas on March 17 with Petroleos De Venezuela, PDVSA,
to sell the state owned company half of its Corpus Christi,
Texas refinery owned by its Union Pacific's Champlin Petroleum
Co subsidiary.
    The sale will also include the related marketing and
distribution system for the refinery's products.
    A spokesman for the company said that a statement may be
issued later today giving details of the transaction.
    There was no immediate comment from PDVSA officials in New
York.
    The Corpus Christi refinery has a capacity of about 160,000
barrels per day, the Union Pacific spokesman said, and is a
largely upgraded facility but he would place no value on the
transaction.
    The additional acquisition of refinery and distribution
assets by PDVSA has been expected as Venezuela has been moving
aggressively to enhance its role in the oil industry from
producer to excpanding its presence in the downstream sector.
    Purchase of part of Champlin's operations also fits a
profile which PDVSA officials have said previously they looked
for in any acquisition.
    One PDVSA official said the company was looking for
independent oil companies with good refinery and distribution
network and a strong regional presence.
    The potential purchase of the interest in Champlin followed
its earlier acquisition of a part interest in Southland Corp's
&lt;SLC> Citgo Petroleum Corp subsidiary.
    In that agreement signed September 15, 1986, PDVSA paid
Southland 290 mln dlrs for half of Citgo's stock.
    The potetnital acquisition of half Champlin's Corpus
Christi plant will also give Venezuela an additional outlet for
its crude oil production while giving the refiner an assured
source of supply, trade sources said.
    In the earlier deal with Southland, PDVSA agredd to to
supply Citgo with at least 130,000 bpd of crude oil and other
feedstocks.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4333>
Mobil Oil Corp said it will
restructure its Dallas-based Mobil Exploration and Producing
Services Inc operations April one, to provide stronger
technological support to its U.S. and overseas operations.
    Mobil said the operation will consist of two new units,
Technical Services and Application Technology, along with the
existing Drilling and New Exploration Ventures groups. It said
R.C. Mills, president and general manager of its Exploration
and Producing Southeast Inc, has been named vice president and
general manager of the new operation reporting to P.J.
Hoenmans, president of its Exploration and Producing division.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4340>
The National Wildlife Federation 
rejected an Interior Department draft plan to open wilderness
lands in Northern Alaska to oil and gas exploration.
    The federation, the nation's largest conservation group,
said further study was needed to assess any possible damage
that development might have on the wildlife in the area, the
coastal plain of the Arctic National Wildlife Refuge.
    Jay Hair, the federation's executive vice president, called
the Interior's research into the effects of development "so
fundamentally flawed that it provides little or no basis on
which to make a public policy decision."
    Hair called the department's proposal a "reflection of a
largely political decision," adding "we have no confidence in
Interior to represent the broad public interest in this area."
    Interior wants to open the 1.5 million acre coastal plain
to oil and gas exploration, but it said only with tough 
safeguards to protect the area's caribou and musk-oxen.
    It said a preliminary survey showed the region could hold
billions of barrels of oil and gas, and that its potential as
an energy resource would never be known without exploration.
    Interior said oil on the coastal plain could match the 10
billion barrels found at Prudhoe Bay, just west of the plain.
    Under existing law, Congress must agree to oil and gas
exploration, and if it does not act, the land will remain a
wildlife refuge protected from commercial development.
    Hair said Interior's report failed to stress the
probability that finding recoverable oil is only 19 pct.
    He said Interior's study also failed to weigh oil, gas,
fish and wildlife information the State of Alaska had gathered
nor had the department consulted the Environmental Protection
Agency on the possible effects of exploration.
    The federation, in letters to Congressmen, proposed that a
nine-member commission be set up to study all aspects of the
issue and report back to Congress in about two years.
    Hair said the federation was not opposed to the possible
exploration of oil, only that Interior's study was inadquate to
make a sound judgement.
    Congressional observers said that at present there was
little sentiment in Congress to open the wildlife area for
commercial exploitation dispite increasing concern that the
United States is becoming overly dependent on foreign oil.
 reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4365>
Solv-Ex Corp said it
successfully completed its oil sands pilot testing program
under its agreement with Shell Canada Limited &lt;SHC> and
received a 250,000 U.S. dlr bonus payment.
    It also said that Shell Canada exercised its option to take
over Solv-Ex's 25 pct working interest in the construction of
the oil facility, relieving it of its obligation to raise about
62.5 mln Canadian dlrs for plant construction.
    It said 30 pct of that loan was guaranteed by the
Government of Alberta.
    In exchange for Shell's participation, Solv-Ex said Shell
is obligated to pay it an up-front royalty and a running
royalty based on the operating profits of the oil sands
facility. It said the Shell Canada 7,500 barrel per day oil
sands project will be built on Shell's oil sand lease about 40
miles north of Fort McMurray in the Athabasca region of
northern Alberta.
    Solv-Ex said the project will cost about 260 mln Canadian
dlrs. It said that following a final feasibility study the
plant should open in the early 1990s when oil prices are
expected to exceed 20 U.S. dlrs per barrel.

 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4367>
Union Pacific Corp said it will enter
a 50-50 partnership with Petroles de Venezuela, PDVSA, to own
and operate Union Pacific's 160,000 barrel-per-day Corpus
Christi, Texas, oil refinery.
    The assests to be acquired by the partnership are valued at
190 mln dlrs, Union Pacific said.
    Closing is expected to take place in early April and the
venture is to be called Champlin Refining Co.
    The partnership will acquire the refining and distribution
systems currently owned and operated by Champlin Petroleum, a
wholly owned subsidiary of Union Pacific.
    The venture will acquire the related inventories and the
Champlin trade name, the company said.
    PDVSA and Union Pacific will each contribute half the
capital required by the venture and arrange a revolving credit
facility with U.S. and foreign banks to finance inventories and
receivables, Union Pacific said.
    Petroles de Venezuela also signed a 25-year agreement to
supply at least 140,000 bpd of Venezulean crude oil and naphtha
to the refinery at market related prices.
    Under various options the in the agreement PDVSA could
supply another 50,000 bpd on similar terms, the company said.
    "This will provide a stable, long-term supply to the
refinery at competitive costs, thereby assuring the economic
viability of the plant," a statement issued by Union Pacific
said.
   The statement said the agreement with PDVSA will enable the
company to supply a steady flow of refined products to its
customers.
   Union Pacific said employees of the refinery would be
transfered to the new company and would retain the same
benefits as in the past.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4386>
&lt;Powerine Oil Co> said
its refinery here will resume operation today, with initial
crude oil runs of 20,000 barrels per day.
    Powerine, a privately-held company, said it expects the
refinery to become fully operational by May, with crude oil
throughput at 35,000 bpd.
    Initial oil products deliveries are scheduled for Monday,
Powerine said. The refinery had been closed due to a change of
ownership, the company said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4425>
Selm-Societa Energia Montedison is to
close its Priolo crude refining units from March 15th to March
28th for maintenance, a company spokesman said.
    Throughput at the refinery is currently estimated at
140-150,000 bpd, although total capacity is nearer 200,000 bpd.
    Several other Mediterranean refineries are currently
shutdown for maintenance, most of which were scheduled some
months ago. But industry sources said that shutdowns may have
been rearranged to avoid running negative-netback crude.
     Tighter availabilities of products as a result of the 
shutdowns in the Med is helping to keep products markets
bullish, particularly for March deliveries, oil traders said.
    Garrone's refinery at San Quirico (capacity 130,000 bpd) is
due to shutdown on March 14th for three weeks, and the
jointly-owned ISAB/Garrone refinery at Mellili, capacity
220,000 bpd, is due to start up around March 20-25th following
its closure for maintenance a month ago, a company spokesman
said.
    The Esso Italiana refineries at Augusta and Siracusa will
not be closing this spring, a spokesman for the company said.
    In France, the distillation unit at Societe Francaise de
BP's Lavera refinery has been closed for maintenance since
March 2, and is due to restart early April. Total capacity is
181,900 bpd. It is currently operating at around 50 pct
capacity, a company spokesman said.
    Shell Francaise's Berre l'Etang refinery will shut down in
early April until mid-June, a company spokesman said. Capacity
is around 150,000 bpd. Compagnie Francaise de Raffinage (CFR)
will close the visbreaker at its La Mede refinery in early
April, but would not affect crude throughput at the refinery, a
company spokesman said. Current capacity is 136,000 bbl/day.
    Despite current bullish sentiment in the Med, however,
traders noted that crude netbacks are beginning to look more
attractive, and most maintenance shutdowns should be finished
in two to three weeks.
    As a result, oil industry sources suggest that the
situation may ease by mid-April.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4429>
Continuous rebel raids against oil
pipelines and foreign exploration camps endanger Colombia's
present oil bonanza, Franciso Chona, manager of the state-run
oil company Ecopetrol said.
    "It seems the subversion wants to end with our oil bonanza,"
he told reporters.
    He was speaking after a meeting with Defense Minister
Rafael Samudio, military chiefs and Mines and Energy Minister
Guillermo Perry to review the security situation in the light
of a recent upsurge of leftist guerrilla attacks in the
oil-rich Arauca region, bordering Venezuela.
    Ecopetrol chief of security, Retired General Carlos
Narvaez, said security measures would be stricter and that the
armed forces were closely collaborating but gave no details.
    Samudio said new plans had been designed and hoped they
would be effective. Samudio stressed that, despite the most
recent attacks, which cost more than four mln dlrs in damage,
the overall situation had improved compared with last December
when initial measures were taken to combat a wave of attacks.
    Repeated bombings of a vital pipeline from the Cano Limon
oilfield to the Caribbean then led to a loss of 51,000 barrels
of crude.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4453>
Sun Co said it raised the contract
price it will pay for crude oil 50 cts a barrel, effective
today.
    The increase brings Sun's posted price for the West Texas
Intermediate and West Texas Sour grades to 17.50 dlrs/bbl. The
Light Louisiana Sweet grade was also raised 50 cts to 17.85
dlrs/bbl.
    Sun Co last changed its crude postings on March 4.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4467>
The number of seismic crews
searching for oil and gas in the United States dropped by nine
to a total of 151 crews, a decrease of six pct from January,
the Society of Exploration Geophysicists said.
    The February total represented a 49 pct decrease from
February 1986.
    Worldwide, the association's monthly survey showed that
seismic exploration for oil and gas increased to 395 in
February, up three from the month before. Africa added three
seismic crews, the Middle East increased by two and the Far
East added one while reductions were reported in Central and
South America, Europe and the United States.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4474>
Phillips Petroleum said it raised the
contract price it will for all grades of crude oil 50 cts a
barrel, effective today.
    The increase brings Phillip's posted price for the West
Texas Intermediate and West Texas Sour grades to 17.50 dlrs a
bbl.
    Phillips last changed its crude oil postings on March 4.
    The price increase follows similar moves by USX's &lt;X>
subsidiary, Marathon oil, and Sun Co &lt;SUN> earlier today.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4481>
Diamond Shamrock said it raised the
contract price it will pay for crude oil 50 cts a barrel,
effective today.
    The increase brings the company's posted price for the
benchmark grade, West Texas Intermediate, to 17.50 dlrs/bbl.
    Diamond Shamrock last changed its postings on March 4.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4525>
House Speaker Jim Wright endorsed a
proposal to require the president to take action to reduce oil
imports if they threaten to top 50 pct of U.S. consumption.
    Wright told reporters the plan by Sen. Lloyd Bentsen, a
fellow Texas Democrat, was positive and useful. Oil imports
peaked in 1977 at 47 pct, were short of 36 pct last year and
this year are up over 40 pct, Bentsen said. 
    The Bentsen proposal, supported by 24 other Senators, would
would require the president to issue annual three-year oil
import forecasts. In any year they threatened to top 50 pct, he
would be ordered to propose quotas or other solution.
   
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4569>
Permian Basin Royalty Trust
said that as of December 31, 1986, its estimated proved
reserves totaled 18.5 mln barrels of oil and 52.9 mln MCF, or
thousand cubic feet, of gas.
    This compares with yearend 1985 proved reserves estimates
of 26.4 mln barrels of oil and 78.6 mln MCF of gas, Permian
said.
    Permian said December 1986 future net revenues from proved
reserves were 335.6 mln dlrs, down from 814.2 mln dlrs in 1985.
    Permian said the present value of estimated future net
revenues discounted at 10 pct is 165.3 mln dlrs, compared with
374.3 mln dlrs.
    It said the downward revisions in both proved reserves and
estimated future net revenues resulted from decreased prices for
oil and gas.

 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4576>
Unocal Corp said it raised the
contract price it will pay for most grades of crude oil 50 cts
a barrel, effective today.
    The increase brings Unocal's posted price for the U.S.
benchmark grade West Texas Intermediate to 17.50 dlrs a barrel.
It also brought the price for West Texas Sour to 17.50 dlrs a
bbl. Light Louisiana Sweet was also raised 50 cts to 17.85
dlrs/bbl.
    Unocal last changed its crude postings on March four, and
brings it price in line with other major companies, which have
been raising prices steadily in recent weeks.
    The increase also represents the latest in a series of
increases that began with USX Corp's &lt;X> Marathon Petroleum
Corp's notification yesterday evening that, effective today, it
raised its crude postings 50 cts a barrel, bringing its
contract price for WTI to 17.50 dlrs a barrel.
    Earlier today, Sun Co &lt;SUN>, Phillips Petroleum &lt;P> and
Diamond Shamrock &lt;DIA> also said they raised their crude
postings 50 cts a barrel, bringing their WTI contract price to
17.50 dlrs a barrel.
    Contract prices have risen in response to higher spot
market prices, oil traders said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4584>
Southland Corp's Citgo Petroleum Corp
said it raised the contract price it will pay for crude oil 50
cts a barrel, effective today.
    The increase bring's Citgo's posted price for the West
Texas Intermediate and West Texas Sour grades to 17.50 dlrs a
barrel. The Light Louisiana Sweet South Onshore grade was also
raised 50 cts to 17.85 dlrs a barrel, and Light Louisiana Sweet
North was increased to 17.75 dlrs a barrel.
    Citgo last changed its postings on March four.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4590>
The San Juan Basin Royalty
Trust said proved reserves as of December 31 were estimated at
283.1 thousand cubic feet of gas and 1,087,000 barrels of oil.
    In the year-ago period, it said proved reserves were
estimated at 346.4 thousand cubic feet of gas  and 1,974,000
barrels of oil.
    It said the present value of future net revenues discounted
10 pct was 156.2 mln dlrs compared with 446.8 mln dlrs in the
year-ago period.
    It also said that about 60 net infill wells are not
economical to drill at December 31 prices.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4593>
Brazil's state-oil company,
Petrobras, cancelled a 40 mln dlr crude oil purchase from Saudi
Arabia after the Saudis refused to accept credit guarantees
from the Bank of Brazil, a Petrobras official said.
    Export director Carlos Santana told a press conference the
Saudis were the first suppliers of oil to impose such
conditions after Brazil's decision to halt interest payment of
its commercial debts last month.
    The shipment of 2.2 mln barrels represents two days of oil
consumption in Brazil.
    But Santana said if the Saudis change their minds and
decide to respect the terms of the contract, then Petrobras
will lift the order to cancel the shipment.
    Santana said if the Saudis do not accept Brazil's terms by
Monday then Petrobras will negotiate elsewhere.
    "Petrobras has been Saudi Arabia's traditional client since
1955. If they do not accept our conditions now, it will be much
better for us, because with the market prices more or less the
same, buying from Iraq and China is an advantage," he said.
    Iraq and China have barter deals with Brazil, importing
Brazilian goods in exchange for oil, but the Saudis buy nothing
from Brazil, he said.
    Santana said despite a strike threat by oil industry
workers and a two-week stoppage by Brazilian seamen, Petrobras
oil stocks are "reasonably balanced." 
    Saudi Arabia is Brazil's second biggest oil supplier, with
an average 115,000 bpd. Iraq is the main supplier with 235,000
bpd. China comes third, with 58,000 bpd.
    "If the Saudis wish to stop our trade relationship, fine, I
am sure that if they do, we will be getting dozens of offers
from elsewhere," Santana added.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4600>
The World Bank said it has approved
a 140 mln dlr loan for India to help lessen that country's
dependence on imported oil and spur development of its own
petroleum resources.
    The bank said the loan will be used to boost production by
injecting gas in the partially depleted Assam oil fields and to
assist exploration in other areas, including drilling 10
exploratory wells.
    The bank said the recipient of the 20-year loan will be Oil
India Ltd (OIL), which is the smaller of two public Indian
petroleum exploration and production companies.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4604>
The World Bank said it approved a
140 mln dlr loan for India to help lessen that country's
dependence on imported oil and spur development of its own
petroleum resources.
    The bank said the loan will be used to boost production by
injecting gas in the partially depleted Assam oil fields and to
assist exploration in other areas, including drilling 10
exploratory wells.
    The bank said the recipient of the 20-year loan will be Oil
India Ltd (OIL), which is the smaller of two public Indian
petroleum exploration and production companies.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4609>
Venezuela will lend Ecuador 50,000
barrels per day of crude oil over the next few months to help
it meet its export commitments, Energy and Mines Minister
Arturo Hernandez Grisanti said today.
    He said that under the terms of this loan, agreed during a
visit here this week by Ecuador's Deputy Energy Minister
Fernando Santos Alvite, Ecuador will begin repaying the loan in
August.
    Hernandez Grisanti said the loan will go part way to
offsetting the loss of Ecuador's 140,000 in exports caused by
earthquake damage to 25 miles of pipeline last week.
    Ecuador was forced to suspend exports after the pipeline
connecting its jungle oil fields with the pacific port of Balao
was put out of action.
    Venezuela has an output quota of 1.495 bpd, while Ecuador's
is 210,000 bpd. Santos Alvite said Ecuador will ask OPEC to
allow it to produce 100,000 bpd above its quota when the
pipeline is repaired to offset present production losses.
    Hernandez Grisanti said also a first 300,000 barrels
shipment of Venezuelan crude oil will leave for Ecuador this
weekend to help meet domestic consumption needs.
    The oil, part of a five mln additional crude oil loan by
Venezuela, will be processed at Guayaquil refineries.
    "If we had not supplied oil to Ecuador the life of this
country would have ground to a halt," he said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4662>
Indonesian Energy Minister Subroto said
he sees the oil market continuing bullish, with underlying
demand expected to rise later in the year.
    He told a press conference in Jakarta at the end of a
two-day meeting of South-East Asian Energy Ministers that he
saw prices stabilizing around 18 dlrs a barrel.
    "The sentiment in the market is bullish and I think it will
continue that way as demand will go up in the third or fourth
quarters," Subroto said.
    Asked about the prospect for oil prices, he said: "I think
they will stabilise around 18 dlrs, although there is a little
turbulence ..."
    "Of course the spot price will fluctuate, but the official
price will remain at 18 dlrs," he added.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4664>
Indonesian Energy Minister Subroto said
OPEC is deliberately under its production ceiling of 15.8 mln
barrels to defend its 18 dlr a barrel price target.
    He told reporters at an energy conference in Jakarta that
OPEC had decided to maintain its price level of 18 dlrs.
    "We are deliberately defending the price, so OPEC production
is less than 15.8 (mln) at the moment," he stated.
    Asked if OPEC would increase production if prices went
above 18 dlrs a barrel, he said this would be decided at the
next OPEC meeting in June. "We will discuss the market situation
then," he added.
    He said a meeting of the OPEC Differentials Committee had
been postponed because "there is no need for the meeting."
    He did not elaborate. The committee had originally been due
to meet in Vienna this week.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4689>
Brazil's state oil company
Petrobras has cancelled a 40 mln dlr crude oil purchase from
Saudi Arabia after the Saudis refused to accept credit
guarantees from the Bank of Brazil and did not disclose
reasons, a Petrobras official said.
    Export director Carlos Santana told reporters the Saudis
were the first suppliers of oil to impose such conditions after
Brazil's decision to halt interest payment of its commercial
debts last month. The shipment of 2.2 mln barrels represents
two days of consumption.
    He said the Saudis reported they would no longer accept
letters of credit from the Bank of Brazil or even from Saudi
banks and that Brazil would have to obtain credit guarantees
from leading international banks.
    In February, Brazil had contracted to buy 125,000 bpd from
the Saudis until June. Saudi Arabia is Brazil's second biggest
oil supplier, with an average 115,000 bpd. Iraq is the main
supplier with 235,000 bpd. China comes third, with 58,000 bpd.
    "If the Saudis wish to stop our trade relationship...I am
sure that if they do, we will be getting dozens of offers from
elsewhere," Santana added.
    Santana said if the Saudis change their minds and decide to
respect the terms of the contract, then Petrobras will lift the
order to cancel the shipment.
    The Saudis had put similar conditions on a previous
shipment, he added. "We telexed them saying that if they
insisted, we would rather cancel the contract and buy the
product elsewhere," Santana said.
    After Petrobras threatened to cancel the contract, the
Saudis changed their minds and decided to accept the Bank of
Brazil's credit guarantees, he said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4713>
Indonesian Energy Minister Subroto said
he sees the oil market continuing bullish, with underlying
demand expected to rise later in the year.
    He told a press conference in Jakarta at the end of a
two-day meeting of South-East Asian Energy Ministers that he
saw prices stabilizing around 18 dlrs a barrel.
    "The sentiment in the market is bullish and I think it will
continue that way as demand will go up in the third or fourth
quarters," Subroto said.
    Asked about the prospect for oil prices, he said: "I think
they will stabilise around 18 dlrs, although there is a little
turbulence ..."
    "Of course the spot price will fluctuate, but the official
price will remain at 18 dlrs," he added.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4714>
Indonesian Energy Minister Subroto said
OPEC is deliberately under its production ceiling of 15.8 mln
barrels to defend its 18 dlr a barrel price target.
    He told reporters at an energy conference in Jakarta that
OPEC had decided to maintain its price level of 18 dlrs.
    "We are deliberately defending the price, so OPEC production
is less than 15.8 (mln) at the moment," he stated.
    Asked if OPEC would increase production if prices went
above 18 dlrs a barrel, he said this would be decided at the
next OPEC meeting in June. "We will discuss the market situation
then," he added.
    He said a meeting of the OPEC Differentials Committee had
been postponed because "there is no need for the meeting."
    He did not elaborate. The committee had originally been due
to meet in Vienna this week.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4742>
Strong winds and high seas
forced the closure of Egypt's main port of Alexandria and a
nearby oil terminal, port officials said.
    Tanker loading at the Suez-Mediterranean Arab Petroleum
Pipelines Co in Sedi Kerir, southwest of here, stopped and
officials said five tankers were at anchorage awaiting improved
weather.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4848>
&lt;ORS Corp> said &lt;Dominion
Securities (Alberta) Inc> has been appointed to offer common
shares in a new Canadaina company being organized to exploit
heavy oil production opportunities in Canada and Western
Europe.
    ORS said the offer for private sale of the stock being made
on a best efforts basis is designed to raise five mln Canadian
dlrs which the new company will invest in properties and
projects using the Electromagnetic Well Stimulation Process
developed by IIT Research Institute under sponsorship of ORS.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4867>
Brazil's state-oil company
Petrobras has asked the Army to withdraw the troops which were
occupying its oil installations since Tuesday, Petrobras said
in a statement.
    The statement said the request for the withdrawal of the
troops was made because of the calmness reigning in all of its
refineries.
    "The request was also due to the end of the seamen's strike
and the willingness of the oil industry workers to sit again by
the negotiating table," the statement said.
    Even though the Petrobras statement said the seamen's
strike was over, a union spokesman said only two small shipping
companies had reached a pay agreement. The overwhelming
majority of Brazil's seamen remained on strike.
    The statement said a meeting between Petrobras and oil
industry leaders was set for next Wednesday in Rio, with the
presence of Labour Minister Almir Pazzionotto as a mediator.
    Petrobras said the request for the withdrawal of the troops
was made at 1100 local hours (1400 GMT), but a company
spokesman said he did not know if the troops had already been
removed.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4951>
Mobil Corp chairman Allen E. Murray
said in the annual report issued today that the company's total
1987 capital expenditures would be lower than the three
billion dlrs spent in 1986.
    "Overall capital and exploration expenditures will fall
slightly below the level for 1986 although we'll be ready to
increase spending whenever the outlook becomes more promising,"
Murray said.
    Mobil data in the annual report shows capital expenditures
have been cut every year since 1984's 3.6 billion dlrs to 3.5
billion dlrs in 1985.
    Murray told shareholders that despite the cuts "the company
has promising acreage to explore as well as major oil and gas
reserves to develop in the U.S., Canada, Europe, Africa and
Indonesia.
    Over the past two weeks Mobil has announced restructuring
of its domestic exploration and development organization and
this week a restructuring of its oil services units, which
support the new affiliate.
    "Mobil's chairman has explained this change by saying we
need a leaner organization to get more efficient usage from our
assets," said John Lord, a Mobil Corp spokesman.
    Murray said in announcing the first reorganization, which
will combine its current three exploration and producing
affiliates into one organization, Mobil Exploration and
Production U.S. Inc, that it is more effective than the present
organization and will improve the company's upstream
competitive position.
    Yesterday the company said that it will restructure its
Mobil Exploration and Producing Services Inc, MEPSI, to enhance
the development and transfer of technology supporting critical
areas of exploration, drilling, resevoir management and
computer systems.
    Earnings from Mobil's upstream operations in 1986 were 827
mln dlrs, down 54 pct from the previous year's 1.8 billion dlrs
in earnings.
    Mobil's strategy in the exploration and production sector
will be to give most attention to exploration possibilities
with the greatest long term potential, the company said.
    In its annual report, Mobil said that this will include
greater emphasis on "frontier plays that, although riskier, fit
our strengths of technology and size...This probably also means
a shift toward emphasis in the foreign area since selective
overseas exploration offers greater potential."
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4953>
Brazil's labour troubles eased a
little today as the authorities announced they were withdrawing
troops from the country's main oil installations occupied three
days ago.
    The troops went in at the request of the state-oil company
Petrobras because of the threat of a strike by 55,000 oil
industry employees.
    Petrobras said in a statement today it had requested the
withdrawal of the troops. The situation in the refineries was
calm, it said, and the employees had indicated their
willingness to negotiate a pay deal.
    A national seamen's strike, however, continued and marines
remained in the country's main ports. The marines were
despatched to the ports after the seamen's strike, now two
weeks old, was ruled illegal last Friday.
    A spokesman at the national strike headquarters in Rio de
Janeiro said today a total of l63 ships were strike-bound, 135
in Brazil and 28 in foreign ports.
    Yesterday two small companies specialised in the transport
of chemicals, Global and Flumar, struck a pay accord with their
seamen who have secured a 120 pct increase.
    Brazilian newspapers today hailed these agreements as a
sign that the national strike could soon come to an end.
    Both companies employ fewer than 200 seamen and union
leaders said the vast majority of Brazil's 40,000 seamen were
still on strike.
    The threat of a stoppage by oil industry employees appeared
today to be receding. Petrobras said in its statement that the
company would meet union leaders for pay talks in Rio de
Janeiro next Wednesday.
    Labour Minister Almir Pazzionotto would act as a mediator.
    Besides industrial troubles, there has also been
considerable unrest this week in the agricultural sector.
    On Tuesday hundreds of thousands of farmers held rallies
throughout the country to protest against high interest rates.
    Television reports showed some of these protests still
continuing today, with farmers blockading banks with their
vehicles in several towns in the states of Sao Paulo and
Parana.
    The strikes in Brazil come as the government is trying to
extricate itself from a serious debt crisis brought on by a
deterioration in its trade balance.
    On February 20 President Jose Sarney announced that Brazil
was suspending interest payments on 68 billion dlrs of debt to
private banks.
    Because of the seamen strike exports are being delayed and
the country is losing badly needed foreign exchange.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4962>
Mobil Corp increased net proven
reserves of natural gas liquids in 1986 from the previous year
according to data in its 1986 annual report.
    The report states that total net proved reserves at year's
end stood at 2.5 billion barrels, an increase of 94 mln barrels
or four pct above the previous year and detailed data show that
the gains resulted from an increase in net proved reserves of
natural gas liquids.
    Mobil said gains were in Indonesia where a sixth production
facility began operation in October with a capacity to
manufacture 1.7 mln tonnes of liquified natural gas.
    The company also said that new capacity brought onstream
last year replaced 120 pct of Mobil's production, which
declined by about four pct in 1986 from the previous year.
    Detailed data on reserves shows that U.S. net proved
reserves of crude oil fell to 837 mln barrels from 853 mln
barrels in 1985, natural gas liquid reserves were also lower in
1986 from the previous year.
    Net proved crude oil reserves also fell in Canada to 224
mln barrels and in Europe to 403 mln barrels from the previous
year's level of 231 mln barrels and 439 mln barrels,
respectively.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4983>
Construction workers today began building
a 26 km (16 mile) pipeline to link Ecuador's jungle oilfields
to a pipeline in Colombia through which Ecuadorean crude could
be pumped to the Pacific Coast, Ecuadorean energy minsitry
officials said.
    They said it would take about two months and at least 15
mln dlrs to build the pipeline from Lago Agrio in Ecuador to
Puerto Colon, Colombia for connection to the Colombian
pipeline, which goes to the port of Tumaco on Colombia's
Pacific Ocean coast.
    The Lago Agrio to Puerto Colon pipeline is designed to
transport between 30,000 to 50,000 barrels of day (bpd) of
Ecuadorean crude to the Colombian pipeline, they said.
    The Colombian pipeline to Tumaco has ample room for
Ecuadorean crude, they said. It is currently transporting about
17,000 bpd out of its 100,000 bpd capacity, an Ecuadorean
energy ministry official said.
    The Ecuadorean crude reaching Tumaco will be shipped by
boat to Ecuador for refining into oil products to meet domestic
demand.
    The completion of the pipeline would allow Ecuador to
resume some of production, paralysed since March six by an 
earthquake the night before.
    The tremor ruptured the country's main pipeline from jungle
oilfields to the Ecuadorean port of Balao, on the Pacific
Ocean.
    Ecuador was pumping about 260,000 bpd before the
earthquake. It would take about five months to repair the
pipeline to Balao, government officials said.
    Ecuador estimates that it will cost between 145 to 150 mln
dlrs to repair oil installations damaged by the earthquake,
energy ministry Javier Espinosa said.
   
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5037>
Prices of wholesale finished energy
goods in the U.S. rose 4.0 pct in February after a 9.8 pct rise
in January, the Labor Department said.
    The Producer Price Index for finished energy goods fell by
20.9 pct in the past 12 months.
    Heating oil prices rose 3.0 pct in February after a 18.0
pct rise in January, the department said.
    Gasoline prices rose by 5.5 pct last month after a 15.7
pct January rise, the department said. Natural gas prices rose
1.8 pct after a 4.2 pct rise in January.
    Crude oil prices rose 4.4 pct in February, after a 19.7 pct
January rise and were off 21.3 pct from the year ago level.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5061>
Prices of wholesale finished energy
goods in the United States were up in February, rising by 4.0
pct after a 9.8 pct rise in January, the Labor Department said.
    The Producer Price Index for finished energy goods has
fallen 20.9 pct in the past 12 months.
    Heating oil prices rose 3.0 pct in February after a 18.0
pct rise in January, the department said.
    Gasoline prices rose by 5.5 pct last month after a 15.7
pct January rise, the department said. Natural gas prices rose
1.8 pct after a 4.2 pct rise in January.
    Energy goods at the intermediate stage of processing rose
2.7 pct in February after rising 3.5 pct in January and were
down 16.1 pct over the past 12 months, the Labor Department
said.
    Prices for crude energy goods, such as crude oil, coal and
gas at the wellhead, rose 2.6 pct last month after a 10.0 pct
January rise. They were down 11.6 pct from February 1986, the
department said.
     At the intermediate stage, liquefied petroleum gas prices
rose 10.1 pct last month after a 5.0 pct January rise and were
41.0 pct below prices a year earlier, the department said.
    Residual fuel prices rose 16.7 pct in February after a 13.4
pct rise a month earlier and were off 17.4 pct in 12 months.
    Electric power prices fell 0.3 pct last month, after a 1.3
pct January decline, and were down 3.6 pct from a year ago.
    Crude oil prices rose 4.4 pct in February, after a 19.7 pct
January rise and were off 21.3 pct from the year ago level.
    Prices of natural gas at the wellhead rose 1.8 pct in
February after rising 4.2 pct a month earlier and were 14.8 pct
lower than they were 12 months earlier, the department said.
    Coal costs were down 0.3 pct last month after rising 0.4
pct in January and were down 0.8 pct from a year ago.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5116>
Petroleos de Venezuela, S.A. said it
will sign a contract March 17 to buy a half interest in a
Corpus Christi, Texas refinery and related operations.
    The contract, to be signed by PDVSA and Champlin
Petroleum's parent company, the Union Pacific Corp, will create
a new joint venture called Champlin Refining.
    The state oil company said PDVSA will pay on the order of
30 mln dlrs for the half interest in Champlin.
     Energy minister Arturo Hernandez Grisanti said Wednesday
the cost would be 33 mln dlrs in cash, plus an additional 60
mln in crude and refined oil shipments.
    PDVSA and Union Pacific have sought a line of credit from a
group of North American and Japanese banks to finance the new
company's working capital, the Venezuelan company said.
    Under the deal, PDVSA will supply up to 140,000 barrels a
day to the refinery with the option to place 50,000 bpd more -
mostly gasoline and distillates - through Champlin's
distribution system in 10 U.S. states.
    The new company will be directed by a six-member board,
with three representatives each from PDVSA and Union Pacific.
    According to PDVSA, Venezuelans will occupy such key
positions such as treasurer and vice-president for
manufacturing.
    The total capacity of the Champlin refinery is 160,000 bpd
of crudes and another 40,000 bpd of intermediates. The plant
will be able to handle 110,000 bpd of Venezuelan heavy crudes,
which make up more than half of the country's crude oil
exports.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5118>
Venezuela will lend Ecuador up to 12.5
mln barrels of crude oil to help it meet its export commitments
and its domestic energy demand, Ecuadorean Energy and Mines
Minister Javier Espinosa said today in a statement.
    Ecuador was forced to suspend exports after the pipeline
connecting its jungle oil fields with the Pacific Ocean port of
Balao was damaged last week by an earthquake.
    Venezuela would lend 50,000 barrels per day of crude for a
total of up to to 7.5 mln barrels to help Ecuador meet export
commitments, Espinosa said. Also, Venezuela will sell the crude
and provide the foreign exchange earnings to Ecuador, he said.
     Ecuador would repay Venezuela in crude once it resumed its
exports after repairing its pipeline to Balao, a task that
would take an estimated five  months.
    Venezuela is lending Ecuador five mln barrels of crude for
refining in this country to meet domestic demand. Ecuador would
repay that loan with crude once the oil pipeline is repaired.
    Both countries are the only Latin American members of the
Organisation of Petroleum Exporting Countries (OPEC).
    Ecuador was exporting about 140,000 bpd before the
earthquake, Energy Ministry officials said. Its total output
was around 260,000 bpd.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5119>
Petroleos de Venezuela, S.A. said it
will sign a contract March 17 to buy a half interest in a
Corpus Christi, Texas refinery and related operations.
    The contract, to be signed by PDVSA and Champlin
Petroleum's parent company, the Union Pacific Corp &lt;UNP>, will
create a new joint venture called Champlin Refining.
    The state oil company said PDVSA will pay on the order of
30 mln dlrs for the half interest in Champlin.
     Energy minister Arturo Hernandez Grisanti said Wednesday
the cost would be 33 mln dlrs in cash, plus an additional 60
mln in crude and refined oil shipments.
    PDVSA and Union Pacific have sought a line of credit from a
group of North American and Japanese banks to finance the new
company's working capital, the Venezuelan company said.
    Under the deal, PDVSA will supply up to 140,000 barrels a
day to the refinery with the option to place 50,000 bpd more -
mostly gasoline and distillates - through Champlin's
distribution system in 10 U.S. states.
    The new company will be directed by a six-member board,
with three representatives each from PDVSA and Union Pacific.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5123>
Saudi Arabia has dropped its
condition that Brazil secure international bank guarantees
before Saudia Arabia would ship it oil, the state-oil company,
Petrobras, said in a statement.
    Petrobras said the Saudis will accept Banco do Brasil
credit guarantees.
    Petrobras cancelled a 40-mln dlr crude oil purchase from
the Saudis yesterday after they refused to accept a letter of
credit from the official Bank of Brazil. The Saudis had
demanded that Brazil get credit guarantees from leading
international banks.
    Petrobras said the Saudis had been advised that if they did
not change their mind by Monday, Petrobras would negotiate the
purchase of oil with other producers.
    The Petrobras statement said the shipment of 2.2 mln
barrels will be made by the Saudis on March 24 as scheduled.
    The shipment is part contract signed in February for the
Saudis to supply Brazil with 125,000 barrels per day until
June.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5125>
Saudi Arabia has lifted the
condition it imposed on the sale of oil to Brazil and will
accept Banco do Brasil's credit guarantees, state-oil company
Petrobras said in a statement.
    Petrobras cancelled a 40 mln dlr crude oil purchase from
the Saudis yesterday, after they refused to accept a letter of
credit from the Bank of Brazil, demanding guarantees from
leading international banks.
    It advised the Saudis the company would negotiate oil
purchases elsewhere unless they changed their mind by Monday.
    The 2.2 mln barrels shipment will be made by the Saudis on
March 24 as scheduled, the statement said.
    Under a 125,000 bpd contract signed in February the Saudis
agreed to supply oil to Brazil until June.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5150>
Yugoslavia's top oil and natural gas
producer &lt;Ina-Naftaplin> has started to implement a cooperation
contract signed last year with the French petrochemical concern
&lt;Petro Chemie>, the official Tanjug news agency said.
    Under the deal Petro Chemie supplies oil to Ina refineries
in Sisak and Rijeka and ships parts to 12 Yugoslav firms in the
petrochemical, chemical, textile and plastics industries. The
Yugoslav firms, in turn, will export oil products to France.
    Tanjug said this year's exchange will value 530 mln dlrs.
    Ina signed a similar deal with West Germany's Hoechst AG
&lt;HFAG.F> two years ago.
    Ina also has joint ventures and co-production projects,
involving Yugoslavia's other main producer &lt;Naftagas> of Novi
Sad, with partners in Angola, Algeria and Tunisia, exploring
for and exploiting oil and natural gas.
    An estimated 300,000 tonnes of oil will thus be obtained
from fields in Angola over the next 15 years, Tanjug said.
    Ina accounts for some 75 pct of Yugoslavia's total oil
production, which amounts to 4.2 mln tonnes a year.
    Ina earned more than 154 mln dlrs from exports of goods and
services to 39 countries last year and ranks among Yugoslavia's
leading export enterprises.
    In a separate statement issued through Tanjug, Ina said it
has successfully completed the first drill at the depth of over
3,000 meters in the Bay of Baes, in Tunisia. Ina is jointly
prospecting with the U.S. Firm Conoco for oil and gas there.
    Work on a second drill, below 4,000 meters, would start
soon in the Bay of Gabes, the statement said. Ina would invest
about 8.5 mln dlrs in prospecting in the Gabes area.
    Conoco, which has completed geological prospecting for the
Tunisian government, has transferred one third of its option
rights in the region to Ina, it said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5156>
Brazilian bank workers voted
to launch a nationwide strike this month, compounding labour
unrest arising from the failure of the government's
anti-inflation plan.
    At a rally in this city, about 100 km northwest of Sao
Paulo, about 5,000 bank workers voted to strike on March 24
unless their demand for 100 pct pay rises is met.
    Wilson Gomes de Moura, president of the national
confederation which groups the bank employees' 152 unions
representing 700,000 workers, told Reuters the indefinite
stoppage would affect all banks.
    The vote came as a stoppage by seamen entered its third
week and as 55,000 oil workers threatened action against the
state-owned petroleum company Petrobras.
    The government ordered thousands of troops into the
refineries on Tuesday to forestall any occupation, but the
troops were removed yesterday.
    Petrobras said it had requested their withdrawal because
the refineries were calm and oil workers had indicated their
willingess to negotiate next Wednesday. The government has also
sent marines into the main ports.
    A spokesman at strike headquarters for the seamen in Rio de
Janeiro said unions were studying an offer by private
shipowners for a 120 pct pay rise.
    Seamen employed by two small companies have already
accepted a 120 pct pay rise and returned to work, as have about
5,000 seamen employed by Petrobras.
    Last week also saw widespread protests by hundreds of
thousands of farmers over what they see as unfairly high
interest rates charged by banks.
    According to official estimates, prices rose by more than
33 pct in the first two months of this year.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5167>
Saudi Arabian Oil Minister Hisham Nazer
said OPEC's December agreement to stabilise oil prices at 18
dlrs a barrel was being implemented satisfactorily and there
was no immediate need to change it.
    Nazer, in an interview with Reuters and the television news
agency Visnews, said Saudi Arabia was producing around three
mln barrels per day (bpd) of crude oil, well below its OPEC
quota.
    Saudi Arabia, the world's largest oil exporter, will
continue to restrain production as long as other OPEC members
adhere to the pact, Nazer said.
    The 13-nation OPEC agreed in December to cut its production
ceiling by 7.25 pct to 15.8 mln bpd and abide by fixed prices
averaging 18 dlrs a barrel from February 1.
    Nazer, in his first interview since succeeding Ahmed Zaki
Yamani last October, said: "I do not foresee any need for new
measures before the 25th of June when our (next OPEC) meeting
will take place as scheduled."
    Nazer said OPEC was producing below 15.8 mln bpd and all
members were abiding by its agreements.
    "We've heard news every now and then of violations but they
were not at all verified," he said.
    OPEC production curbs have boosted world oil prices from a
13-year low of around eight dlrs a barrel last August to near
18 dlrs after announcement of the December pact.
    Spot market prices slipped some two dlrs in February but
have firmed in the past two weeks to near OPEC levels as
traders gained confidence in OPEC price and output discipline.
    Nazer said Saudi Arabia would continue to produce below its
4.133 mln bpd quota if necessary to defend the 18 dlr price.
    "As long as all the OPEC members adhere to the program as
devised in December, Saudi Arabia will continue to adhere to
the agreement," he said.
    Current production of three mln bpd includes oil from the
Neutral Zone shared with Kuwait, but not sales from floating
storage, Nazer said.
    King Fahd of Saudi Arabia, in an interview with Reuters and
Visnews on March 11, said the kingdom wanted oil price
stability and called on non-OPEC producers to avoid harmful
competition with OPEC.
    "Saudi Arabia doesn't decide prices by itself but certainly
desires price stability," he said.
    Nazer said the output level did not mean the kingdom had
returned to a role of "swing producer" within OPEC.
    Saudi Arabia allowed its output to sink as low as two mln
bpd in August 1985 to compensate for slack demand and
over-production by some OPEC states.
    "Saudi Arabia is not playing that role. It is being played
by OPEC membership as a whole because the reduction in the 15.8
mln bpd share of OPEC in the market is being shared by other
members of OPEC," Nazer said.
    Nazer said OPEC estimated demand for its oil during third
quarter this year would be around 16.6 mln bpd.
    But he said if circumstances changed "I am sure then the
OPEC members will consult with each other and take the
necessary measures."
    Oil analysts say the OPEC pact could come under strain when
demand for petroleum products generally falls in the northern
hemisphere spring and summer.
    Nazer said he was satisfied with the extent of cooperation
from non-OPEC producers. Norway, Egypt and the Soviet Union
agreed to help OPEC by restraining production or exports after
he visited them on OPEC's behalf earlier this year.
    "We did not ask any country to do anything. These were
programmes they thought were necessary to stabilise market
conditions and to help themselves attain better pricing
conditions," Nazer said.
    He said it was up to countries that declined to cooperate
-- such as Britain -- to come up with their own proposals if
they saw fit.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5171>
Saudi Arabian business
leaders assembled for a conference aimed at thrashing out
problems facing the private sector of the kingdom's
oil-dependent economy.
    The meeting of some 500 top businessmen from across Saudi
Arabia comes at a time of guarded optimism in industry and
commerce following the OPEC pact to boost world oil prices.
    The four-day conference in this resort town, high in the
mountains above the Tihamah plain stretching to the Red Sea,
has been organised by Saudi Arabia's chambers of commerce.
    Finance Minister Mohammed Ali Abal-Khail and Commerce
Minister Suleiman Abdulaziz al-Salim will attend the first day.
    Bankers and businessmen said the conference will air
problems facing commerce and industry after last year's slide
in oil prices and examine ways to promote higher investment in
a private sector sorely short of finance.
    Government planners have long recognised that Saudi Arabia,
the world's largest crude exporter, needs to foster private
enterprise to diversify its oil-based economy.
    The fledgling private sector was hard hit by the Middle
East recession as early as 1983 and several big manufacturing
and trading companies ran into problems repaying loans.
    Renewed optimism this year stems largely from the accord
reached by OPEC last December to curb oil output and boost
prices to a benchmark level of 18 dlrs per barrel.
    With oil prices recovering, Saudi Arabia went ahead at the
turn of the year with long-delayed budget plans incorporating a
52.7 billion riyal deficit to be bridged by drawing down
foreign reserves.
    The simple act of publishing a budget restored a measure of
confidence to the business community.
    Some share prices have risen by more than 35 pct since last
November, while banks are generally reporting a slowdown in the
number of new non-performing loans.
    But not all bankers are convinced. One senior corporate
finance manager in Riyadh said: "Banks are still reluctant to
lend ... There is certainly more optimism in the air, but I am
not sure if it is firmly based."
    Some businessmen and bankers point out that government
spending is still under tight control and the non-oil economy
may still be contracting.
    Capital expenditure on large projects has been cut sharply.
A U.S. Embassy report on Saudi Arabia published just before the
budget said: "While industrialisation has continued to be one of
the government's highest priorities, the recession, the
payments problem and the lack of financing have reduced Saudi
and foreign investor interest in industry."
    It is the lack of fresh investment that is expected to be a
major issue among the businessmen gathered here.
    Official figures show the number of new licences for
industrial ventures fell 24 pct in the six months to March
1986, compared with the same period in 1985.
    Lending by the Saudi Industrial Development Fund, a major
source of industry backing, has fallen steadily since 1983.
    Trading companies have also been hit, some caught with huge
inventories of construction equipment as recession bit.
    Some firms laid off workers and cut bloated inventories.
Others have effectively been liquidated. A few have reached
agreement with bankers to extend debt repayments.
    The latest rescheduling is for the shipping-to-hotels
conglomerate REDEC. Its negotiators have just initialled a
draft accord to restructure payments on 1.3 billion riyals of
bank debt.
    Bankers and businessmen said the conference was also likely
to discuss the apparent reluctance of U.S. And British firms to
step up investment in the kingdom.
    A British government delegation has just left Riyadh after
holding preliminary talks on ways of offsetting the huge Saudi
outlay on a defence contract to supply 132 fighter aircraft
worth five billion stg.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5244>
OPEC produced only about 14 mln bpd of
oil in the second week of March -- 1.8 mln bpd below its
ceiling -- largely because of pipeline problems in Turkey and
Ecuador, the Middle East Economic Survey (MEES) estimated.
    A landslide breached Iraq's one mln bpd pipeline through
Turkey on March 6 for a week, and earthquakes in Ecuador have
shut down its export pipeline for four to five months. Ecuador
has an OPEC quota of 210,000 bpd.
    MEES put Saudi Arabian output at 2.9 mln bpd in the first
week of March and 3.1 mln bpd in the second, in addition to
output from the Neutral Zone between Saudi Arabia and Kuwait.
    MEES said Saudi Arabia was pumping more than 300,000 bpd of
its total production into floating storage.
    Saudi Oil Minister Hisham Nazer told Reuters and the
television news agency Visnews yesterday that Saudi output,
including Neutral Zone production, was around three mln bpd.
    The Cyprus-based newsletter also said authoritative Libyan
oil sources said Libya was producing 850,000 bpd, compared with
its 948,000 bpd quota, and that actual liftings are much lower
than that.
    It said one major Libyan equity producer had partially
stopped lifting its 55,000 bpd equity entitlement for March
because Libya was insisting on official prices, but is still
lifting 40,000 bpd of debt crude at official prices and a
further 25,000 bpd of "purchase crude."
    It said small equity producers, with entitlements of only
2,000 to 3,000 bpd, had also told Tripoli they could not lift
at official prices.
    MEES said Iraq had sent a telex to OPEC and member
countries calling for the formation of a committee to study
what it said were inequalities in marketing potential among
various members.
    The newsletter said the Iraqi letter indicated Baghdad was
having difficulty selling crude at official prices.
    The Iraqi telex pointed out that some member countries
export substantial volumes of oil that are not subject to OPEC
price regulations -- exports of refined products, equity crude
on which the margins are equivalent to covert discounts and
"other forms of hydrocarbons" which are marketed in package deals
with crude oil.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5268>
President Leon Febres Cordero said
Ecuador would honour its debt when it had the capacity to make
payments, but said foreign banks had calculated oil would have
to be 25 dlrs a barrel for Ecuador to meet its commitments.
    Ecuador said on Friday that last week's earthquake was
forcing it to reaffirm an earlier decision -- based on the
slide in world oil prices -- to suspend debt payments to
private foreign banks, which hold two-thirds of its 8.16
billion dlr foreign debt.
    "All legitimate debt is a commitment of honour," the
president said during a visit to the quake zone. "A government
as a sovereign entity has dignity and prestige to maintain."
    Private foreign banks and the World Bank had calculated oil
would have to be at least 25 dlrs a barrel for Quito to be able
to meet its commitments, Febres Cordero said.
    He added that Ecuadorean crude was now selling for 15 to 17
dlrs a barrel after having been sold for many months at 12 dlrs
a barrel and as low as seven dlrs before that.
    Meanwhile, Ecuador announced an austerity program and a
price freeze on key consumer goods as a result of the
earthquake, which killed at least 300 people.
    Presidency Minister Patricio Quevedo said the budget would
be cut by five to 10 pct, government hiring would be frozen and
salaries of top officials, including the president and cabinet,
would be reduced.
    He also said a price freeze would be imposed on 20 basic
consumer items, mainly food staples, while the price of
gasoline would rise by between 69 and 80 pct and bus fares
would rise by 20 pct. Gasoline supplies would also be limited.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5270>
Banque Paribas, which arranged a 220
mln dlr loan for Ecuador last year to pre-finance oil exports,
wants to adjust the terms of the facility to help the country
recover from a devastating earthquake, bankers said.
    But the French bank's plan, which would effectively
postpone repayment of about 30 mln dlrs of the loan for several
months, is running into stiff resistance from many of the 52
members of the loan syndicate.
    The pipeline that carries all Ecuador's oil exports was
ruptured in the March 5 tremor and will take some five months
to repair at a cost of about 150 mln dlrs to repair.
    President Leon Febres Cordero on Friday estimated total
damages caused by the quake at one billion dlrs and said that
Ecuador as a result would maintain January's suspension of
interest payments on its foreign commercial bank debt.
    Payments were halted in January because of the drop in the
price of oil, which accounts for nearly two-thirds of Ecuador's
export earnings and 60 pct of government revenue.
    Although sympathetic to Ecuador's plight, many banks in the
Paribas facility feel that emergency financial relief is a job
for international financial organizations and not for
commercial banks, bankers said.
    The 18-month oil-financing facility, which was signed last
October 28, is one of the few purely voluntary credits for a
Latin American nation since the region's debt crisis erupted in
August 1982.
    Because it was a voluntary deal, many bankers feel strongly
that the orginal terms must be adhered to. Otherwise, they
fear, the gradual re-establishment of normal market conditions
for Latin borrowers will be set back.
    "There's a lot of reluctance by the other banks. They feel
it's a different facility, and so any kind of suggestion of a
restructuring would look bad," one banker commented.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5273>
Saudi Arabian Oil Minister Hisham Nazer
said OPEC's December agreement to stabilize oil prices at 18
dlrs a barrel was being implemented satisfactorily and there
was no immediate need to change it.
    Nazer, in an interview with Reuters and the television news
agency Visnews, said Saudi Arabia was producing around three
mln barrels per day (bpd) of crude oil, well below its OPEC
quota.
    Saudi Arabia, the world's largest oil exporter, will
continue to restrain production as long as other OPEC members
adhere to the pact, Nazer said.
    The 13-nation OPEC agreed in December to cut its production
ceiling by 7.25 pct to 15.8 mln bpd and abide by fixed prices
averaging 18 dlrs a barrel from February 1.
    Nazer, in his first interview since succeeding Ahmed Zaki
Yamani last October, said: "I do not foresee any need for new
measures before the 25th of June when our (next OPEC) meeting
will take place as scheduled."
    Nazer said OPEC was producing below 15.8 mln bpd and all
members were abiding by its agreements.
    "We've heard news every now and then of violations but they
were not at all verified," he said.
    OPEC production curbs have boosted world oil prices from a
13-year low of around eight dlrs a barrel last August to near
18 dlrs after announcement of the December pact.
    Spot market prices slipped some two dlrs in February but
have firmed in the past two weeks to near OPEC levels as
traders gained confidence in OPEC price and output discipline.
    Nazer said Saudi Arabia would continue to produce below its
4.133 mln bpd quota if necessary to defend the 18 dlr price.
    "As long as all the OPEC members adhere to the program as
devised in December, Saudi Arabia will continue to adhere to
the agreement," he said.
    Current production of three mln bpd includes oil from the
Neutral Zone shared with Kuwait, but not sales from floating
storage, Nazer said.
    King Fahd of Saudi Arabia, in an interview with Reuters and
Visnews on March 11, said the kingdom wanted oil price
stability and called on non-OPEC producers to avoid harmful
competition with OPEC.
    "Saudi Arabia doesn't decide prices by itself but certainly
desires price stability," he said.
    Nazer said the output level did not mean the kingdom had
returned to a role of "swing producer" within OPEC.
    Saudi Arabia allowed its output to sink as low as two mln
bpd in August 1985 to compensate for slack demand and
over-production by some OPEC states.
    "Saudi Arabia is not playing that role. It is being played
by OPEC membership as a whole because the reduction in the 15.8
mln bpd share of OPEC in the market is being shared by other
members of OPEC," Nazer said.
    Nazer said OPEC estimated demand for its oil during third
quarter this year would be around 16.6 mln bpd.
    But he said if circumstances changed "I am sure then the
OPEC members will consult with each other and take the
necessary measures."
    Oil analysts say the OPEC pact could come under strain when
demand for petroleum products generally falls in the northern
hemisphere spring and summer.
    Nazer said he was satisfied with the extent of cooperation
from non-OPEC producers. Norway, Egypt and the Soviet Union
agreed to help OPEC by restraining production or exports after
he visited them on OPEC's behalf earlier this year.
    "We did not ask any country to do anything. These were
programmes they thought were necessary to stabilise market
conditions and to help themselves attain better pricing
conditions," Nazer said.
    He said it was up to countries that declined to cooperate
-- such as Britain -- to come up with their own proposals if
they saw fit.
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5281>
Saudi Arabia has dropped its
condition that Brazil secure international bank guarantees
before Saudia Arabia would ship it oil, state-oil company
Petrobras said in a statement.
    Petrobras said the Saudis will accept Banco do Brasil
credit guarantees.
    Petrobras cancelled a 40 mln dlr crude oil purchase from
the Saudis yesterday after they refused to accept a letter of
credit from the official Bank of Brazil. The Saudis had
demanded that Brazil get credit guarantees from leading
international banks.
    Petrobras said the Saudis had been advised that if they did
not change their mind by Monday, Petrobras would negotiate the
purchase of oil with other producers.
    The Petrobras statement said the shipment of 2.2 mln
barrels will be made by the Saudis on March 24 as scheduled.
    The shipment was part of a contract signed in February for
the Saudis to supply Brazil with 125,000 barrels per day until
June.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5542>
Norway's parliament has approved an
extensive trade ban against South Africa but left shipowners a
key loophole through which controversial oil shipments on
Norwegian tankers may continue, government officials said.
    The unilateral boycott, proposed by Norway's minority
Labour government, gives domestic companies until late
September to cut remaining trade ties with South Africa and
Namibia.
    "The legislation discussed today must not be seen as an
isolated measure, but as a step in an international process,"
Norway's foreign minister Thorvald Stoltenberg told parliament.
    Government officials said they hope the move will intensify
international pressure against the Pretoria regime's apartheid
policies. Sweden, in a similar move last week, promised to halt
all trade with South Africa by October.
    Norway's boycott, although forbidding crude oil shipments
to South Africa on Norwegian-owned tankers, makes an important
exception for ships whose final destination is decided while
they are at sea.
    Oil cargoes are often resold by trades after loading,
making it difficult for shipowners to know their ships' final
port at the start of a voyage.
    Critics said the bill leaves the door open for continued
oil shipments to South Africa. They called for stricter
sanctions to stop all Norwegian shipping to South Africa.
    Norwegian tankers supplied South Africa with about 30 pct
of its crude imports during the early 1980s, but the trade has
dropped sharply to just one cargo in the last three months,
trade ministry officials said.
    The latest trade figures show Norwegian imports from South
Africa dropped 36 pct to 160 mln crowns during the first eight
months of 1986, while exports plunged 52 pct to 265 mln crowns
from the year-ago figure.
    "Many would say that the law has already had its effect
because of the dramatic drop in trade between South African and
Norway," Foreign Ministry spokesman Per Paust told Reuters.
    "Norwegian business at an early stage started restructuring
its relations with South Africa in anticipation of the law.
    "No one has said the boycott will have a profound effect on
international trade with South Africa, but it is an important
political statement by the Norwegian government," he said.
    The Oslo government said it will review the effects of the
ban on Norwegian industry after two years and may propose
amendments if industry can show it is hurt by the law.
    Norwegian imports from South Africa are limited mainly to
high-grade manganese and coppernickle ores used in it
ferro-alloys and light metals industries.
    Metals manufacturers estimate some 2,000 jobs could be
affected by the boycott is suitable replacements for these ores
are not found.
    The legislation now goes on to the upper house for formal
ratification later this week, parliamentarians said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5553>
Gotaas-Larsen Shipping Corp
said it had exercised an option to build a fifth in a series of
crude oil carriers to be constructed by &lt;Daewoo Shipbuilding
and Heavy Machinery Ltd> in South Korea.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5630>
Pacific Resources Inc said it has
installed a CALM (Catenary Anchor Leg Mooring) single-point
mooring terminal off the southwest coast of Oahu at its
Hawaiian Independent Refinery at a cost of 3.5 mln dlrs.
    The system transfers crude and fuel oils from tankers to
the refinery's tank farm and carries refined products to ships
for export, PRI said.
    Company chairman Robert G. Reed said the new mooring system
will permit 24-hour service in most kinds of weather and will
reduce ship turnaround time. He said the mooring is the first
of its kind in the U.S.
    The new system can accomodate vessels up to 150,000
deadweight tons, or one mln barrels of cargo, PRI said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5683>
The Senate budget committee sits
down tomorrow to start drafting a fiscal 1988 budget, with the
budget writers expected to look at several proposals for fuel
taxes and other tax options to cut the budget.
    In a briefing book for the drafting sessions, a number of
revenue raising tax options are proposed, including a five dlrs
a barrel fee on domestic and imported oil, a fee just on
imported oil, and a broad based tax on domestic energy
consumption based on five pct of value.
    Other proposals include various excise taxes and
combinations of import surcharges or tariffs, including a 10
pct import across the board import surcharge that would raise
22 billion dlrs next year alone, more in later years.
    The committee, however, will only include revenue numbers
in its proposed budget with the actual revenue decisions left
to the House and Senate tax-writing committees.
     The committee will draft a budget which its chairman, Sen
Lawton Chiles, a Florida Democrat, said he hopes would raise at
least 18 billion dlrs in revenues, or about half the minimum 36
billion dlr deficit reduction he has in mind.
    The House Budget Committee also plans to start drafting a
separate budget plan later this week, which would have to be
reconciled with the Senate version. The final budget would be
the fiscal 1988 spending and revenue blueprint.

 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5796>
A government study has concluded the
U.S. Will be dependent on oil from the middle east into the
next century and must take steps to reduce its vulnerability,
the New York Times said.
    The newspaper said the inter-agency government study found
a serious oil-dependency problem due to steadily falling
domestic production and rising demand for imported oil.
    The study concluded that by 1995 the U.S. Will be relying
on foreign countries for 50 pct of its oil, more than the peak
of 48 pct reached in 1977 and far above the 33 pct rate during
the 1973-74 Arab oil embargo.
    The U.S. Now imports about 38 pct of its oil needs, up from
27 pct a year ago, the New York Times said.
    It said recommendations sent to the White House by Energy
Secretary John Harrington include financial incentives to raise
domestic oil production by one mln barrels a day from the
current 8.4 mln barrels.
    The newspaper said the administration has placed increased
emphasis on stockpiling oil reserves. It said the view now held
is that the Strategic Petroleum Reserve to be tapped in times
of shortages, should be increased by 100,000 barrels a day,
rather than 35,000 as called for in the 1988 budget.
   The newspaper said Harrington may propose restoring the
depletion allowance to major producers.
    "The administration also plans to renew its efforts to
...Repeal the windfall profits tax, remove bars to drilling on
the outer continental shelf and repeal the law that limits the
use of natural gas in industrial and utility boilers," it added.
    The New York Times quoted Senator Don Nickles of Oklahoma
as saying the study greatly underestimated potential U.S.
Demand for imported oil in the next decade and overestimated
the amount of domestic oil which would be produced.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5852>
Norway's parliament has approved an
extensive trade ban against South Africa but left shipowners a
key loophole through which controversial oil shipments on
Norwegian tankers may continue, government officials said.
    The unilateral boycott gives domestic companies until late
September to cut trade ties with South Africa and Namibia.
    Although forbidding crude oil shipments to South Africa on
Norwegian-owned tankers, the boycott makes a crucial exception
for ships whose final destination is decided while at sea. As
oil cargoes are often resold after loading, critics said the
door will be left open for continued shipments to South Africa.
    Norwegian tankers supplied South Africa with about 30 pct
of its crude oil imports during the early 1980s, but the trade
has dropped sharply to just one cargo in the last three months,
trade ministry officials said.
    The latest trade figures show Norwegian imports from South
Africa dropped 36 pct to 160 mln crowns during the first eight
months of 1986, while exports plunged 52 pct to 265 mln crowns
from the year-ago figure.
    The boycott legislation now goes to the upper house for
formal ratification later this week, parliamentarians said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5866>
A Cypriot tanker was set ablaze in the
Persian Gulf yesterday after an Iranian gunboat fired missiles
at it, shipping sources quoting reports from Japanese tankers
said today.
    No casualties were seen and the tanker Pivot, laden with
crude oil, was towed towards Dubai by tugs after they put out
the fire, the sources said.
    Iranian gunboats usually check a ship's nationality and
cargo before attacking but the Pivot was hit near Bu Musa
island without warning, they added.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6023>
Analyst Sanford Margoshes of Shearson
Lehman Brothers said he recommended a number of oil stocks
today now that it is apparent that OPEC has succeeded in
holding to its prescribed production quotas.
    "It is clear that OPEC, through jawboning and quota
restraint, will boost the price of oil," Margoshes said.
    Prices of oil stocks rose sharply today in response to
higher oil prices and optimism about OPEC quotas. Margoshes
said he recommends Imperial Oil &lt;IMO.A>, up 1/2 to 49-1/8,
Standard Oil Co &lt;SRD>, 7/8 to 62-3/4, Exxon &lt;XON> one to
83-1/8, and Chevron &lt;CHV> 1-1/8 to 54-7/8.
    In addition, Margoshes said he recommended Atlantic
Richfield &lt;ARC> on a short-term basis, though he said he is
still suspect about its debt situation. Atlantic Richfield rose
1-3/4 to 77.
    He said "the market could come down to test the 16 dlr a
barrel level again, but the main thrust of investing in oil is
positive right now. Before the year is out we will see higher
oil prices."
    He noted that belief that the government is interested in
raising the strategic reserves is factored into the rise in oil
stocks today.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6060>
Exxon Corp, the world's largest oil
company, said in a published interview today that it was
reviewing its worldwide refinery operations and might decide to
close on of its french refineries.
    Lee R. Raymond, Exxon's new president, singled out the
possibility of a closure of one of Exxon's refineries in France
during the interview.
    An Exxon spokeswoman confirmed that Raymond had
specifically mentioned refineries in France but said that no
specific refinery had been named. She also said that all of
Exxon's opertations were under constant review.
    Exxon currently has two refineries in France, FOS in the
mediterranean with a capcity of 175,000 barrels per day and
Port Jerome west of paris with a similar capacity.
    Petroleum Intelligence Weekly, an influential trade
journal, said, in its current issue, that they understood that
Exxon was looking at the possibility of refinery closures in
Antwerp, Southern France or possibly Italy.
    Paul Mlotok, oil analyst with Salomon Brothers inc said
that with the closures Exxon made in 1986 in Europe and the
improvement in the European refining situation, its future
profits there should be good.
    "Exxon and other major oil companies have closed a bunch of
refineries in Europe, upgraded the rest and shaken many of the
indepedents out of the market. Now with demand for products
rising and efficient operations, Exxon should show superior
earnings," Mlotok said.
    "Just after Royal Dutch &lt;RD>, they are seen as one of the
highest grade refiners in Europe," he added.
    Industry sources said that the oil companies were likely to
feel greater pressure on their operations in Southern Europe
where competition from the OPEC countries is increasing as
these producers move further into downstream operations.
    PIW said that refiners in the Mediterranean can expect
increased shipments from Saudi Arabia and other OPEC export
refineries.
    PIW said "sales from Libya, Algeria and elsewhere are
expected to reclaim markets lost to Italian and other European
refiners as a result of the abundance of cheap netback oil last
year."
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6086>
Two new U.K. Tax relief measures for oil
producers, announced today, are aimed at encouraging
developments in the North Sea to go ahead and boost
opportunities for the offshore supplies industry, the Inland
Revenue said in a post-budget statement.
    Earlier, Chancellor of the Exchequer Nigel Lawson announced
in his annual budget to Parliament that from today, companies
will be allowed to offset up to 10 pct of qualifying
development expenditure on certain future oil fields against
Petroleum Revenue Tax (PRT).
    To date, full relief was allowed for expenditure on an
individual field itself, when its income stream began, but was
not immediately available against other development
expenditure, the statement said.
    The new relief will apply to fields outside the southern
basin for which development
consent is first given on or after today, and will improve the
post-tax economics of new developments and encourage companies
to proceed with project which might have been delayed, it said.
    Lawson also announced that he would henceforth allow
certain expenditure on oil related research which does not at
present qualify for PRT relief to be offset against PRT
liability.
    This means oil-related expenditure in the U.K. Or on the
U.K. Continental shelf, which has not become allowable in a
particular field within three years of being incurred, to be
allowed against PRT liability in any oil field, the Inland
Revenue said.
    This brings the scope of PRT relief for research costs more
in line with corporation tax relief measures, and is planned to
encourage general research into ways of reducing field
development costs, it said.
    In due course, the industry should benefit by over 100 mln
stg a year, it calculated.
    The Inland Revenue statement also included other technical
measures that Lawson did not comment on in his budget speech.
    These included measures to allow companies to balance their
shares of PRT-exempt oil allowances through reallocation in two
past periods of allowance utilisation.
    Tidier rules on incorrectly allowed PRT expenditure reliefs
were announced, while there were also ammendments on rules on
corporation tax and Advance Corporation Tax relating to the
so-called "ring fence" of activities in the U.K. And its
continental shelf. The Finance Bill will have provisions for
the implementation of measures announced in November, it said.
    Gareth Lewis Davies, a North Sea expert with stockbrokers
Wood Mackenzie and Co Inc in Edinburgh, thought the two reliefs
on PRT would help the depressed offshore industry.
    He said the 10 pct cross field allowance relief would
favour chances that development of smaller North Sea fields
such Osprey, Don and Arbroath would be brought forward.
    Early development of the larger Miller and Bruce oil fields
might also be encouraged, he said.
    Lewis Davies said the measure might also aid the offshore
construction industry, which suffered a huge amount of lay-offs
under the price slump of more than 50 pct last year.
    He pointed out that the relief only applies to the
development of new fields outside the Southern Basin.
    This means more jobs could be created, as the fields in the
central and northern sectors of the North Sea are deeper than
in the south and thus have greater capital and labour
requirements as the waters are deeper than in the south.
    He said the PRT relief for certain research expenditure
would help fundamental research in the oil industry, although
the benefits of this research would not be seen for several
year.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6111>
Plains Resources Inc said that as
of December 31, its estimated proved oil and gas reserves rose
by 27 pct to 5.43 mln barrels from 4.27 mln barrels and proved
developed reserves rose 16 pct to four mln barrels from 3.45
mln barrels a year ago.
    The company said its year end reserves did not include the
oil and gas reserves of Houston Oil Fields Co which recently
agreed to merge with it, pending shareholder approval in
mid-April. If approved, the merger will add another 3.2 mln
barrels to the company's reserve base.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6119>
A White House-ordered report said 
that growing U.S. reliance on foreign oil into the year 2000
could have potentially damaging implications for national
security.
    The Energy Department study discusses several options to
curb reliance on foreign oil, but makes no recommendations.
    President Reagan and most Congressmen have previously ruled
out a tax on foreign oil as a way to curb imports and to help
the depressed domestic oil industry.
    Energy Secretary John Herrington said in a statement that
"although we have made gains in energy security in the last six
years, this report shows that there is justification for
national concern both over declining competitiveness of our
domestic oil and gas industry and over rising oil imports."
    The report said imports last year were 33 pct of U.S.
consumption and by the mid-1990s could rise to 50 pct.
    Among the report's options to ease U.S. reliance on foreign
oil are several already advocated by the Reagan Administration.
    President Reagan ordered the study last September, citing a
determination that the country never again become captive to a
foreign oil cartel, referring to the OPEC-led oil shortages and
sharp prices increases of the 1970s.
    The report said an import fee would raise prices and help
make it economical for U.S. oil firms to find and produce new
oil, as well as to cut imports, but on the whole the tax would
depress the nation's economy.
 reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6125>
an eventual oil import fee in the
united states will make no difference to champlin petroleum
corp's joint venture agreement signed today with petroleos de
venezuela (pdvsa), champlin chairman william adams said.
    "this was an aspect which was discussed at length during the
negotiations, but we can say our contract covers all
eventualities in this regard," he told reuters during the
signing ceremony here.
    Venezuela's energy and mines minister arturo hernandez
grisanti earlier described the agreement, under which pdvsa
buys 50 pct of champlin's corpus christi refinery, as "one more
step in the maturation and presence of our oil industry in
world markets."
   union pacific chairman william cook said the agreement will
be beneficial to both sides, combining a secure source of
supply with a modern refinery and access to markets.
    "we are looking to a long-term relationship, and at a time
of protectionist tendencies in the U.S. Congress there are
clear benefits to both sides," he said.
    Adams said pdvsa crude would remain competitive even with
an oil import fee because champlin had invested heavily over
the years in adapingthe texas refinery to process venezuelan
heavy crudes with coking and hydro-treating facilities and
obtain a competitive product yield.
    "therefore while the danger of an oil import fee has been a
consideration in the negotiations, and it remains to be seen
what such a fee would represent, we do not foresee any impact
on today's agreement," adams said.
    He said the refinery could run crude as heavy as
venezuela's bolivar coastal field (bcf) 17 api without any
difficultiesand would probably move over time to a heavier diet
to take advantage of bigger margins.
    The refinery has a capacity to process up to 110,000 bpd of
venezuelan high sulphur content heavy crude, with an 80-85 pct
yield of white products.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6163>
Energy Secretary John Herrington
said he may recommend to the White House that the domestic oil
industry be given tax benefits to help it produce more oil and
head off increasing U.S. dependence on foreign oil.
    He said also at a news conference that he would recommend
to the White House that the fill rate of the Strategic
Petroleum Reserve be increased from its planned 35,000 barrels
per day.
    The oil reserve fill rate capacity is 100,000 barrels a
day.
    Herrington said he had always advocated a greater fill rate
for the petroleum reserve, but the rate had been kept down
because of budgetary constraints.
    Herrington did not disclose what tax incentives he might
advocate, but U.S. officials have shown interest in tax
benefits for oil and gas exploration and for research and
development into new ways to extract oil which is now
considered uneconomical to produce.
    He made the remarks in conjunction with the release of the
Energy Department's study on oil's impact on national security.
    Herrington said that before he disclosed what
recommendations for tax benefits for the oil and gas industry
he might make, he would raise the matter with the White House
Economic Policy Committee to see if the proposals to increase
oil production made good tax policy.
    He said he would like to increase U.S. production by one
mln barrels a day.
    The report said that by the end of the century the United
States may be relying on foreign sources for 50 pct of its oil
consumption, posing a serious economic and national security
threat.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6166>
Wainco Oil Corp said it has completed a
wildcat well on its GrandMarais prspect in Jefferson Davis
Parish, La., which is currently producing at a rate of 1.1 mln
cubic feet of gas and 40 barrels of condensate daily.
    The company said it has a 20 pct working interest in the
well which is flowing from Lower Frion Tweedel Sand
perforations between 10,104 and 10,110 feet. Additional
untested but possibly productive zones exist behind the pipe,
it added. It said the remaining owners are privately held
petroleum companies.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6169>
A White House-ordered report said 
that growing U.S. reliance on foreign oil into the year 2000
could have potentially damaging implications for national
security.
    The Energy Department study discusses several options to
curb reliance on foreign oil, but makes no recommendations.
    President Reagan and most Congressmen have previously ruled
out a tax on foreign oil as a way to curb imports and to help
the depressed domestic oil industry.
    Energy Secretary John Herrington said in a statement that
"although we have made gains in energy security in the last six
years, this report shows that there is justification for
national concern both over declining competitiveness of our
domestic oil and gas industry and over rising oil imports."
    The report said imports last year were 33 pct of U.S.
consumption and by the mid-1990s could rise to 50 pct.
    Among the report's options to ease U.S. reliance on foreign
oil are several already advocated by the Reagan Administration.
    President Reagan ordered the study last September, citing a
determination that the country never again become captive to a
foreign oil cartel, referring to the OPEC-led oil shortages and
sharp prices increases of the 1970s.
    The report said an import fee would raise prices and help
make it economical for U.S. oil firms to find and produce new
oil, as well as to cut imports, but on the whole the tax would
depress the nation's economy.
    The study was outlined in a New York Times report today.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6177>
OPEC believes world oil prices should
be set around a fixed average price of 18 dlrs a barrel, OAPEC
Assistant General Secretary Abdelaziz Al-Wattari said today.
    In a speech to a European Community (EC)/OAPEC/OPEC seminar
in Luxembourg released here, Al-Wattari said: "OPEC believes
...The world energy trade should be kept without restrictions
and should be built around a fixed average price of 18 dlrs."
    But he warned that defense of the 18 dlr a barrel level had
caused hardship for OPEC countries, who had been forced to
curtail production, and he warned that such cutbacks by OPEC
states could not be sustained in some cases.
    "For OPEC to stabilize the world oil price at what is now
considered the optimal level of 18 dlrs a barrel, its member
countries have had to undergo severe hardship in curtailing
production," Al-Wattari said.
    "Such cutbacks ... Cannot, in certain cases, be sustained,"
Al-Wattari said. As well as financial and marketing pressures,
some states depended on associated gas output for domestic use
and oil cutbacks had left insufficient gas supplies, he added.
    Al-Wattari noted that total OPEC output was below the
organization's agreed ceiling for all member countries in
February, although this had meant sacrifices.
    The effect of these sacrifices meant that market stability,
though restored to a good level, was still under pressure,
Al-Wattari said. "A lasting stability in the world market
requires a wider scope of international cooperation," he added.
    He said some non-OPEC oil producing countries had shown a
political willingness after 1986 to cooperate with OPEC.
    But although cutbacks announced by these states were
politically significant and welcomed by OPEC, they were
insufficient in terms of volume, he added. "The overall majority
of non-OPEC producers have not responded sufficiently to OPEC's
calls for supply regulation," he said.
    Al-Wattari said an 18 dlr a barrel price was optimal as it
allowed investment in the oil industry outside OPEC to
continue, while not generating excessive cash flow for
otherwise unviable high-cost areas outside OPEC. Such a price
would no longer encourage protectionist measures, he added.
    Fadhil Al-Chalabi, OPEC Deputy Secretary General, also
addressing the seminar, added that discipline was still needed
to prevent violent fluctuations in the oil market.
    Cooperation between Arab states and Europe was advantageous
for both sides, Al-Chalabi said, adding he hoped cooperation
would ultimately lead to full-fledged Euro-Arab dialogue.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6184>
Venezuela has still to work out final
details of its plan to supply Ecuador with 50,000 barrels per
day of crude oil to compensate that country for lost exports
caused by earthquake damage, a senior Petroleos de Venezuela
(PDVSA) official said.
    "We have yet to finalize details on how the compensation
will be carried out and how OPEC production quotas will be
affected," he said during the signing of a joint venture deal
with Union Pacific Corp today.
    He said an agreement was initialled on a visit last week by
Ecuador's deputy energy minister Fernando Santos Alvite.
    He pointed out that there are some contractual points to be
considered. Venezuela, possibly unique among oil exporters,
requires its clients to sign final destination clauses to
ensure its oil is not resold on the spot market.
    Ecuador's oil minister Javier Espinosa was quoted today as
saying Venezuela will export the oil on Ecuador's account and
remit the revenues to Quito. Ecuador would pay back the oil at
a rate of 35,000 bpd.
    He said Venezuela's oil would be traded through Ecuadorean
state oil company Cepe, but the PDVSA official said the company
never allows third parties to trade its oil.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6201>
The U.K. Government forecasts that oil
revenues will fall to four billion stg in the fiscal year
1987/88, from 4.75 billion in 1986/87 and 11.5 billion in
1985/86.
    The forecast came in the Treasury's Financial Statement and
Budget Report issued after the Chancellor of the Exchequer
Nigel Lawson's annual budget statement to parliament.
    The government is assuming the price of oil will average 15
dlrs a barrel, in line with its earlier forecasts, and its oil
revenue calculation is based on an exchange rate remaining
close to current levels, the Treasury document said.
    The Treasury said the 1987/88 oil revenue shortfall will
reflect the oil price fall of 1986, as North Sea corporation
tax is paid after a time lag.
    The statement calculated that a one dlr a barrel difference
in oil prices this year will change revenue by about 350 mln
stg for the current fiscal year, and 400 mln stg in a full
year.
    Oil production is forecast to fall slightly in 1987,
according to the statement. A change in one mln tonnes in
production would alter revenue by about 45 mln stg in 1987/88
and 50 mln stg in a full year, it added.
    Total general government receipts for 1986/87 are now
estimated to be 159.2 billion stg, 2.75 billion more than the
1986 Budget forecasts and above the Autumn Statement forecasts,
despite a shortfall of 1.25 billlion in oil receipts.
    Additional non-North Sea corporation tax of 1.75 billion
stg and VAT of 750 mln stg account for the bulk of the
overshoot.
    Total general government receipts were forecast to rise to
168.8 billion stg in fiscal 1987/88, and among the main items,
besides diminishing oil revenues, were projected income tax of
40 billion stg, up from 38.4 billion in the current year.
    Non-North Sea corporation tax is forecast to bring in 13.5
billion stg in 1987/88, after the revised 11.2 billion in
1986/87, and VAT revenue should amount to 23.3 billion,
compared with upwardly revised estimated 21.5 billion this
fiscal year.
    The general government expenditure for the coming fiscal
year is expected to total 173.5 billion stg, up from a revised
164.9 billion in the current year.
    A repayment of 800 mln on public corporations' market and
overseas borrowings is forecast to bring the total Public
Sector Borrowing Requirement down to 3.9 billion stg in
1987/88, from this year's revised 4.1 billion, the Treasury
said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6208>
OPEC believes world oil prices should
be set around a fixed average price of 18 dlrs a barrel, OAPEC
Assistant General Secretary Abdelaziz Al-Wattari said.
    In a speech to a European Community/OAPEC/OPEC seminar in
Luxembourg released here, Al-Wattari said, "OPEC believes ...the
world energy trade should be kept without restrictions and
should be built around a fixed average price of 18 dlrs."
    Al-Wattari noted that total OPEC output was below the
organization's agreed ceiling for all member countries in
February, although this had meant sacrifices. The effect of
these sacrifices meant that market stability, though restored
to a good level, was still under pressure, Al-Wattari said.
    "A lasting stability in the world market requires a wider
scope of international cooperation," he said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6264>
Sen. Pete Domenici, a main sponsor
of legislation to set an oil import fee, said the
administration's energy security report was based on flawed
economic assumptions.
    The New Mexico Republican said the report did not take into
account the last few weeks' drop in domestic oil production in
its statement that an oil fee would raise prices for consumers.
The report said a decline in economic growth as a result of the
fee would reduce tax revenues. "A five dlr (per barrel) oil
import fee will provide the stimulus to create jobs and
investment, " and raise revenues, he said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6301>
Distillate fuel stocks held in
primary storage fell by 7.35 mln barrels in the week ended
March 13 to 112.74 mln barrels from a revised 120.09 mln the
previous week, the American Petroleum Institute (API) said.
    In its weekly statistical bulletin, the oil industry trade
group said gasoline stocks fell 2.89 mln barrels to 248.44 mln
barrels from a revised 251.33 mln, and crude oil stocks dropped
4.39 mln barrels to 325.13 mln from a revised 329.52 mln.
    It said residual fuel stocks fell 250,000 barrels to 35.73
mln from 35.98 mln barrels.
    API said refinery runs in the week rose to 11.80 mln
barrels per day (bpd) from a revised 11.70 mln and refinery use
of operating capacity was 75.7 pct, up from a revised 75.0 pct.
    Crude oil imports in the week rose to 3.66 mln bpd from a
revised 2.67 mln, API added.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6348>
Kuwaiti Oil Minister Sheikh Ali
al-Khalifa al-Sabah said in a newspaper interview that no OPEC
member was exceeding oil production quotas allocated by the
13-nation group.
    Sheikh Ali told Kuwait's daily al-Anba "All OPEC states,
without exception, are producing within the quotas allocated to
them. Some of them are producing less."
    Some oil industry sources had said the United Arab
Emirates, which had been generally been producing over its
quota since OPEC returned to quotas last September, was still
pumping more than its allotted amount in the first months of
this year.
    Ecuador had also publicly stated it was over its quota, but
an earthquake early this month stopped that. Iraq has rejected
its quota, but oil sources say it may be having problems
marketing at official prices all the oil it wants to sell.
    OPEC agreed in December to cut overall oil production by
7.25 pct to 15.8 mln barrels per day (bpd) for the first six
months of this year and abide by fixed prices around 18 dlrs a
barrel from February 1.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6404>
Iraq said its warplanes hit two ships
off the Iranian coast in attacks last night and early today.
    The planes "dealt accurate and effective blows to both
maritime targets before they returned safely to base," a
military spokesman told the Iraqi new agency INA.
    There was no immediate confirmation of the attacks from
Persian Gulf shipping sources.
    The last confirmed Iraqi attack on shipping was on March 8,
when an Iranian tanker was hit by a missile south of Iran's
Kharg island oil export terminal.
    Gulf shipping sources yesterday reported an Iranian warship
had set the Cypriot supertanker Pivot on fire with a missile.
    They said there were no injuries on board and the ship
headed for the Gulf Emirate of Fujairah under its own power
after the fire was put out.
    The Pivot was the 18th ship hit this year in the maritime
extension of the 6-1/2 year-old Iran-Iraq war.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6413>
Texaco Refining and Marketing, an
operating subsidiary of Texaco Inc, said it would cease to post
crude oil prices for West Texas crudes at the end of this month
following a decision to discontinue purchase of crude oil from
leases, a Texaco spokesman in Houston said.
    But it will continue to purchase quantities of U.S. and
foreign crude oil for use in its refinery system, he added.
     The spokesman also said Texaco Trading and Transport Inc
would continue to acquire and market Texaco lease production as
well as other lease production. The company will continue to
post a Louisiana price, it said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6432>
Malaysia's state oil company Petronas
will cut oil production to 420,000 barrels per day (bpd) from
May 1, trade sources said.
    Malaysia cut its 510,000 bpd target output by 10 pct last
September to support Opec moves to boost prices, and the latest
cut would reduce output by 17.5 pct from 1986's target level.
    Petronas said in February that Malaysia would maintain its
10 pct production cutback until mid-1987.
    However, the Finance Ministry said in its annual report
that Malaysia's crude oil output was expected to rise to an
average 510,000 bpd in 1987.
    The ministry's forecast assumed average 1987 crude prices
at 13 dlrs/barrel (bbl), but prices have risen enough to permit
further production cutbacks, the sources said.
    Malaysia's benchmark Tapis blend fetched above 18 dlrs/bbl
this year against a low of 10.50 dlrs/bbl in July, they said.
    Traders said further reductions by Malaysia would add to
the tight spot availabilities of Asian grades caused by reduced
Indonesian and Chinese crude output.
    The cutback will also help Malaysia maintain prices, as
there is concern some buyers want to reduce term purchases due
to the availability of cheaper alternatives, the sources said.
    In addition to term sales, Petronas has been offering two
to three 400,000 bbl spot cargoes of Malaysian crude each month
for sale through tender, the sources said.
    However, this practice is likely to dwindle given the
reduced scale of production, they said.
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6578>
Energy Secretary John Herrington
said he believes the Reagan Administration will review its
decision to cut the fill rate of the Strategic Petroleum
Reserve because of a department report issued yesterday warning
of growing U.S. dependence on oil imports.
    "As part of this study, I think the Administration will
take the fill rate under review," Herrington said at a House
Energy subcommittee hearing.
    The Administration has proposed cutting the fill rate from
75,000 barrels of oil per day to 35,000 bpd in fiscal year 1988
to save money.
    "My personal feeling is that is too low. I favor the
maximum fill rate (of 100,000 bpd)," Herrington said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6598>
The White House said a proposal for
a tax break for the oil industry would undergo review.
    Spokesman Marlin Fitzwater said President Reagan had no
position on recommendations submitted by Energy Secretary John
Herrington to encourage investment in the hard hit domestic oil
industry.
    But Fitzwater noted that Reagan did have a fundamental
objection to tax rises and special tax breaks.
    He said that even though Herrington's recommendation did
not agree with existing policy, "We'll take a look at it."
    The review will be undertaken by the president's Domestic
Policy Council.
    Herrington's proposal was reported by the Washington Post
to have been made in a letter to Reagan submitting a study that
found the United States would be importing half of its oil by
the 1990s, threatening U.S. national security.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6606>
Energy Secretary John Herrington
said he will propose tax incentives to increase domestic oil
and natural gas exploration and production to the Reagan
Administration for consideration.
    "These options boost production, while avoiding the huge
costs associated with proposals like an oil import fee,"
Herrington told a House Energy subcommittee hearing. "It is my
intention to submit these proposals to the domestic policy
council and the cabinet for consideration and review."
    He said proposals, including an increase in the oil
depletion allowance and repeal of the windfall profits tax,
should be revenue neutral and promote domestic production at
the least cost to the economy and the taxpayers.
    "The goal of the Administration policies is to increase
domestic production. I would like to shoot for one mln barrels
a year."
    The proposals were based on a DOE study released yesterday
warning the United States was threatened by a growing
dependence on oil imports.
    "We project free world dependence on Persian Gulf oil at 65
pct by 1995," Herrington said.
    He said it was too soon to say what the Administration
policy on oil tax incentives would be and indicated there would
be opposition to tax changes.
    "Of course, to move forward with these kinds of options
would require reopening tax issues settled last year (in the
tax reform bill) -- an approach which has not, in general, been
favored by the administration. I think what we need is to
debate this within the Administration," he said.
    He said the proposals might raise gasoline prices.
    Herrington did not specifically confirm a report in today's
Washington Post that he had written to President Reagan urging
an increase in the oil depletion allowance.
    Asked about the report by subcommittee members, Herrington
said various proposals were under consideration and would be
debated within the Administration to determine which would have
the most benefits at the least cost.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6652>
Iraq said its warplanes had hit a
vessel in the Gulf off the Iranian coast today, the third in
the past 24 hours.
    A military spokesman told the Iraqi news agency INA the
latest attack was at 1250 GMT. It earlier reported strikes at
0650 GMT and at 1930 GMT last night. The planes "dealt accurate
and effective blows" to the targets and returned safely to base.
    There was no immediate confirmation of the attacks from
Gulf shipping sources. The last confirmed Iraqi attack was on
on March 8, when an Iranian tanker was hit by a missile south
of Iran's Kharg island oil export terminal.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6656>
The drastic cutbacks in U.S. drilling
last year are rapidly deflating the United State's natural gas
bubble, which could bring spot shortages in gas supplies next
winter and a modest recovery in the oilpatch, industry analysts
said.
    Faltering deliverability of natural gas, a commodity that
is difficult and costly to import in large quantities, could
more than double the current U.S. rig count to near 2,000 by
1990, some analysts said.
    The need to lock in future supplies of gas for utilities
and big industrial customers may also bring a resurgence of
activity in the Gulf of Mexico's offshore waters where some of
the nation's largest gas reserves are located.
    "We think an upturn in U.S. drilling is imminent," said
James Crandall, an analyst with Salomon Brothers Inc. "Many
companies appear to be switching from oil to gas drilling
because they're betting that the gas market will be back in
balance in a year or two."
    The prospect of diminishing gas supplies is welcome news
for drilling and oilfield service companies that barely
survived last year's plunge in oil prices from about 30 dlrs a
barrel to less than half that. Today's relatively stable oil
prices of about 18 dlrs a barrel are not enough to spur a
return to the heady days of 1981 when the U.S. drilling rig
count soared to a record high of more than 4,500 and oilfield
roustabouts commanded premium wages.
    The latest weekly Hughes Tool Co &lt;HT> rig count, a
barometer of the oil industry's health, showed 761 U.S. rigs
active in what is traditionally the slowest time of the year.
    In 1986, the Hughes rig count began the year at 1,915 but
dived to a post-World War II low of 663 in July as world oil
prices experienced the sharpest decline in recent times.
    Ike Kerridge, a Hughes economist, said "In 1986, the United
States replaced only about 40 pct of the gas it used and that
replacement rate won't be any better this year."
    He added, "We don't have the options we do with oil.
Imports of gas from Canada are limited by pipeline capacity and
importing liquefied natural gas on ships will not be feasible
in the next 10 years because of the cost."
    Only about 6 trillion cubic feet of additional gas reserves
were discovered last year while U.S. consumption approached 16
trillion cubic feet, according to industry estimates.
    George Gaspar, an oil analyst with Robert W. Baird and Co
agreed that the need for gas supplies would set the stage for a
new cycle of gradual increases in U.S. drilling.
    "We anticipate that natural gas pipelines will need to
dedicate to their systems new gas reserves for 1989 and 1990
supplies. That means new drilling programs must begin no later
than mid-1988," Gaspar said.
    Gasper said he sees a new drilling cycle emerging that
could last until 1992 and that he expects the average rig count
to peak near 2,000 in December of 1989.
    Much of the search for new gas reserves is likely to be
conducted in the offshore waters of the Gulf of Mexico, where
federal leases on unexplored areas will revert back to the
government unless drilling begins in the next two or three
years. Some of the industry's biggest companies, such as Exxon
Corp &lt;XON>, Mobil Corp MOB, and Union Texas Petroleum have
already indicated plans to increase spending for drilling later
this year in the Gulf of Mexico, Crandall said.
    For example, Conoco Inc, a Dupont &lt;DD> subsidiary, will
spend 400 mln dlrs to build the Gulf of Mexico's deepest
production platform, which will produce 50 mln cubic feet of
gas per day.
    But T. Boone Pickens, who has acquired huge Texas and
Kansas gas reserves for his Mesa Limited Partnership &lt;MLP> in
recent months, is not convinced that the drilling industry is
on the verge of a recovery.
    Pickens predicts the U.S. rig count will soon drop below
600 and will not increase significantly until oil prices do.
    "The rigs won't go back to work until the price of oil gets
above 30 dlrs a barrel," said Pickens, 58, adding he did not
expect to see the rig count top 2,000 again in his lifetime.
    Tenneco Inc &lt;TGT>, one of the largest U.S. gas producers,
is skeptical that a need for additional gas drilling exists.
    Tenneco vice president Joe Foster said he did not expect
significant increases in drilling for gas until the early 1990s
when the U.S. gas reserves life will have declined to about
seven years' supply. Current spot market prices of about 1.50
dlrs per thousand cubic feet will need to rise to about three
dlrs to spur reserve replacement, he said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6722>
The U.S. oil and gas industry is in
better health than it was a year ago, according to testimony
given to the Texas Railroad Commission at its annual state of
the industry hearing today.
     The Commission, which regulates the state's oil and gas
industry, heard testimony from a number of high-level company
executives reflecting a belief that the recent industry
downturn had bottomed out.
     "The attitude expressed here today so far is a great deal
more optimistic (than last year)," Commissioner James E. (Jim)
Nugent told Reuters.
     "It reflects their (the executives) belief that they are
seeing the bottom of the economic cycle," he added, "and with
just a few reasonable breaks this industry can begin to move
again."
     The energy industry was hard hit by the sharp drop in oil
prices, which fell from around 30 dlrs a barrel in late 1985 to
as low as 10 dlrs in mid-1986. Prices have since steadied to
around 18 dlrs a barrel.
     At the same time, a number of company executives testified
that the nation's domestic exploration and production segment
was still hurting and in need of government help.
     Production costs are considerably higher in the United
States than in such areas as the Middle East and as prices fell
many domestic producers were forced to shut down their
operations. Currently, there are only about 760 oil rigs
operating in the United States compared with an average of
nearly 2,000 in 1985.
     Citing a study released yesterday by the Department of
Energy, many said the falling production of domestic oil
coupled with increasing U.S. demand, was leading to a growing
dependency on imports, particularly from the politically
volatile Middle East.
     "In the U.S., 1986 petroleum production responded to lower
prices, increasing about 2.5 pct, or 400,000 barrels per day
(bpd)," said J.S. Simon, General Manager of the Supply
Department at Exxon Corp &lt;XON>, the nation's largest oil
company.
     At the same time, Simon said "U.S. oil production declined
by 300,000 bpd, the first decline in several years," and "net
petroleum imports were up 25 pct to 5.3 mln bpd."
     Noting that while oil prices were expected to remain
between 13 and 20 dlrs a barrel, depending on OPEC's ability to
control production, Simon said demand is expected to remain at
1986 levels, leading to "a significant amount of spare
worldwide production capacity, in excess of 10 mln bpd."
     He said the surplus capacity would lead to continued
volatility and called for "governmental and regulatory policies
in support of the domestic petroleum industry."
     Citing the costs recently imposed by the federal
government through the 1986 tax code changes and "Superfund"
legislation, Simon called for the repeal of the windfall
profits tax, total decontrol of natural gas and improved access
to federal lands for oil and gas exploration.
     Simon did not mention an oil import fee, which many in the
industry have called for as a way of building up the nation's
domestic operations before imports reach such a level that
national security might be compromised.
     In yesterday's report, the Energy Department said imports
could make up 50 pct of U.S. demand by 1995, adding that
Persian Gulf producers will provide as much as 65 pct of the
free world's total oil consumption by that date.
     Arguing that "oil is a political tool in every nation on
earth," Frank Pitts, chairman of &lt;Pitts Oil Co>, today called
for a variable oil import fee, among other measures, "before
the treacherous foothold of the Middle East is irreversible and
our national security is compromised."
     Royce Wisenbaker, Chairman of Wisenbaker Production Co,
agreed, saying that like many federal government programs that
were set up with good intentions, it would probably turn into a
"shambles."
     Wisenbaker added that he was optimistic for the future.
"For those of us who have managed to hold on, the worst is
over," he said.
     Roger Hemminghaus, President of Diamond Shamrock Refining
and Marketing Co, said he was "enthusiastic about the future,"
adding that he expected "an increase in profitability by
midyear."
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6742>
New England Electric System &lt;NES>
expects its cash construction spending to reach 205 mln dlrs
this year, up from 188 mln dlrs in 1986, the utility said in
material distributed at an analysts meeting.
    It said spending is expected to advance to 215 mln dlrs in
1988 and 220 mln dlrs in 1989.
    The utility said these totals exclude spending on New
England Hydro-Transmission being built to import electricity
from Quebec Hydro. New England Electric is the operator of this
venture as well as owning 51 pct of the project.
    The venture expects to spend 65 mln dlr this year, 105 mln
dlrs next year and 125 mln dlrs in 1989 to build transmission
lines from northern Quebec into New England, the utility said.
    New England Electric said internally generated funds will
cover all of its power plant construction costs this year and
65 pct of the 108 mln dlrs its retail distribution units plan
to spend in 1987.
    The company said it also expects to spend 60 mln dlrs on
its oil and gas activities this year, adding internally
generated funds are expected to provide 85 pct of this total.
    New England Electric said it plans to issue 30 mln dlrs
worth of pollution control bonds in 1987 and retire additional
higher cost preferred stock. Its Granite State Electric unit
plans to issue five mln dlrs of long term notes early this year
as well.
    The company said it does not plan to offer common shares
this year or in the foreseeable future, but expects to raise
about 40 mln dlrs in equity through the sale of stock under its
dividend reinvestment plan and employee share plans.
    President Samuel Huntington told the analysts the
construction spending projection is based on the expectation
that demand for electricity in the New England electric system
will grow about two pct a year for the next 15 years.
    However, the utility cannot ignore the potential for
sharper growth, he said, pointing out that demand was up 5.2
pct in 1986 and 4.7 pct per year in the past four years.
    He attributed this growth to declining electricity prices
and a strong New England economy.
    Huntington said New England Elecetric has "all but rejected
new coal fired plants" to supply additional power.
    He said the most attractive new power supplies are those
with short lead times which can be built in modules.
    Later, vice president Glenn Schleede said the utility is
looking at gas-fired, combined cycle generating units to supply
most of its new power needs, but has not rejected coal-fired
fluidized bed units.
    He explained that fluidized bed technology is available in
modular units, adding that Huntington was referring to the
traditional coal-fired plant which burns pulverized coal.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6746>
Energy Secretary John Herrington
said he will propose tax incentives to increase domestic oil
and natural gas exploration and production to the Reagan
Administration for consideration.
    "These options boost production, while avoiding the huge
costs associated with proposals like an oil import fee,"
Herrington told a House Energy subcommittee hearing. "It is my
intention to submit these proposals to the domestic policy
council and the cabinet for consideration and review."
    "The goal of the Administration policies is to increase
domestic production. I would like to shoot for one mln barrels
a day," he said.
    The proposals were based on a DOE study released yesterday
warning the United States was threatened by a growing
dependence on oil imports.
    "We project free world dependence on Persian Gulf oil at 65
pct by 1995," Herrington said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6760>
mexico's proven reserves of liquid
hydrocarbons at end-1986 were 70 billion barrels, slightly down
from 70.9 billion a year ago and 71.75 billion in 1984, the
state oil company petroleos mexicanos (pemex) announced.
    Reserves were just 5.77 billion barrels in 1974, rose
sharply to 40.19 billion in 1978 and flattened out at 72
billion in both 1981 and 1982.
    In its annual report, pemex said average crude output in
1986 was 2.43 mln barrels per day, 202,000 bpd down on 1985.
Average exports were 1.29 mln bpd, down from 1.44 mln bpd.
    The company did not say what percentage of hydrocarbons was
crude oil, but has previouly said it was about 48 pct.
    Natural gas output in 1986 was 3.43 billion cubic feet per
day, down from 3.6 billion in 1985.
    Due mainly to the fall in oil prices to around 12 dlrs from
25 dlrs in the year, 58 wells, both exploratory and production,
were suspended, 38 of them in less productive areas than the
offshore campeche fields which accounted for 64 pct of
production.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6791>
ESSO SAF &lt;ESSF.PA>, the French subsidiary
of Exxon Corp &lt;XON>, said it had no immediate plans to shut
down one of its two refineries. Exxon's new president Lee R.
Raymond said earlier that it could decide to close a French
refinery.
    An ESSO SAF spokesman said a closure was a hypothesis that
depended on the evolution of the market and refineries' ability
to make money. He said Port Jerome west of Paris and Fos sur
Mer on the Mediterranean had benefitted from new investment
over 1985-86 and had last year broken even after stock losses.
    The Port Jerome refinery has an annual production capacity
of seven mln tonnes while Fos sur Mer's is five mln, the
spokesman added.
    Industry sources said the easiest plant to dispose of would
be Fos sur Mer because it is a single refinery, while the Port
Jerome refinery is attached to a wider complex comprising a
petrochemical plant and a lubricant production plant.
    Raymond was quoted as saying in a published interview that
Exxon was reviewing its worldwide refinery operations and might
decide to close one of its French refineries.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6876>
The U.S. Congress and the oil industry
are deeply divided on ways the government should assist the
industry, hurt by the sharp fall in oil prices, and the
subsequent growth in oil imports, industry analysts said.
    "The industry is deeply divided between those who support an
oil tariff and those who believe tax incentives are better,"
said Daniel Yergin, director of Cambridge Energy Research
Associates, which recently completed a survey of the U.S.
Congress on energy issues.
    Yergin said he saw mounting support within Congress for tax
incentives rather than an oil tariff or import fee.
    Today U.S. Energy Secretary John Herington said he will
propose tax incentives to increase edomestic oil and natural
gas exploration and production to the Reagan Administration for
consideration. White House spokesman Marlin Fitzwater said the
proposal would be reviewed.
    Herrington said, "I would like to shoot for one mln barrels
a day (addition) to U.S. production." U.S. oil output was off to
8.4 mln bpd in the week of March 13, down six pct from last
year, the American Petroleum Institute said.
    Oil industry analysts have forecast oil prices to average
about 18 dlrs a barrel for the year and many believe that a
move above that level will be unlikey for the near term.
    Paul Mlotok, oil analyst for Salomon Brothers Inc said that
"even with the rise in prices for the last week or two we've
only altered our average price scenerio to about 17.50 dlrs for
the year."
    Analysts said that at that price renewed drilling and
exploration to reverse the decline in U.S. crude oil output
will not take place as the companies are waiting for stable
prices over 20 dlrs to renew exploration.
    John Lichtblau, president of the Petroleum Industry
Research Foundation Inc in New york in recent testimony to
Congress said "The continuing decline in U.S. oil production is
virtually inevitable under any realistic price scenario. But
the future rate of decline is very much a function of world oil
prices and U.S. government policy."
    Lichtbalu said that tax breaks could be used to raise oil
production but would only work over time.
    "Lowering the producing industry's tax burden would probably
be a slower stimulant (to output) than a price increase but
would not raise energy costs." Lichtblau said.
    But the small independent oil companies who do much of the
drilling in the U.S. are looking for the more immediate relief
which could be brought on by an oil import fee.
    Ronald Tappmeyer, president of the International
Association of Drilling Contractors, said, "The members of our
trade asssociation are convinced that only a variable oil
import fee that sets a minimum price trigger can protect our
nation." The association represents some 1,300 drilling and oil
service companies.
    The CERA survey of Congress shows that the oil import fee
will face a stiff uphill battle.
    Yergin said that the poll which was conducted in January by
a former Congressman, Orval Hansen, showed support for the oil
import fee from 22 pct of the Congressmen surveyed largely as a
means of protecting the domestic petroleum industry.
     At the same time 48 pct of the Congressmen surveyed
opposed the fee with the respondents saying the tariff would
hurt consumers and some regional interests.
    But 80 pct of the sample said support for a fee could grow
if production continued to fall and imports to rise.
    Yergin said that imports above 50 pct of U.S. requirements
"is a critical, symbolic level. If they (imports) move above
that level, a fee may not be legislated but there will
certainly be pressure for some form of action."
     But Lichtblau, in a telephone interview, said, "a 50 pct
rate of import dependency is not likely to happen before 1990.
    In 1986 U.S. oil imports rose to 33 pct of u.s. energy
requirements and shopuld be about 34 pct in 1987, he added.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6893>
U.S. oil demand as measured by
products supplied rose 2.3 pct in the four weeks ended March 13
to 16.49 mln barrels per day (bpd) from 16.11 mln in the same
period a year ago, the Energy Information Administration (EIA)
said.
    In its weekly petroleum status report, the Energy
Department agency said distillate demand was up 2.9 pct in the
period to 3.43 mln bpd from 3.33 mln a year earlier.
    Gasoline demand averaged 6.93 mln bpd, up 4.0 pct from 6.67
mln last year, while residual fuel demand was 1.31 mln bpd, off
7.9 pct from 1.42 mln, the EIA said.
    Domestic crude oil production was estimated at 8.36 mln
bpd, down 8.1 pct from 9.10 mln a year ago, and gross daily
crude imports (excluding those for the SPR) averaged 3.70 mln
bpd, up 24.8 pct from 2.96 mln, the EIA said.
    Refinery crude runs in the four weeks were 11.92 mln bpd,
up 1.0 pct from 11.80 mln a year earlier, it said.
    Year-to-date figures will not become available until March
26 when EIA's Petroleum Supply Monthly data for January 1987
becomes available, the agency said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6905>
Argentina's total oil and gas
production fell 9.4 pct in February to 2.78 mln cubic metres
from January's total of 3.11 mln cubic metres, the state oil
company Yacimientos Petroliferos Fiscales (YPF) reported.
    A YPF statement blamed the drop on momentary problems owing
to the summer season but gave no further details.
    February's production figure fell slightly short of YPF's
target figure of 2.90 mln cubic metres.
    Oil production totalled 1.76 mln cubic metres last month
and natural gas production 1.02 mln cubic metres, down from
1.95 and 1.15 mln cubic metres in January, respectively.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6913>
&lt;Canterra Energy Ltd> said it
will drill an exploratory well on the Scotian shelf, about 280
kilometers east-southeast of Halifax, Nova Scotia.
    Drilling will begin in late April 1987 in 61 meters of
water and will be drilled to a total depth of 3,500 meters,
Canterra said.
    Canterra will operate the well and has a 39 pct interest in
it. &lt;Petro-Canada Inc> has 26 pct, &lt;Trillium Exploration Corp>
has 20 pct and &lt;Nova Scotia Resources (Ventures) Ltd> has 15
pct.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6996>
Higher world oil prices, coupled with a
new realism ushered in by austerity, could lift Saudi Arabia's
economy after five years of falling revenue and growing budget
deficits, bankers and diplomats said.
    The months ahead will prove critical as the government
attempts a balancing act between defending higher oil prices
and fostering recovery through a bigger role for the private
sector.
    Economists said oil earnings could recover this year to
about 20 billion dlrs and nominal gross domestic product could
grow by about three pct, the first rise since 1982.
    But the economists said this will be possible only if the
Organisation of Petroleum Exporting Countries (OPEC) succeeds
in defending world oil prices and if Saudi Arabia is not forced
to curtail output for too long.
    Saudi Arabia is now keeping production down to defend
OPEC's newly-established 18 dlr a barrel benchmark price.
    Oil Minister Hisham Nazer told Reuters output is running at
about three mln barrels per day (bpd), well down on Saudi
Arabia's OPEC quota of 4.13 mln set for the first half of 1987.
    King Fahd has stamped his personal authority on OPEC's
new-found determination to defend prices in a move Western
diplomats believe underlines the kingdom's need to secure a
stable source of income for its economy.
    Saudi Arabia, still the world's largest oil exporter, is a
hugely wealthy country. But the past five years of declining
revenue have taken their toll. Economists estimate gross
domestic product fell 10 pct last year and 8.6 pct in 1985.
    Oil revenue last year, when prices briefly dipped below 10
dlrs per barrel, probably totalled no more than 17.5 billion
dlrs, compared to a peak 101.8 billion in 1981.
    "Austerity is still the watchword, but Saudi Arabia will not
be allowed to dip further into recession ... The Saudis can
afford to draw down reserves temporarily to offset the worst
effects," a diplomat said.
    In the short-term, the kingdom can lessen the impact of
lower oil revenues and a gaping budget deficit by drawing on
foreign reserves, still put at around 100 billion dlrs.
    But such a policy cannot be pursued indefinitely. Bankers
and diplomats said it would amount to fiscal recklessness in
the longer term.
    It also increases the dominance of the public sector at a
time when the government is publicly urging private enterprise
to take over the lead role in the economy.
    Bankers and diplomats said the government is well aware of
the risks attached to this policy but is determined to "tough it
out" on the oil front even if that means a short-term depletion
of reserves.
    The 1987 budget deficit is targetted at a huge 52.7 billion
riyals or 31 pct of total outlay. The budget explicitly
recognises the need to draw down reserves while foreign
borrowing has been ruled out.
    Commerce Minister Suleiman Abdulaziz al-Salim told Saudi
businessmen this week the government had carefully considered
the need to stimulate the economy when drawing up its budget
plans late last year.
    "It therefore took the bold step of withdrawing more than 50
billion riyals from its reserves and pumping it into the
economy," he said.
    Reserves were built up during the late 1970's and early
1980's when Saudi Arabia's breakneck pace of construction and
tales of high spending became legendary.
    The shrinking economy has wrought huge changes in the
fabric of the Kingdom's private sector where poor management
had gone unpunished in the easy days of the oil boom.
    Modern techniques of cost control have been introduced,
markets expanded and outsized labour forces and inventories cut
back. The expatriate workforce has fallen sharply.
    The number of new bankruptcies appears to be declining but
Saudi banks, hit hard by non-performing loans to the corporate
sector, have become highly selective in extending new credit.
    Government moves to encourage lending and investigate
company complaints about late public sector contract payments
could boost confidence but recession has slowed the nation's
industrialisation program and discouraged foreign investment.
    Private wealth is still very high and banks report more and
more cash being placed on deposit.
    As Saudi Arabia attempts to shift the weight of economic
development from the public to the private sector, one of the
biggest tasks will be to convince businessmen to channel
personal savings into industrial projects within the kingdom
and refrain from the temptation to invest abroad.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7067>
&lt;Canadian Roxy Petroleum Ltd>
said a new oil discovery in the Peerless Lake area of
north-central Alberta is capable of flowing at over 1,000
barrels of oil a day from a lower zone and more than 1,500
barrels a day from a separate upper zone.
    Canadian Roxy has a 35 pct interest in the five-year
royalty free well, known as the Canadian Roxy et Al Trout
A14-8-89-3 W5M. Texaco Canada Inc holds 25 pct, MLC Oil and Gas
Ltd 15 pct, Northstar Energy Corp 13.5 pct and Tricentrol Oils
Ltd 11.5 pct.
    Canadian Roxy said drilling has started on a follow-up
exploratory well about one mile northwest of the discovery
well.
    The company said it holds a net 6,500 acres in the vicinity
of the discovery and a seismic program is underway to evaluate
further drilling opportunities.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7097>
Energy Secretary John Herrington
said his proposed option to raise the oil depletion allowance
to 27.5 pct was probably the most economically promising way to
spur domestic production.
    The White House has said it would consider the option
although it was generally opposed to any revisions in the new
tax code.
    Herrington told a meeting of the Mid-Continent Oil and Gas
Association that the higher depletion allowance on new oil and
enhanced oil recovery would cost taxpayers about 200 mln dlrs a
year.
    The option was one of many contained in a report on oil and
the national security the Energy Department sent to the White
House on Tuesday.
    Herrington said of the increased depletion allowance
option: "that is one that could significantly increase
production at a very low cost to the American taxpayer."
    He again rejected an oil import fee as far too costly to
the overall U.S. economy.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7150>
Energy Secretary John Herrington
said he would rule out a tax on gasoline as one option to help
avert what his departmet has called the threat of increased
reliance on foreign oil in the coming years.
    He said at a news conference that any recommendation he
would make would have to increase domestic production, not
cause widespread economic hardship and have a minimal cost to
the U.S. taxpayer.
    On the grounds of increasing production, he said, "I would
rule out a gasoline tax."
    Herrington also repeated he would rule out an oil import
fee because of the widespread dislocation it would cause -- the
loss of about 400,000 jobs nationwide due to higher oil prices
and a drop in the gross national product by about 32 billion
dlrs.
    He said an increased depletion allowance, to 27.5 pct, on
new and enhanced production of oil and natural gas would be a
cheap way to spur domestic production.
    He estimated this cost at about 200 mln dlrs a year.
    Herrington proposed the increased depletion allowance to
the White House Tuesday but the White House reaction was cool.
    The White House said it would study the proposal, but was
generally oppposed to altering the national tax code, just
passed last year.
    Herrington, asked his reaction to the White House reaction,
said, "If I were the White House, I would be cool, too."
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7174>
Britoil Plc's &lt;BTOL.L> exploration
expenditure for the U.K. In 1987 was likely to be only about a
third of the level in 1986, though overseas expenditure would
remain approximately the same, Chief executive David Walker
said.
    He told reporters following the release of the company's
1986 figures that project expenditure would also remain at 1986
levels.
    U.K. Project expenditure in 1986 rose to 208 mln stg from
184 mln while exploration expenditure dropped to 87 mln from
156 mln. Overseas exploration fell to 28 mln from 58 mln in
1985.
    Earlier, Britoil posted a drop in pretax profit for 1986 to
134 mln stg from 759 mln in 1985, before an extraordinary
charge of 50 mln stg on the company's U.S. Assets. The results
were slightly better than analysts forecast and the share
firmed to 231p from 222p at last night's close. Chairman Sir
Philip Shelbourne said the collapse in the oil price in 1986
had made the period extremely difficult but the company had
come through remarkably well.
    Provided the recovery in oil prices was maintained, the
conditions would be right for a substantially improved
performance this year.
    He added that the firmness of oil prices in March, when
they were normally weaker, made him "a bit encouraged" about the
prospects for future levels.
    Walker added that Britoil would feel confident if the price
stayed within a band of 15 dlrs to 20 dlrs a barrel.
    Britoil had received some 100 responses to its announcement
of a desire to sell the assets and was asking for bids by the
latter part of April.
    End-year reserves rose to 603 mln barrels of oil compared
with 503 mln previously. However, Walker noted that this
included a revised definition of reserves.
    If 1985 figures were restated along the same lines, the
reserve figure would show a drop from 720 mln barrels
previously.
    Gas reserves also eased to 3,568 billion cubic feet from a
restated 3,660 billion.
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7287>
The American Petroleum Institute
said that U.S. crude oil production in February declined 9.8
pct from year-ago levels to about 8.3 mln barrels a day.
    In its monthly report on U.S. oil supplies and stocks, API
said that domestic demand for petroleum products, as measured
by products supplied, continued to rise reaching 16.3 mln
barrels a day in the month, up 1.5 pct from February 1986.
    API noted the drop in crude oil output coupled with a
drop in natural gas liquids production, which was off 11 pct
from February 1986 levels, represented a decline in U.S.
production of more than one mln barrels a day.
    API said the decline in domestic production and the rise in
demand brought petroleum imports to about six mln barrels a day
in February, a 30.3 pct increase from last year's level.
    So far this year, API said growth in domestic demand, which
was up 2.9 pct from last year's year-to-date level, has slowed
in comparison to the accelerated growth in the last half of
1986.
    It said crude oil production for the first two months of
1987 was off 8.6 pct from the comparable year-ago period while
crude imports were up 30.6 pct.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7355>
The "cross field allowance" relief on
Petroleum Revenue Tax (PRT) announced by U.K. Chancellor of the
Exchequer Nigel Lawson this week will favour smaller non-PRT
paying fields, according to stockbrokers Wood Mackenzie and Co.
    The cross field allowance offsets up to 10 pct of
qualifying spending on a new oil field against PRT liability of
other fields. It is restricted to new offshore developments
outside the southern basin and yet to gain Annex B approval.
    A report by the stockbrokers said that on a new field not
paying PRT due to its small size, the relief would directly
benefit in PRT saving on an existing field.
    "The cross field allowance will mainly benefit participators
in those fields which have no PRT liability," the report said,
adding that the timing of development of such fields may be
advanced.
    The government would in effect be subsidising these
developments at 7.5 pct of capital expenditure before
corporation tax, the report said.
    On fields likely to pay PRT in the future, the benefit is
of timing. Although liabilities on other existing fields will
be reduced immediately, liabilities on larger new fields will
rise in the future due to the loss of offsets, it said.
    In a study on probable fields, the report said that when
the rates of return are examined, the rise for a PRT-paying
field such as Miller, the largest undeveloped oil field in the
U.K. North Sea, is from 18.7 to 19 pct, while the rise for a
small non-PRT paying field such as Kittiwake is 15.9 to 17.9
pct.
    The report added that in fields which pay PRT, there will
be a cost in being able to have this early relief. Not only
will these costs be unavailable for offset against the field's
future profits, but uplift of some 35 pct on these costs will
be lost.
    Thus, a saving of PRT of 100 when field development starts
will have to be matched by a rise in PRT of 135 at a later
time.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7423>
Amoco Corp's petroleum liquids reserves
total 2.42 billion barrels at the end of 1986, down from 2.77
billion a year earlier, but its natural gas reserves increased
to 15.37 trillion cubic feet from 15.14 trillion, the company's
annual report said.
    It said the drop in crude oil and natural gas liquid
reserves reflected downward revisions of previous estimates
caused by the sharp drop in oil prices last year. This
accounted for 178 mln barrels of a worldwide downward revision
of 188 mln barrels, with 158 mln barrels of the total revision
occurring in the United States, the report said.
    Amoco said there were upward revisions in the size of its
worldwide gas reserves totalling 404 billion cubic feet last
year, while it discovered 568 billion cubic feet and purchased
298 billion cubic feet of reserves.
    Production of one trillion cubic feet offset much of these
gains, the report said.
    All of the gas reserve purchases, as well as all of the 14
mln barrels of oil reserves bought in 1986, were in the United
States, Amoco said, noting it has spent 1.1 billion dlrs to
acquire U.S. producing properties over the past three years.
    Commenting on 1987, Amoco said acquisitions "will be an
integral part of our strategy, should reserves become available
at attractive prices."
    The company said it expects "the marketing climate for
natural gas to improve in 1987, which should provide the
opportunity for Amoco to expand sales. As prices and demand
improve, we are poised to accelerate capital spending on our
inventory of attractive opportunities."
    Amoco previously announced a 1987 capital spending budget
of 3.2 billion dlrs. Such spending totaled 3.18 billion dlrs
last year, down from 5.31 billion in 1985.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7496>
The Andean Development Corp (CAF) said
today it is lending 11.7 mln dlrs to Ecuador to help repair 25
miles of oil pipeline destroyed by an earthquake earlier this
month.
    the loan was signed here today in the offices of the
caracas based caf by the corporation's president, galo montano
perez and ecuadorean ambassador antonio parra gil.
    the loan had originally been intended to finance an
expansion of the pipeline, but following the earthquake the
ecuadorean government asked for the terms to be changed so as
to permit their use in reconstruction.
    Ecuador expects oil production to be suspended for four
months as a result of the damage, and has asked Venezuela to
help by supplying 50,000 barrels per day while the pipeline is
repaired.
    The OPEC member has a production quota of 210,000 bpd but
has asked the organization to allow it to produce 310,000 bpd
once the repairs are completed so as to compensate the loss.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7529>
President Reagan said the United
States must do more to lessen its reliance on imported oil.
    President Reagan said during a nationally televised news
conference that the rising U.S. reliance on foreign oil is a
problem that the administration is studying.
    "We have to study this more," Reagan said. "This is why we
increased the Strategic (Petroleum) Reserve, but we have to do
more," he said.
    Reagan said his administration has already proposed
deregulating natural gas and eliminating the windfall profits
tax on crude oil production.
    However, he complained that Congress had not yet approved
those measures.
    The Department of Energy earlier this week released a
report that warned of rising U.S. reliance on foreign oil
imports at a time when domestic production is declining. It
suggested options for the administration to consider, but made
no specific recommendations.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7611>
President Reagan said the United
States must do more to lessen its reliance on imported oil.
    President Reagan said during a nationally televised news
conference that the rising U.S. reliance on foreign oil is a
problem that the administration is studying.
    "We have to study this more," Reagan said. "This is why we
increased the Strategic (Petroleum) Reserve, but we have to do
more," he said.
    Reagan said his administration has already proposed
deregulating natural gas and eliminating the windfall profits
tax on crude oil production.
    However, he complained that Congress had not yet approved
those measures.
    The Department of Energy earlier this week released a
report that warned of rising U.S. reliance on foreign oil
imports at a time when domestic production is declining. It
suggested options for the administration to consider, but made
no specific recommendations.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7618>
Trico Industries Inc said it has
received a six mln dlr contract to supply hydraulic lift
equipment for heavy crude oil production for the Chinese
Ministry of Petroleum Industry.
    The company said the equipment is for use in the Laiohe
oilfield 350 miles northeast of Peking and will equip a
140-well program.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7639>
&lt;Canada Northwest Energy Ltd>
said it reached agreement in principle to sell one mln
preferred shares by way of private placement to raise 32.5 mln
dlrs for oil and gas exploration.
    The 5.4 pct cumulative redeemable convertible series D
preferred shares will be flow-through shares entitling holders
to tax deductions not claimed by the company.
    The shares will be convertible anytime after issue into
common shares at an equivalent conversion price of 32.50 dlrs a
share. After one year, they will be redeemable at any time by
the company at 25 dlrs a share plus accrued dividends.

 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7684>
Gulf Canada Corp said a
discharge of material at its Amauligak drilling site in the
Beaufort Sea caused no danger to the environment.
    Yesterday, the federal department of energy charged Gulf
Canada with eight counts of illegal dumping for discharging
powdered cement and drilling mud between September 23 and 30
last year.
    The charges carry a maximum 50,000 dlr fine on each count.
    Gulf said the government's charges relate to discharging
materials without a permit, not to environmental damage
resulting from the action.
    Gulf said it voluntarily informed appropriate government
officials when the material was discharged.
    The company also said none of the material was discharged
within 12 miles of the closest shoreline. It added that one of
the materials cited, barite, is a naturally occurring mineral
routinely discharged into the sea during drilling operations.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7742>
First City Bancorporation's sale of 54
mln dlrs in oil loans to Prudential-Bache should significantly
reduce its energy problems, but the bank's losses are still
virtually guaranteed to continue, analysts said.
    The package of energy loans was sold at book value, so
First City did not to show a gain or loss, said bank spokesman
James Day. He added it was possible First City would sell more
of the bank's remaining 1.4 billion dlrs in oil-related loans
to raise cash.
    The loans had been made by First City to oil producers and
to oilfield service and supply companies. Day said some had
already been classified as nonperforming, or charged off as a
loss, but he could not identify how many were included in those
categories.
    The loans were purchased by Prudential Bache's Energy
Growth Fund, a limited partnership created last month with 90
mln dlrs in funding to invest in oil and gas properties.
    First City, the big Texas bank hit hardest by the downturn
in oil prices, lost a record 402 mln dlrs in fiscal year 1986
and has said it is seeking a merger partner or some other
capital assistance. The Houston-based bank's nonperforming
assets totaled 897.1 mln dlrs at yearend, up from 563.1 mln
dlrs at the end of 1985
    Analysts have said no buyer is likely to be interested in
the troubled bank unless government assistance is available.
    "Their problems are not just limited to energy. They have a
substantial portfolio in real estate. This sale in and of
itself won't make the company look better to a potential
buyer," said Ray Archibold, a banking analyst with McCarthy,
Crisanti and Maffei Inc.
    "It does reduce the bank's exposure in energy loans and 54
mln dlrs is a substantial amount," Archibold said, "but the
deal represents only about four pct of their energy loans."
    Of First City's total loan portfolio of 9.9 mln dlrs, about
14 pct or 1.4 billion dlrs were made to energy producers or
suppliers, analysts said. Its record losses have been caused by
its past status as one of the nation's top lenders to oil and
gas producers and suppliers during the boom days of the late
1970s and early 1980s.
    First City said about half of the loans sold to Prudential
came from its Energy Finance Co., an entity formed in 1982 to
loan money to "more venturesome" oil borrowers that promised a
higher potential return. The other half of the loans were from
First City's lead bank in Houston.
    Chris Kotowski, an analyst with Oppenheimer and Co., said
the sale of the package of energy loans was the first
encouraging news from First City in months.
    "It's not going to solve all of First City's problems but
it's a good transaction for them. It may be possible for them
to sell additional loans," Kotowski said. "Prudential can fund
these things more cheaply than First City and there's an
incentive to invest in troubled energy companies right now as
values are depressed"
    In a statement, First City chairman J.A. Elkins said the
bank's strategy was to reduce the proportion of energy loans to
total loans. "This move, which we believe is the first
transaction of its kind, helps us further, and we were able to
make it without suffering a loss."
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7854>
The Federal Trade Commission said
its staff has urged the governor of Georgia to veto a bill that
would prohibit petroleum refiners from owning and operating
retail gasoline stations.
    The proposed legislation is aimed at preventing large oil
refiners and marketers from using predatory or monopolistic
practices against franchised dealers.
    But the FTC said fears of refiner-owned stations as part of
a scheme of predatory or monopolistic practices are unfounded.
It called the bill anticompetitive and warned that it would
force higher gasoline prices for Georgia motorists.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8015>
The U.S. Department of Energy said
it has awarded bids for about 90,000 barrels per day, bpd, of
crude oil from the Elk Hills Naval Petroleum Reserve in
California. The contract period runs from April one through
July one, the DOE said.
    Successful bidders, the amount of crude oil and the price
per bbl according to the DOE are as follows - 
    Texaco Inc's &lt;TX> Texaco Trading and Transport 15,000 bpd
at 15.79 dlrs and 2,200 bpd at 15.19 dlrs, Beacon Oil Co 7,000
bpd at 15.66 dlrs and 2,500 bpd at 16.04 dlrs, Golden West
Refining 8,110 bpd at 15.42 dlrs.
    Successful bidders, the amount of oil and price per bbl,
according to the DOE continue as follows -
    Chevron's &lt;CHV> Chevron USA Inc 3,000 bpd at 14.51 dlrs and
4,000 bpd at 14.61 dlrs, Chevron International Oil Co 2,600 bpd
at 14.41 dlrs and 2,800 bpd at 14.51 dlrs, Newhall Refining Co
6,000 bpd at 15.82 dlrs, Caljet Inc 4,000 bpd at 15.32 dlrs,
Casey Co 4,000 bpd at 15.45 dlrs.
    Also, Cryssen Refining Inc 4,000 bpd at 15.47 dlrs,
Edgington Oil Co 4,000 bpd at 15.54 dlrs, Sound Refining Inc
3,100 bpd at 15.51 dlrs, Atlantic Richfield Co &lt;ARC> 3,000 bpd
at 15.75 dlrs.
    Successful bidders, the amount of crude oil and the price
per bbl according to the DOE continue as follows -
    Orkin Inc 2,679 bpd at 15.24 dlrs, Lunday-Thagard Co 2,511
bpd at 15.27 dlrs, Golden Eagle Refining 2,500 bpd at 15.37
dlrs, MacMillan Ring-Free Oil Co 1,000 bpd at 15.81 dlrs, 1,000
bpd at 15.71 dlrs and 230 bpd at 16.02 dlrs, Mock Resources
2,000 bpd at 15.76 dlrs, Petro-Diamond 2,000 bpd at 15.46 dlrs.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8041>
Higher crude oil prices will raise
demand for natural gas, helping it to reclaim market share lost
to heavy oil when prices plunged in 1986, analysts said.
    The analysts said that these efforts will be most
successful in the industrial sectors of the economy with large
and growing energy requirements.
    "Natural gas stands a good chance to recapture the share of
oil supplied to electric utilities that it lost to the residual
fuel industry last year," Michael Smolinski, an energy
economist with Data Resources Inc, told Reuters.
    An estimated 200,000 barrels per day of residual fuel went
into the utilities market at the expense of natural gas last
year when world oil prices plunged, Smolinski said. 
    Assuming oil prices hold above 15 dlrs a barrel, national
average gas prices delivered to the utilities at a projected
2.10 to 2.25 dlrs per mln Btu would be very competitive,
Michael German, vice president of economic analysis at American
Gas Association said.
    The average delivered prices at the end of January were
2.10 dlrs per mln Btu, compared with 3.26 dlrs a year ago.
    "We expect natural gas to regain 250 to 400 billion cubic
feet (of demand) in the overall energy market in the second and
third quarter (1987)," he said.
    In addition to price competitiveness, availability will be
an important factor persuading energy users to switch to gas,
Frank Spadine, senior energy economist with Bankers Trust Corp.
in New York noted.
    Spadine said the mild winter in many parts of the North
American continent has led to a build up of gas inventories and
less would be necessary to replenish underground storage this
spring freeing gas for spot sales.
    These forecasts develop a strong counterpoint to the fears
that natural gas suplies would be tight and prices
significantly higher given a sharp decline in drilling last
year.
    AGA's German contended that despite the drilling decline,
much of U.S. proved reserves could be brought to production
quickly through developments such as the infill drilling which
permits more wells to be drilled in proved reserve basins.
    Citing recent EIA statistics, German said, the gas surplus
was likely to contract from three trillion cubic feet in 1986
to two trillion cubic feet in 1987, but the surplus would not
go away until 1990.
    Smolinski of Data Resources agreed that the surplus would
persist until 1990. While gas supplies may tighten in certain
consuming areas, notably in California and in the Northeast
U.S., an overall shortfall appeared remote.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8069>
World Bank President Barber Conable is
expected to press Indonesia, the Third World's sixth largest
debtor, to maintain the momentum of economic policy changes to
tackle the slump in its oil revenues, western diplomats said.
    Conable, who flew to Indonesia yesterday from Tokyo, will
meet with President Suharto and senior economic ministers.
    He said on arrival that the economy of South-East Asia's
largest nation was being managed well, but the slump in world
oil prices called for major policy adjustments.
    Today the World Bank chief will visit Bank-funded projects
in the eastern section of Java, Indonesia's most populous
island. He will see Suharto on Tuesday after a day of detailed
discussions with ministers tomorrow.
    Indonesia, the only Asian member of OPEC, has been severely
hit by last year's crash in oil prices, which cut its oil and
gas revenues in half.
    Japan's state Export-Import Bank last month agreed to
provide around 900 mln dlrs in untied credits to help Indonesia
pay for its share of 21 World Bank development projects.
    Indonesia, a country of 168 mln people, has responded to
the oil slump by cutting spending, devaluing its currency by 31
pct, and trying to boost exports, while using foreign loans to
bridge its deficit.
    Diplomats said that Conable was expected to press Suharto
and leading economic ministers to maintain the pace of policy
change, particularly in dismantling Indonesia's high-cost
protected economy.
    "Oil prices, the debt crisis, the world recession, all call
for major policy adjustments and external support," Conable said
in his arrival statement.
    But with Indonesia facing parliamentary elections next
month, he is likely to avoid anything which would imply that
the Bank is demanding specific changes.
    "We believe there has been wise leadership here and the
economy is being very well managed," Conable told reporters at
Jakarta airport.
    Indonesia has official and private overseas debts totalling
37 billion dlrs, according to the Bank, which makes it the
Third World's sixth biggest debtor. It has received 10.7
billion dlrs from the World Bank since 1968.
    Conable did not spell out what further changes he would
like to see. Last month the Bank endorsed economic changes
already introduced by Indonesia, but implied it wanted more.
    Giving a 300 mln dlr loan in balance of payments support,
the Bank said it will monitor progress on implementation of the
government's trade reform measures, and supported its
determination to promote efficiency and longer-term growth.
    Indonesia has introduced a series of measures since last
May to boost non-oil exports, liberalise trade and encourage
outside investment.
    Suharto has also ordered a government committee to look
into which of Indonesia's 215 state-run companies could be
sold.
    But in a report last month, the U.S. Embassy said the
government appeared divided over how far to take its reforms.
    Western analysts say that in particular the government is
unsure how far to go with dismantling Indonesia's high-cost
monopolies, which control core areas of the economy.
    Central bank governor Arifin Siregar said this week that
Indonesia faced very limited economic choices.
    It could not spend its way out of trouble because this
would increase the balance of payments deficit and domestic
inflation.
     He said the main objective was to raise exports outside
the oil and natural gas sector.
    Indonesia's current account deficit is projected by the
government to fall to 2.64 billion dlrs in the coming financial
year which starts on April 1, from an estimated 4.1 billion in
1986/87.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8089>
An explosion followed by
a fire ripped through a British Petroleum (BP) oil refinery,
killing one man.
    A BP spokesman said the fire was confined to one plant at
the 700-acre refinery at Grangemouth, 25 miles west of
Edinburgh. The cause and extent of the damage had yet to be
determined.
    Two people were killed in a previous explosion and fire at
the plant on March 13. That incident is still being
investigated, the spokesman said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8100>
Cooper Basin oil producer Santos Ltd
&lt;STOS.S> said it will bid 4.00 dlrs a share for the 96.03 pct
it does not already hold in diversified oil and gas company
&lt;TMOC Resources Ltd>.
    Santos said the bid values TMOC at 248.5 mln dlrs. It said
it already holds 1.91 mln of TMOC's 25 cent par shares.
    TMOC held interests outside the Cooper Basin region of
South Australia and Queensland and the acquisition would
further the Santos objective of developing as a broadly based
oil and gas company with interests outside its existing base in
the Cooper Basin, the company said in a statement.
    Santos said TMOC holds several important domestic oil and
gas production, exploration and pipeline interests.
    In the Northern Territory it has a 43.75 pct stake in and
operates the Mereenie oil and gas field in the Amadeus Basin
and owns 32 pct of &lt;N.T. Gas Pty Ltd>, owner and operator of
the Alice Springs to Darwin gas pipeline.
    In Queensland, TMOC has extensive interests in the Surat
Basin, including the 100 pct owned and operated Moonie oil
field and 33 pct of the Boxleigh gas field.
    TMOC owns 80 pct of the &lt;Moonie Pipeline Co Pty Ltd> which
owns and operates the Moonie to Brisbane oil pipeline.
    TMOC also holds 25 pct of the Jackson to Moonie oil
pipeline, 20 pct owned by Santos. Output from the Naccowlah
block, 40 pct owned by Santos, provides the bulk of the
throughput of both pipelines.
    TMOC has exploration interests in a number of areas in the
Amadeus, Surat, Eromanga and Canning basins.
    It also has oil and gas interests in Britain's North Sea,
Ecuador, and the U.S., Along with gold and base metal
production through its associate &lt;Paringa Mining and
Exploration Co Plc>, Santos said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8117>
The government's
over-reliance on revenue from crude oil is adversely affecting
Australia's economic performance, Australian Petroleum
Exploration Association (APEA) chairman Dennis Benbow said.
    Over one-third of Australia's indirect tax income is
derived from oil at a time of falling domestic output and weak
crude prices, he told the APEA annual conference here.
    This dependence on oil-generated revenue distorts the
country's economic performance directly by acting as a
disincentive to new exploration and indirectly by affecting
trading competitiveness through high energy costs, he said.
    Australia's medium-term liquid fuel self-sufficiency
position is posing a major economic threat, yet the
government's response has been to load new tax burdens on the
oil industry, Benbow said.
    Domestic oil output from existing fields is expected to
fall to 280,000 barrels per day (bpd) in fiscal 1992/93 from
546,000 bpd in 1985/86, reflecting mainly the decline of the
Bass Strait fields, he said.
    Bass Strait reserves are now two-thirds depleted, with the
three largest fields 80 pct depleted, he said.
    By 1992/93, Bass Strait output is expected to be just over
half the 1985/86 level, assuming a number of so far undeveloped
fields are brought on stream and enhanced recovery from
existing fields goes ahead, Benbow said.
    Government projections of output from as yet undiscovered
fields range from 40,000 to 130,000 bpd, he said.
    Australian liquid fuel demand is forecast to rise to
680,000 bpd in 1992/93 from 565,000 in 1985/86, implying a
crude oil gap of between 270,000 and 360,000 bpd in five years
time, he said.
    At present world oil prices and the current value of the
Australian dollar, annual oil imports in 1992/93 would cost
between 3.2 billion and 3.6 billion dlrs, Benbow said.
    Despite intensive exploration in the early 1980's, the
addition to reserves has been inadequate, he said.
    For example, the 409 mln barrels discovered in the five
years 1980-84 represent about two years' consumption, he said.
    He called on the government to review its tax policies to
restore incentive to exploration.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8131>
World governments
should prepare for an inevitable significant increase in the
price of oil as non-Middle East supplies diminish, Exxon Corp
&lt;XON> director and senior vice-president Donald McIvor said.
    Policymakers must also face up to the reality that the bulk
of world oil reserves lies in the Middle East, he said in a
speech prepared for delivery to the Australian Petroleum
Exploration Association (APEA) annual conference.
    It appears ever more likely that new discoveries elsewhere
will not change this fact, he said.
    McIvor said 37 of the world's 30,000 oil fields contain
about 35 pct of all oil ever discovered.
    Only 11 of these 37 super-giant fields lie outside the
Middle East and only five of the 37 have been discovered in the
last 20 years, three of them in the Middle East, he said.
    He also said that since 1970, the world has been consuming
20 to 25 billion barrels a year while making discoveries at the
rate of only 10 to 15 billion barrels a year.
    More than half of remaining proved reserves are in the
Middle East, he said.
    McIvor said it was important to continue to search for oil
outside the Middle East because each addition contributes to a
diversity of supply desirable for global political and economic
stability.
    "It is important to enhance the likelihood of home-country
discoveries with measures such as non-discriminatory and stable
taxation, and minimum regulation, together with opening up of
acreage for exploration," he said.
    Increasing reliance on the Middle East will also boost the
incentive to use natural gas and synthetic sources of
petroleum, he added.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8134>
A 10 percentage
point reduction in the Australian government's maximum crude
oil levy on old oil would stabilize Bass Straits oil output,
resources analyst Ian Story said here.
    A reduction to 70 pct from 80 pct would enable Bass Strait
output to be maintained at the current rate of 420,000 barrels
per day (BPD) for the next year rather than falling to 380,000
BPD in 1987/88, he told the Australian Petroleum Exploration
Association annual conference.
    Story is an analyst with and a director of Sydney
stockbroker Meares and Philips Ltd.
    Windfall profits taxes on Bass Strait crude are no longer
appropriate in the current economic climate, Story said.
    The maximum 80 pct levy on old oil -- that discovered
before September 1975 -- is now forcing the Broken Hill Pty Co
Ltd &lt;BRKN.S>/Exxon Corp &lt;XON> partnership to shut-in
production, accelerating the decline in output and reducing
government revenue, he said.
    He said the producer return per barrel at a price of 30
Australian dlrs a barrel would rise to 2.07 dlrs from 0.80 dlrs
if the levy was cut to 70 pct.
    "The economics at an 80 pct levy are simply not attractive
at oil prices below 30 dlrs," Story said.
    Cutting the maximum levy rate to 70 pct would create higher
levels of self-sufficiency, increase government revenue, boost
exports and provide incentives for exploration and development,
he said.
    The government is currently reviewing the oil tax
structure.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8160>
The entire British Petroleum Co PLC
refinery at Grangemouth in Scotland has been shut down
following the explosion and fire that severely damaged the
hydrocracker at the site, a refinery spokesman said.
    He said the rest of the 178,500 bpd refinery, including the
19,000 bpd catalytic cracker, was undamaged. The whole refinery
was closed pending enquiries but a decision when to reopen the
main units will be taken in the next couple of days, he said.
    But there was extensive damage to the central part of the
32,000 bpd hydrocracker, which upgrades heavy oil products to
gasoline, and it will be out of operation for some months.
    The spokesman said BP will not suffer supply shortages as a
result of the explosion as it will be able to bring in product
from other sources. BP has a 437,000 bpd refinery in Rotterdam,
a 181,900 bpd unit at Ingolstadt, West Germany, a 181,900 bpd
plant at Lavera in France and a smaller Swedish plant.
    He said the explosion and fire, in which one worker was
killed, occurred when the hydrocracker was not in operation.
    The refinery as a whole had been operating at about half of
its capacity since the end of January while an extensive
overhaul was carried out on the North Side of the complex where
the hydrocracker is sited, he said.
    This work was scheduled to be completed by mid-April, but
this is now being assessed following the hydrocracker accident.
    Two people were killed in an explosion and fire in a flare
line at the Grangemouth refinery on March 13, but the spokesman
said this incident was some 100 yards from the latest accident.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8167>
Iraq said its warplanes launched two
bombing raids on Iran's offshore Nowruz oilfield in the
northern Gulf today.
    A military spokesman, quoted by the official Iraqi news
agency, said platforms at the field were reduced "to rubble."
    He said attacks on the field, 55 miles northwest of Iran's
Kharg Island oil terminal, were carried out at 0600 GMT. He
said today's raids "fall within Iraq's policy to deprive Iranian
rulers of oil revenue used to serve their aggressive aims."
    Iraqi planes yesterday raided the nearby Ardeshir oil
field, resuming attacks on Iranian targets after a month-long
lull.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8188>
Iran said reports that it intended to
threaten shipping in the Gulf were baseless, and warned the
U.S. And other countries not to interfere in the region.
    Tehran radio, monitored by the BBC, quoted a Foreign
Ministry spokesman as saying any attempt at interference would
be met by "a strong response from Iran and other Moslems in the
world."
     U.S. Defence Secretary Caspar Weinberger, in remarks
apparently unrelated to the broadcast, said the U.S. Would do
whatever was necessary to keep shipping lanes open in the face
of new Iranian anti-ship missiles in the Gulf.
    The U.S. State Department said two days ago Tehran had been
told of U.S. Concern that Iranian anti-ship missiles posed a
threat to the free flow of oil from the Gulf.
    U.S. Officials have said Iran has new Chinese-made
anti-ship "Silkworm" missiles, which pose a greater threat to
merchant ships than missiles used before.
    The Iranian spokesman said the reports that Iran intended
to attack ships were "misleading propaganda."
    He said Iraq's President Saddam Hussein was the main cause
of tension in the Gulf and said Iran would continue to use "all
its legitimate means to stem the cause of tension."
    Weinberger said in a television interview in the U.S. "We
are fully prepared to do what's necessary to keep the shipping
going and keep the freedom of navigation available in that very
vital waterway."
    "We aren't going into any disclosures or discussions of what
might happen, but we are certainly very sympathetic to and
listening carefully to any suggestions for our assistance in
keeping navigation free in that area," he said.
    Weinberger said U.S warship movements in the Gulf area were
not unusual.
    A U.S. Navy battle group led by the aircraft carrier Kitty
Hawk is currently in the northern Arabian Sea.
    The Iranian spokesman was quoted by Tehran radio as saying
the U.S. Was trying to build up its military presence in the
region.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8209>
The sharp drop in world oil prices
the past year triggered a 60 pct increase in bankruptcies in
the country's oil states, according to a study released by the
American Petroleum Institute (API).
    API said the Dunn and Bradstreet study found that business
failures rose nationally by 6.9 pct in 1986 over 1985, but in
the "oil patch" of the Southwest the increase was 59.9 pct.
    It said bankruptcies in Texas were up 57.4 pct, Oklahoma,
55.9 pct, Colorado, 55.8 pct and Louisiana, 46.6 pct.
    In Alaska, failures rose by 66.2 per cent, it said.
    API also said that three of the states with the highest
number of bank failures last year were large oil and gas
producers - Texas, Oklahoma and Kansas.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8210>
The world's dependency on the Mideast
as the source for its petroleum is growing and nothing is going
to stop it, Donald K. McIvor, an Exxon Corp &lt;XON> Director and
senior vice president told Reuters in an interview.
    "Non-OPEC production will begin to decline and the gap
between demand and supply will widen so that the trend to
increasing dependence on OPEC and the Middle East is
inevitable," McIvor said.
    Decreased supplies will firm prices for crude oil but are
not likely to change a growing dependence, McIvor said.
    McIvor, Exxon's senior vice president responsible for oil
and gas exploration and production said that dependence would
result from the Mideast's large spare capacity at a time when
the rest of the world consumes more oil than it was finding.
    "Since 1970 we've been consuming oil at rates of 20-25
billion barrels per year while making new discoveries of only
about 10-15 bilion barrels per year," McIvor said.
    "The bulk of the inventory and more than half of the
remaining proved reserves lies in the middle east which is
producing at much less than current capacity," he added.
    McIvor said that of the some 30,000 oil fields discovered
so far only 37 "one-one thousandth of the total number contained
about 35 pct of all the oil ever discovered."
    McIvor said, in response to a question, that he did not
believe there were any more "super giants", or oil fields with
reserves greater than five billion barrels, to be found which
would change the conclusion of the world's growing dependency.
    "Of those 37 super giants only 11 lie outside the Middle
East. Only five of the 37 have been discovered in the past 20
years and only two of these lie outside the middle east
(Cantarell in Mexico and Alaska's North Slope)." McIvor said.
    McIvor said that many of the large fields outside the U.S.
like Alaska's Prudhoe Bay and the North Sea were reaching a
peak and would soon begin to decline.
    But the Exxon executive said that there were still plenty
of opportunities to be explored and developed outside of the
Middle east, particulartly in Canada, the North Sea, and
Australia and Africa.
    McIvor said that decisions to explore and drill in those
areas would be depedent upon both the expectations of a higher
price of oil as well as the legal regime affecting the
companies.
    "The ideal regime is a stable one not one where there is a
constant change in policies," McIvor said.
    McIvor said he opposed import subsidies or tariffs used to
increase exploration as these only benefit one part of the
economy at the expense of other parts of the economy.
    Asked about the options offered this week by U.S. Energy
Secretary Herrington to increase U.S. production McIvor said he
could not comment on subjects like the oil depletion allowance
now but "the thrust of his (Herrington) report is valid. It has
highlighted the growing dependency on the Middle east and the
need to increase U.S. production."
    McIvor also said that he expected natural gas to play a
greater role in the future in meeting energy needs.
    "Natural gas will have the opportunity to become an
increasingly important part of the worlkd's energy supply,"
McIvor said.
    "Crude oil will be used more and more as a transportation
fuel and natural gas will be used more to generate heat, as an
industrial fuel," he added.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8288>
Patrick Petroleum Co said it
signed a definitive agreement to buy Bayou Resources Inc.
    As previously announced, the transaction is valued at about
8.8 mln dlrs, including 2.8 mln dlrs in debt.
    Under the agreement, Patrick will pay six dlrs per share
for each Bayou share, with additional value being given for
Bayou's preferred and options. Bayou has 827,000 shares out.
    Depending upon the results of the re-evaluation of a
significant Bayou well as of Jan. 1, 1988, Bayou stockholders
may receive up to an additional two mln dlrs in stock and cash,
which has not been included in the 8.8 mln dlrs.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8405>
Iraq's Oil Minister Qassem Ahmed Taqi
has been moved to the Heavy Industries ministry, the official
Iraqi news agcny INA said tonight.
    It quoted a Presidential decree appointing Oil Ministry
undersecretary Isam Abdul-Rahim Al-Chalaby as the new Oil
Minister.
    The Ministers of Industry and Communication and Transport
had both been relieved of their posts, the news agency said.
    No immediate explanation was given for the changes.
    Al-Chalaby is the head of the Iraqi National Oil Company.
    INA said the decree, signed by President Saddam Hussein,
relieved the Minister of Heavy Industries, Subhi Yassin Khadeir
of his post and appointed him a Presidential adviser.
    His ministry was formerly known as the Industry and Mineral
Resources Ministry. The Minister of Communications and
Transport, Abdel-Jabbar Abdel-Rahim al-Asadi was also relieved
of his post and replaced by a member of the ruling Baath party
regional command, Mohammed Hamza al-Zubeidi. Al-Zubedei is also
a Presidential adviser. All three ministers involved in the
reshuffle had spent more than four years in their posts.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8421>
The United States has offered Navy
warships to escort Kuwaiti oil tankers into and out of the 
Gulf where they could be threatened by new Iranian anti-ship
missiles, U.S. defense officials said today.
    "We believe the Kuwaitis have also approached the Soviet
Union about the possibility of using Soviet tankers" to ship
their oil, one of the officials told Reuters. "But if there is
superpower protection, we would rather it come from us," the
official said.
    The officials, who asked not to be identified, said Kuwait
had asked about possible protection for a dozen vessels, most
of them oil tankers, which could be supplied by three U.S. Navy
guided missile destroyers and two guided missile frigates now
in the southern part of the Gulf.
    "We told them we would give them help and we are waiting to
hear the Kuwaiti response to our offer," one official said.
    In addition to a half dozen ships in the U.S. Navy's small
Mideast Task Force near the Straits of Hormuz, the Pentagon has
moved 18 warships -- including the Aircraft Carrier Kitty Hawk
-- into the northern Indian Ocean in the past month.
    White House and defense officials said today that massing
of the fleet was routine and had nothing to do with the
Iran-Iraq war or Iran's recent stationing of Chinese-made 
anti-ship missiles near the mouth of the Gulf.
    The land-based missiles have increased concern in Kuwait
and other Middle East countries that their oil shipments might
be affected. Several hundred vessels have been confirmed hit in
the  Gulf by Iran and Iraq since early 1984. White House
spokesman Marlin Fitzwater told reporters today that it was in
the U.S. strategic interest to keep the free flow of oil in the
gulf and through the Straits of Hormuz.
    But he said U.S. ships in the region were on routine
maneuvers.
    Defense Secretary Caspar Weinberger on Sunday declined to
discuss specifics, but said the United States would do whatever
was necessary to keep the Gulf shipping open in the face of new
Iranian anti-ship missiles in the region.
    "We are fully prepared to do what's necessary to keep the
shipping going and keep the freedom of navigation available in
that very vital waterway of the world," he said on NBC
television's "Meet the Press."
    The State Department said Friday Iran has been informed
about U.S. concern over the threat to oil shipments in the
Gulf. The communciation was sent through Switzerland, which
represents American interests in Iran.
     Iran on Sunday denied as baseless reports that it intended
to threaten shipping in the gulf and warned the United States
that any interference in the region would meet a strong
response from Tehran, Tehran Radio said.
    An Iranian Foreign Ministry spokesman, quoted in a
broadcast monitored by the BBC in London, said reports that
Iran intends to threaten shipping in the Gulf were baseless.
    "In conjunction with this misleading propaganda, America has
already paved the ground to achieve its expansionist and
hegemonistic intentions, aiming to build up its military
presence in the region," he was quoted as saying.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8440>
Iraq said today its warplnes had
attacked a supertanker and four Iranian oil sites and vowed to
keep up such raids until the Gulf war ends.
    The surprise escalation of attacks on oil installations
broke more than a month-long lull in Iraqi air force action.
    It also followed celebrations yesterday of what Baghdad
hailed as Iran's failure to achieve victory during the Iranian
year which ended on Saturday.
    A high command communique said warplanes hit the western
jetty at Iran's Kharg island oil terminal in the afternoon and
struck a supertanker nearby at the same time.
    The Kharg terminal, attacked about 135 times since August
1985, was last raided in January.
    The communique did not identify the supertanker, but said
columns of smoke were seen billowing from it.
    In London, Lloyds insurance said the 162,046-ton Iranian
tanker Avaj was hit on Saturday, when Iraq reported an earlier
Gulf attack.
    But there has been no independent confirmation of today's
supertanker attack nor of other raids on shipping reported by
Baghdad in the past 24 hours.
    The last confirmed Iraqi attack took place on March eight,
when the Iranian tanker Khark-5 was hit south of Kharg.
    Iraqi warplanes also struck Iran's offshore oilfields at
Nowruz, Cyrus and Ardeshir in northern gulf, some 80 km (50
miles) west of Kharg island, today's communique said.
    The three oilfields have been raided several times in the
past three years. Oil sources said they were not crucially
important to Iran's oil export trade.
    A second high command communique today said Iraqi warplanes
flew 94 sorties against Iranan targets and positions at the war
front.
    It also reported a clash between Iraqi naval units and
several Iranian boats carrying men to attack an Iraqi oil
terminal at the northen tip of the Gulf.
    Two Iranian boats wer destroyed and sunk with their
occupants and the others fled, it said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8478>
Energy analyst Edward Krapels said
the United States should consider an oil tariff to keep U.S.
dependence on imports below 50 pct.
    "On the supply side, the argument in favor of a contingent,
variable import tariff is most persuasive," Krapels, president
of Energy Security Analysis, Inc said in a statement at a House
Energy and Power subcommittee hearing.
    "An optimal tariff would be one implemented only if the
international price of crude oil falls below, say, 15 dlrs a
barrel. On the demand side, the obvious policy is an excise tax
on transportation fuels," Krapels said.
    But William Johnson of the Jofree Corp disagreed with the
oil tariff proposal, saying Congress should remove price
controls on natural gas, repeal the windfall profits tax on oil
companies, allow exports of Alaskan oil and provide tax
incentives for U.S. oil production, or, at the least, preserve
exisiting tax incentives for drilling. He also urging filling
the Strategic Petroleum Reserve at a faster rate.
    Richard Adkerson of Arthur Andersen and Co told the
subcommittee oil imports were expected to increase because
funds for exploration and development of domestic oil sources
cannot now be economically justified due to low oil prices.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8493>
Iraqi President Saddam Hussein carried
out his first major government shakeup in five years tonight,
naming a new oil minister in shuffling three posts.
    One minister was dropped in the shuffle, announced in a
presidential decree. It gave no reason for the changes in the
government of the Arab Baath Socialist Party which has ruled
Iraq since a revolution in 1968.
    The decree named the head of the Iraqi National Oil Company
(INOC), Isam Abdul-Rahim al-Chalaby, to take over as oil
minister replacing Qassem Ahmed Taqi.
    Taqi, appointed oil minister in the last significant
government reorganization in 1982, was moved to be minister of
heavy industries.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8516>
Iraq said its warplanes had attacked a
supertanker and four Iranian oil sites and vowed to keep up
such raids until the Gulf war ends.
    The surprise escalation of attacks on oil installations
broke more than a month-long lull in Iraqi air force action.
    It also followed celebrations yesterday of what Baghdad
hailed as Iran's failure to achieve victory during the Iranian
year which ended on Saturday.
    A high command communique said warplanes hit the western
jetty at Iran's Kharg island oil terminal in the afternoon and
struck a supertanker nearby at the same time.
    The Kharg terminal, attacked about 135 times since August
1985, was last raided in January.
    The communique did not identify the supertanker, but said
columns of smoke were seen billowing from it.
    In London, Lloyds insurance said the 162,046-ton Iranian
tanker Avaj was hit on Saturday, when Iraq reported an earlier
Gulf attack.
    But there has been no independent confirmation of today's
supertanker attack nor of other raids on shipping reported by
Baghdad in the past 24 hours.
    The last confirmed Iraqi attack took place on March 8, when
the Iranian tanker Khark-5 was hit south of Kharg.
    Iraqi warplanes also struck Iran's offshore oilfields at
Nowruz, Cyrus and Ardeshir in northern gulf, some 80 km (50
miles) west of Kharg island, today's communique said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8553>
U.S. drilling activity rose last week
with the number of working rotary rigs up by 23 to 784, against
1,063 working rigs one year ago, Hughes Tool Co. said.
    The improvement was the first increase this year in the
weekly rig count, which had dropped steadily since early
January when a total of 962 rotary rigs were working.
    Among individual states, Texas and Oklahoma reported the
biggest gains in drilling last week with increases of 21 and
11, respectively. California and Louisiana were each up by
three and Wyoming gained two additional working rigs.
    Hughes Tool said it counted a total of 692 rigs drilling on
land, 74 rigs active offshore and 18 drilling in inland waters.
In Canada, the rig count was up by two to 183, against 324 one
year ago.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8598>
Australia's crude
oil tax strategy is probably best tackled in terms of a
targeted rather than broadly-based approach, Federal Resources
and Energy Minister Gareth Evans told a meeting here.
    He told the Australian Petroleum Exploration Association
(APEA) annual conference there was a prospect of developing a
package that would recognise the government's economic
priorities while also meeting some of the industry's concerns.
    Evans was referring to a nearly completed government review
of oil taxation.
    Evans said there were plenty of examples where targeted
approaches to oil industry taxation had produced good results
in recent years.
    These include the reduction in the top marginal crude
excise rate on 'old' Bass Strait oil found before September
1975 to 80 pct from 87 pct, and the waiver of excise on onshore
oil announced last September, he said.
    The industry, through the APEA, has been calling for the
elimination of secondary taxation on oil in order to boost
incentives for prospecting against a background of weak prices
and Australia's relatively low exploration levels.
    "While nobody wants to add further unnecessary complexity to
an already complex taxation regime, I am inclined to favour
these kinds of tailored approaches ahead of sweeping changes,
which leave (government) revenue much reduced and may still
leave a lot of uncertainty as to what individual companies are
going to do in major areas," Evans said.
    He said the government did not intend to change its
resource rent taxation (RRT) legislation, now before
parliament, in response to industry calls to allow all
exploration expenditure in a given area to be deductible.
    As previously reported, RRT is a tax of 40 pct limited to
highly prospective offshore areas, based on profits after a
certain rate of return has been achieved for individual
projects.
    APEA has said it is not a true profit-based tax because
exploration deductibility is limited to successful projects.
    Evans said the decision not to change RRT was based more
than anything on the government's desire to ensure the
certainty and stability of the new regime, adding that major
investments have already been planned on the existing ground
rules.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8600>
Royal Dutch/Shell Group &lt;RD.AMS> unit
&lt;Shell Australia Ltd>, said its net profit fell to 45.79 mln
dlrs in 1986 from 66.76 mln in 1985.
    Revenue fell to 4.55 billion dlrs from 4.91 billion, in an
extremely competitive and over-regulated environment, chairman
and chief executive Kevan Gosper said in a statement. A 26.25
mln dlr annual dividend would be paid to the parent after a
very disappointing year.
    "A return of 2.2 pct on funds employed represents a very
meagre return ... In an economy suffering from inflation of
around 10 pct," he said.
    Gosper said the results reflected heavy reliance on
downstream oil and chemicals, poor coal and metal returns and
the financial burden of the North-West Shelf gas project.
    Duties, royalties and taxes rose to 1.37 billion dlrs
against 852.72 mln in 1985 and Gosper urged the government to
move quickly to lift costly and unnecessary regulation.
    "It is just as important for Australia to maintain a
financially healthy, technically advanced refining and
marketing industry as it is to sustain oil exploration and
production," he said.
    "The Australian oil industry has the experience and the
capacity to serve the nation and its shareholders well if the
government would stop putting roadblocks in our way," he said.
    Shell invested 500 mln dlrs over the past five years to
upgrade its oil refining and marketing business, but further
investment required an appropriate rate of return, he said.
    Exploration and evaluation spending in 1986 fell to 18.77
mln dlrs from 26.35 mln, while investment in property and plant
rose to 374.25 mln from 353.94 mln a year earlier.
    Gosper said oil companies would be under intense pressure
in 1987 because of forecast slow economic growth.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8606>
World Bank president Barber Conable
pledged the Bank's support to help Indonesia adjust to lower
world oil prices, but said further deregulation of its
protected economy was needed.
    Speaking to reporters after talks with President Suharto,
he said he expected Jakarta to do more to liberalise the
economy and deregulate trade policy.
    Indonesia, hurt by the fall in oil prices last year which
cut the value of its crude exports in half, is the Third
World's sixth largest debtor. It has received 10.7 billion dlrs
from the World Bank in the past 20 years.
    Conable said the World Bank, which granted Indonesia a 300
mln dlr loan last month to help its balance of payments, was
prepared to back Jakarta in taking the right steps to adjust to
lower oil and primary commodity prices.
    "We are prepared to support those steps which we believe are
consistent with the development of the Indonesian economy," he
said.
    He said Jakarta's willingness to move quickly after last
year's collapse in oil price saved Indonesia from some of the
difficulties now faced by other countries.
    Indonesia devalued its currency by 31 pct against the
dollar in September to avoid a balance of payments crisis, and
has announced a series of measures since May intended to
stimulate exports, encourage foreign investment and revitalise
the economy.
    However, key monopolies in areas like steel and plastics
and high tariff barriers remain in place.
    Conable arrived in Indonesia on Saturday and has since met
14 Indonesian cabinet ministers to review the country's
borrowing needs and the impact of falling oil prices on the
country.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8610>
Kuwaiti oil minister Sheikh Ali
al-Khalifa al-Sabah said OPEC was producing well below its oil
output ceiling and this would help prices move higher,
according to a Kuwaiti newspaper interview.
    The al-Rai al-Aam newspaper quoted him as saying OPEC was
pumping 2.4 mln barrels per day (bpd) less than its 15.8 mln
bpd ceiling, while consumers were drawing down their petroleum
stocks at a rate of 4.5 mln bpd.
    As long as OPEC maintains its output curbs, demand for its
oil will rise in April and May, Sheikh Ali said, adding that
Kuwait was strongly committed to its OPEC quota.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8623>
The council of the
Australian Petroleum Exploration Association (APEA) said it
will press on with its campaign for major improvements to
Australia's petroleum taxation structure.
    The council said in a statement the industry was bitterly
disappointed by the Australian government's position on
taxation, as presented in a speech by Resources and Energy
Minister Gareth Evans to the APEA conference.
    As earlier reported, Evans said he was inclined to target
any tax changes rather than take a broad-based approach to
secondary taxation of petroleum.
    APEA had expected the government to make positive responses
to detailed industry submissions seeking the removal of
existing secondary tax disincentives to exploration and
development, the council said.
    It said it plans to reply in detail to issues raised by
Evans, but its immediate concern was the decision to proceed
with the current resource rental tax (RRT) legislation.
    Evans told the conference the government did not plan to
accept industry pleas for changes in the legislation to allow
deductibility of unsuccessful exploration expenditure.
    "The government's unwillingness to allow the deduction of
unsuccessful exploration expenditure within the whole offshore
area in which RRT applies negates any claim that the tax is
profit based," the APEA council said.
    The government missed a major opportunity to persuade oil
exploration companies that it had realistic answers to the
industry's concerns, despite its recognition of the industry's
problems, the council said.
    The industry has called for the end of all discriminatory
secondary taxation of petroleum, citing them as major
disincentives at a time of low oil prices.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8630>
Leading Australian onshore oil and gas
producer, Santos Ltd &lt;STOS.S>, said its 1986 results were hit
by sharp reductions in prices for crude oil, condensate and
liquefied petroleum gas (LPG).
    The Cooper Basin producer earlier reported a fall in net
profit to 88.67 mln dlrs from 144.04 mln in 1985.
    Santos chairman Sir Brian Massy-Greene said in a statement
that increased production, particularly of oil and LPG, along
with reduced operating costs and reduced or deferred oil
exploration and development outlays, were helping Santos deal
with an adverse business climate.
    Santos said it remained financially strong with an
injection of 84 mln dlrs from the second instalment of a 1985
rights issue, and had cash reserves of 381.3 mln dlrs at the
end of 1986 against 401.9 mln a year earlier.
    It said it had also made significant progress in repaying
debts and at year end the ratio of debt to shareholders' funds
had fallen to 1.01 from 1.54.
    Santos yesterday announced a 4.00 dlr a share takeover bid
for the 96.93 pct it did not already hold in oil and gas
company &lt;TMOC Resources Ltd> -- valuing the target at 248.5 mln
dlrs.
    Santos said 75 pct of its loans were U.S. Dollar
denominated and significant currency purchases were made during
the year to maintain that natural hedge. At year end it held
145 mln U.S. Dlrs, enough to meet all 1987 repayments.
    Santos said it had a successful gas exploration program,
finding 172 billion cubic feet in South Australia, but oil
exploration was less successful with 1.62 mln barrels added to
reserves -- less than depletion during the year.
    Cooper Basin producers are committed to a two-year scheme
to double gas exploration while Santos said its 1987 budget for
oil exploration had been boosted 20 pct.
    Santos said the outlook for 1987 depended on prices and
production volumes but with extra oil exploration and
encouraging gas finds there were grounds for optimism.
    But it called on the goverment to continue fostering
domestic producers through the Import Parity Price scheme.
    "It makes no sense to abandon this policy now when
exploration is at its lowest level for many years and when
Australia's oil self-sufficency is expected to decline rapidly,"
Massy-Green said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8672>
Kuwaiti oil minister Sheikh Ali
al-Khalifa al-Sabah said OPEC was producing well below its oil
output ceiling and this would help prices move higher,
according to a Kuwaiti newspaper interview.
    The al-Rai al-Aam newspaper quoted him as saying OPEC was
pumping 2.4 mln barrels per day (bpd) less than its 15.8 mln
bpd ceiling, while consumers were drawing down their petroleum
stocks at a rate of 4.5 mln bpd.
    As long as OPEC maintains its output curbs, demand for its
oil will rise in April and May, Sheikh Ali said, adding that
Kuwait was strongly committed to its OPEC quota.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8675>
The U.S. Has offered warships to
escort Kuwaiti tankers in the Gulf past Iranian anti-ship
missile batteries, Defence Department officials said.
    The officials told Reuters yesterday the offer was made
last week by Navy Admiral William Crowe, chairman of the
Pentagon Joint Chiefs of Staff, during a Middle East visit.
    Reagan administration officials said later that Washington
did not seek military confrontation with Tehran, but would not
let Iran use Chinese-made "Silkworm" anti-ship missiles, capable
of covering the narrow entrance to the Gulf, to choke oil
shipments to the West.
    Defence officials said Kuwait had asked if protection for
up to a dozen vessels, most of them tankers, could be provided
by three U.S. Navy destroyers and two frigates now in the
southern Gulf and the Gulf of Oman.
    In addition to a half dozen ships in the U.S. Navy's small
Mideast Task Force near the Straits of Hormuz, the Pentagon has
moved 18 warships, including the aircraft carrier Kitty Hawk,
into the northern Arabian Sea in the past month.
    White House and defence officials said that massing the
fleet was routine and had nothing to do with the Iran-Iraq war
or Iran's stationing of missiles near the mouth of the Gulf.
    The State Department said on Friday that Iran has been told
about U.S. Concern over the threat to oil shipments in the
Gulf. The communication was sent through Switzerland, which
represents U.S. Interests in Iran.
    Iran denied as baseless reports that it intended to
threaten shipping in the Gulf and said any U.S. Interference in
the region would meet a strong response, Tehran Radio said on
Sunday.
    Several hundred vessels have been confirmed hit in the Gulf
by Iran and Iraq since early 1984 in the so-called tanker war,
an offshoot of their 6-1/2-year-old ground conflict.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8749>
The speaker of the Iranian Parliament,
Hojatoleslam Akbar Hashemi Rafsanjani, warned the U.S. Not to
intervene in the Gulf, a day after Washington said its warships
were available to escort Kuwaiti tankers through the waterway.
    "If U.S. Intervention occurs, the entire world will become
insecure for the Americans and the events of Lebanon could be
repeated for the Americans everywhere," he said.
    U.S. Defence officials disclosed in Washington yesterday
that the U.S. Navy, which has about 24 warships in or near the
Gulf, was prepared to escort Kuwaiti tankers, regular targets
for Iranian attacks in an offshoot of its war with Iraq.
    Rafsanjani, in an interview reported by the Iranian news
agency IRNA, also commented on earlier U.S. Disclosures that
Iran had erected sites for new Chinese-made Silkworm
anti-shipping missiles at the Strait of Hormuz.
    The agency, received in London, quoted him as saying that
Iran did not need missiles to close the strait, 24 miles wide
at its narrowest, because "we can close it with artillery only."
    He added "We have the longest coasts and the highest
interest here and the small southern (Gulf) states have a
lesser interest compared with us and therefore it is natural
for us to protect the security of the Strait of Hormuz more
than others."
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8755>
&lt;A/S Norske Shell>, Royal
Dutch/Shell Group's &lt;RD.AS> Norwegian subsidiary, said it has
nearly concluded a 10 billion crown development scheme for
Norway's Draugen oil field and will declare the field
commercial in the near future.
    Pending government approval of the scheme, the field could
come on stream in 1992, making it Norway's northermost field
development and the first such project on the Haltenbanken
tract off central Norway.
    Work on the project could begin as early as January 1988, a
Shell spokesman said.
    Shell has not released projected output levels for the
field, where water depth is 240-270 meters.
    The spokesman said the field's partners have agreed to
develop Draugen with a 300-meter, single-leg concrete
gravity-base platform.
    The scheme also proposes using remote subsea production
wells to tap the field's reservoir, estimated to contain 375
mln barrels of oil, and an offshore buoy-loading system to
transport oil from the field by ship.
    Partners on Draugen are Shell, the operator, with a 30 pct
stake, British Petroleum Co Plc &lt;BP.L> unit &lt;BP Petroleum
Development (Norway) Ltd> (20 pct) and state-owned Den Norske
Stats Oljeselskap A/S &lt;STAT.OL> (Statoil) (50 pct).
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8765>
U.S. Department of Energy Secretary
John Herrington said he was "optimistic" about the chances of
providing a more generous depletion allowance for oil and gas
producers, but added that the plan faces strong opposition from
some members of the Reagan administration.
    Herrington, speaking to Houston oil executives at a
breakfast meeting, said administration debate over his plan for
a 27.5 pct annual depletion allowance was "heavy and strong"
largely because of some fears that the U.S. oil industry could
eventually become as dependent on federal subsidies as the
agriculture industry.
    Herrington's proposed tax incentives for the oil industry
were issued last week after the Department of Energy released a
comprehensive report finding U.S. national security could be
jeopardized by rising oil imports.
    In response to a question from Mitchell Energy and
Development Corp &lt;MND> chairman, George Mitchell, Herrington
said the report did not definitively rule out an oil import
tarrif. "We intend to keep that debate open," Herrington said.
    However, following his speech, Herrington told Reuters that
the new report shows an oil import fee "is not economical."
    Herrington said, for example, a 10 dlr per barrel tariff on
oil imports would cause the nation's gross national product to
drop by as much as 32 billion dlrs.
    Herrington also said he believed President Reagan, who
requested the comprehensive national security study, was
committed to some action to help the ailing U.S. oil industry.
    "I'm quite confident he understands the problems and is
prepared to do something about it," Herrington said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8815>
A unanimous Supreme Court ruled that
oil and gas exploration can proceed on two tracts off the
Alaska coast which were leased by the federal government to
eight major oil companies.
    The ruling was an important victory for the oil companies
and the Reagan administration's controversial off-shore leasing
program and a setback for two small Alaskan villages that
challenged the leases by claiming damage to the environment.
    The administration said that the court-ordered halt in
drilling had created uncertainty over the 4.2 billion dlrs paid
for 621 leases off the shores of Alaska since December 1980.
    A federal appeals court ordered the oil companies to halt
all exploration and remove all drilling rigs from two tracts in
the Bering Sea off Alaska because of possible harm to the
subsistence needs and culture of native Eskimos.
    But the Supreme Court said the appeals court was wrong in
issuing an injunction halting exploration.
    "Here, injury to subsistence resources from exploration was
not at all probable," Justice Byron White wrote for the court.
"And on the other side of the balance of harms was the fact
that the oil companies had committed approximately 70 mln dlrs
to exploration to be conducted during the summer of 1985 which
they would have lost without chance of recovery had exploration
been enjoined," he said.
    The oil companies, Amoco Corp &lt;AN>, ARCO, Exxon Corp &lt;XON>,
Mobil Corp &lt;MOB>, Sohio, Shell, Texaco Inc &lt;TX> and Union Oil,
had said that voiding previously granted leases would result in
staggering financial losses.
    The first lease sale in 1983 involved 2.4 mln acres and
generated 318 mln dlrs while the second lease sale in 1984
covered 37 mln acres and produced 516 mln dlrs.
    Administration officials, saying the lease sales were
preceded by an intense environmental impact study, denied that
the oil and gas exploration would hurt subsistence resources.
    The Alaskan villages of Gambell and Stebbins, along with an
organization of Eskimo natives on the Yukon Delta, argued that
the drilling would hurt native hunting and fishing.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8820>
&lt;Shell U.K. Ltd's> pre-tax profit on
exploration and production operations fell to 869 mln stg in
1986 from 2.12 billion in 1985 due to the fall in oil prices
last year, Shell U.K. Finance director Nigel Haslam said.
    But he told a press conference that due to the high
marginal tax rate on North Sea operations, the main impact of
the drop in profit was absorbed by a fall in taxation to 330
mln stg from 1.45 billion in 1985.
    The bulk of tax last year was Corporation Tax, with
Petroleum Revenue Tax (PRT) representing only 16 mln stg, he
said.
    As a result, post-tax profit from the exploration and
production sector fell by only 126 mln stg to 539 mln.
    Earlier, Shell U.K., a subsidiary of Royal Dutch/Shell
Group &lt;RD.AS>, reported an overall net profit of 757 mln stg,
up from 667 mln in 1985, on sales of 6.57 billion stg against
8.81 mln.
    Shell U.K. Chairman Bob Reid said the company's crude oil
output from the North Sea was at a record 373,000 bpd in 1986,
which would almost certainly prove to be a peak for the
company. Shell expects a fall in output of around 10 pct in the
current year to around 340,000 bpd, due mainly to the decline
in output from the major Brent field, he said.
    Gas output of 5.9 billion cubic metres and natural gas
liquids output of around one mln tonnes in 1986 are expected to
be maintained in 1987, he said.
    A final decision on development of the Kittiwake and Osprey
North Sea oil fields will be made in the next 12 to 18 months,
Reid said. The Kittiwake field, originally part of the 2.5
billion stg Gannet project abandoned last year when the oil
price fell, is now estimated to cost around 350 mln stg.
    Economies on development costs for the Tern and Eider North
Sea fields, which were approved last year, have brought the
cost down to 30 to 35 pct below the original budget.
    Day to day operating costs of the exploration and
production sector had been cut 10 pct last year, and the target
is to keep costs per barrel constant.
    The company drilled 17 wells offshore, with 10 leading to
the discovery of hydrocarbons, although it is too early to
gauge the commercial viability of these discoveries, Reid said.
    Restructuring of the downstream oil sector contributed to a
profit rise to 187 mln stg in 1986 from 91 mln stg in 1985.
    Jaap Klootwijk, managing director of downstream unit &lt;Shell
U.K. Oil>, said refining margins in the first quarter of 1987
were a "bit better than the very bad fourth quarter 1986."
    In November and December in particular, refining operations
had shown negative margins following the fall in crude and oil
product prices, he said. He expected margins to continue
generally positive over the summer, although they could dip to
become negative from time to time, depending on price
movements.
    A new catalytic cracker at Shell's Stanlow refinery will
now come on stream by the end of first quarter 1988, about five
months behind schedule, following a crane accident which
severely damaged the plant last year, he said.
    Profits from the chemicals sector rose to 33 mln stg from
11 mln after the rationalisation of the Carrington chemical
site.
    Haslam said the Budget announcement on PRT relief, by which
companies will be allowed to offset up to 10 pct of qualifying
development expenditure on certain future oil fields against
PRT, was "helpful," but rather less than had been hoped for.
    Reid said his estimate of crude oil prices this year was in
the range of 15 to 18 dlrs. If prices went much above that, he
would expect some over-production above OPEC"s official 15.8 mln
bpd output ceiling which would tend to bring prices back down.
    He said it looked as if the December OPEC pact to restrain
output was holding, bringing supply and demand into balance,
but the test will come in summer when demand for OPEC oil will
fall.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8835>
A House taxwriter said Energy
Secretary James Herrington's "outrageous" plan to restore an old
tax break for oil companies was both bad tax and energy policy.
    Rep. Pete Stark, a California Democrat and senior House
Ways and Means Committee member, said Herrington's plan for a
27.5 pct depletion allowance--which in effect is a special 27.5
pct tax deduction --would cost seven billion dlrs a year.
    "He must have missed the last two years of federal tax
reform by sleeping as soundly as Rip Van Winkle," Stark said.
    He said in a statement the oil industry already pays an
effective lower rate of U.S. tax on investment, 15 pct versus
aggregate corporate tax on all investment of 34 pct, according
to a recent Congressional Research Service study.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8856>
The Soviet Union supports the freedom
of navigation in the Gulf and does not support any act which
would cause the deterioration of the situation in the region,
its ambassador to Kuwait, Ernest Zverev, told the Kuwaiti news
agency KUNA.
    "We support the freedom of navigation in the Arabian Gulf
and the Strait of Hormuz," the agency quoted Zverev as saying.
    KUNA also said the envoy had discussed the deployment of
Iranian missiles near the Strait of Hormuz with Kuwaiti Foreign
Undersecretary Suliman Majed al-Shaheen.
    A British naval source in the Gulf said today Iran had
test-fired its new Silkworm missiles and set up launching sites
in the area.
    The tests had been successful and the missiles could be
used against shipping in the strait, the source added.
    But Iranian Parliamentary Speaker Hojatoleslam Akbar
Hashemi Rafsanjani said Iran did not need missiles to close the
strait because "we can close it with artillery only."
    The U.S. Has said it will not allow Iran to use missiles to
choke off oil shipments and offered its warships to escort
Kuwaiti tankers past the missile batteries in the strait.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8882>
Tonight's American Petroleum Institute
oil inventory report is expected to show another drawdown in
distillate stocks of between two and 7.5 mln barrels for the
week ending March 20, oil analysts and traders said.
    They said they expect gasoline inventories to be depleted
by about one to four mln barrels.
    Analysts were divided on the crude stocks. Some saw stocks
unchanged to as much as three mln barrels higher. Others said
stocks could be down one to five mln barrels. Crude throughput
volumes are expected to be unchanged to slightly higher or
lower than the week ended March 13, traders said.
    The API recorded a 7.4 mln barrel stockdraw for U.S.
distillates in the week ended March 13. Analysts see another 
draw reflecting historic seasonal trends.
    For the week ended March 13, API reported gasoline stocks
down 2.9 mln barrels.
    Those expecting a draw of as much as four mln barrels said
they are looking for fairly high consumption rates as the
spring and summer driving season gets underway this year,
because retail prices are still low compared to recent years.
    U.S. crude oil stocks were reported down by 4.4 mln barrels
for the week ended March 13. Analysts are divided over the
outcome for last week because there is uncertainty about
whether throughput levels increased or decreased last week.
    Some see crude stock levels unchanged to three mln barrels
higher, while others think inventories could be as much as five
mln barrels below the previous week.
    The lower estimates are supported by the belief that crude
runs increased and imports fell.
    The API reported crude runs 154,000 b/d higher for the week
ended March 13. Analysts are calling it unchanged to slightly
up or down for the week ended March 20.
    Expectations for product stockdraws are already being
reflected in firmer prices, traders said. But if draws are at
the higher end of the estimated range, they added, the effect
will be bullish. Any stockbuild would be a negative factor,
they said.
    Crude runs normally increase in March, and any decrease in
runs would be friendly to the market, said Peter Beutel of
Elders Energy Futures Inc.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8914>
Goodyear Tire and Rubber Co said the All
American Pipeline of its Celeron Corp subsidiary will start
line fill activities on March 30 as it begins operating.
    The company said about five mln barrels of oil will be
required to pack the completed segment of the line, which runs
1,225 miles from near Santa Barbara, Calif., to existing
pipeline connections in West Texas.  Construction has also
staqrted this week on a 43-mile, 16-inch diameter gathering
line to deliver 75,000 to 100,000 barrels a day of oil from the
San Joaquin Valley in California.  The 30-inch main underground
line can transport over 300,000 barrels daily.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8959>
Calumet Industries Inc said it expects
to report a loss from operations for its second quarter ending
March 31, despite a strong unit sales increase.
    In the same year-ago period the company reported net income
of 366,953 dlrs, or 18 cts a share.
    Chairman S. Mark Salvino said the expected loss is
primarily due to depressed product prices not recovering the
increasing cost of crude oil.
    Salvino also said steadier crude prices and the reduced
rate of refinery production should increase product prices and
lead to a return to more normal profit margins.
    He reported that the 23 mln dlr HydroCal II system under
construction at the company's refinery in Princeton, La., is on
schedule and production will begin early in fiscal 1988.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8964>
The state oil company Petroeleos de
Venezuela ended 1986 with a decrease of 45 pct in income from
oil sales even though it surpassed its own export goal by
almost 100,000 barrels a day, Minister of Energy and Mines
Arturo Hernandez Grisanti said.
    Speaking to a news conference following the PDVSA annual
assembly, Hernandez said PDVSA's income from oil sales had
dropped to 7.2 billion dlrs in 1986, down 45 pct from last
year's 13.3 billion.
    Fiscal revenue from oil sales, which was estimated at 66
billion bolivares for 1986, totalled 43.5 billion, a drop of 34
pct which Hernandez said "had a very serious impact on
Venezuela."
    PDVSA's export volume averaged 1.508 mln barrels a day, of
which 658,000 bpd were crude oil and 850,000 bpd refined
products.
    The figure surpassed PDVSA's stated goal of 1.410 mln bpd
and the 1985 export volume of 1.371 mln bpd. But it was not
enough to cover the losses from a drop in the average price
from 25.88 dlrs per barrel in 1985 to 13.90 dlrs last year.
    The 13.90 per barrel price for 1986 was 1.01 dlrs higher
than the figure originally announced by the Central Bank.
Hernandez said the increase had come from a new accounting
system which included the results of PDVSA's overseas refining
and marketing operations.
    Consumption in Venezuela's internal market increased from
323,000 bpd in 1985 to 342,000 bpd last year. However,
Hernandez stressed that the government had managed to keep
gasoline sales almost constant at 164,000 bpd.
    Exploration by PDVSA led to an increase of 675 mln barrels
in reserves of light and medium crudes, shifting the balance of
Venezuela's reserves away from heavy crude oil. The country's
production capacity at year-end 1986 was 2.562 mln bpd, of
which 1.420 mln are light and medium crudes, Hernandez said.
     Venezuela's total proven reserves as of December 31, 1986
were 55.521 billion barrels, the fourth largest amount in the
world, Hernandez said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8971>
Imperial Oil Ltd, 70 pct owned by Exxon
Corp &lt;XON>, will focus on maintaining its financial strength
and improving near-term earnings performance through operating
expense reductions and selective capital spending, the company
said in the annual report.
    Imperial Oil said it expects to spend about 750 mln dlrs on
capital and exploration expenditures in 1987, compared to 648
mln dlrs in 1986 and 1.16 billion dlrs in 1985.
    Imperial previously reported 1986 operating net profit fell
to 440 mln dlrs or 2.69 dlrs share from 694 mln dlrs or 4.27
dlrs share in the prior year.
    Imperial Oil said the attention to earnings results from
the desire to pursue longer term growth opportunities should
the investment climate improve and the belief that low or
volatile crude oil prices could continue during the next
several years.
    The company also said actions initiated during 1986 to
restructure and improve efficiency should continue to show
benefits in 1987.
    During 1986, the company cut operating, administrative and
marketing expenses by 91 mln dlrs and reduced the number of
workers by 16 pct to 12,500.
    Imperial chairman Arden Haynes said in the annual report
that it is too early to determine whether the recent upward
movement in international oil prices will be sustained.
    "It is still a time for prudence and caution, and the
company's actions will continue to be based on the fundamentals
of market supply and demand," he said.
    Haynes said prospects for the company's petroleum products
division are more promising than before, but are still
uncertain. Imperial's 1986 petroleum earnings rose to 174 mln
dlrs from 102 mln dlrs in 1985.
    Haynes said more satisfactory product margins on its
petroleum products could result if demand recovers as it has in
the United States.
    The company's chemicals business outlook is mixed, Haynes
said. Prospects for growth in petrochemical sales is good as
long as economic growth continues, but future large grain
surpluses could dampen fertilizer demand and maintain pressure
on prices.
    Imperial's chemical business earned 17 mln dlrs in 1986,
compared to three mln dlrs in 1985.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9031>
Caltex Petroleum Corp said it will
raise
posted prices for naphtha and several grades of residual fuel
in Bahrain, effective March 25.
     Caltex, a joint venture of Chevron Corp &lt;CHV> and Texaco
INC &lt;TX>, said its naphtha posting is up four cts a gallon to
43 cts. It said it is raising its marine diesel oil posting by
30 cts a barrel to 20.24 dlrs a barrel.
    Light, medium, and heavy fuel oil postings are up 1.50 dlrs
a barrel, the company said. This will bring the light fuel oil
price to 16.90 dlrs, medium to 15.50 dlrs, and heavy to 14.60
dlrs, the company said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9065>
Petroleos de Venezuela S.A will
announce within two weeks the name of a foreign consortium it
has chosen to help exploit the coal deposits at Guasare in
western Zulia state, PDVSA president Juan Chacin Guzman said.
    Chacin told reporters the foreign partner will provide
capital as well as technical and marketing expertise to the
Carbozulia project, which the state oil company will manage.
    PDVSA officials said that among those who bid for the
partnership is a consortium between Agip Carbone, a subsidiary
of Italy's Ente Nazionale Idrocarburi (ENI), and Atlantic
Richfield &lt;ARC> of the United States.
    Minister of Energy and Mines Arturo Hernandez Grisanti said
discussions are currently taking place to finalize the terms of
the contract with the foreign partner.
    PDVSA vice-president Pablo Reimpell said last week the
first shipment of coal from the Carbozulia project should be
made during the final quarter of 1987, and would measure
between 100-150,000 metric tons.
    Plans call for production to eventually reach 500,000 mt
annually. Reimpell said the original investment in the project
will be approximately 8 billion bolivars.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9155>
Madagascar extended its oil
exploration agreement with the U.S. Firm Amoco Corp &lt;AN> for 17
months to allow for further studies of the Morondava basin on
the southwest coast, a government statement said.
    It said the existing five-year agreement, due to expire
this July 24, was extended until the end of 1988 to allow for
additional geological and geophysical studies.
    Amoco has so far laid 7,100 km of seismic lines and sunk
five exploration wells in the Morondava basin. It may drill a
further three wells before the end of the extended exploration
period, the statement said.
    Madagascar has signed oil exploration agreements with four
foreign oil companies since 1981. But despite promising
indications of large reserves, no commercial production plans
have yet been announced.
    The foreign firms - Amoco, Occidental Petroleum Corp &lt;OXY>,
Mobil Corp &lt;MOB> and a unit of &lt;Ente Nazionale Idrocarburi> -
are working in partnership with the National Military Office
for Strategic Industries (OMNIS).
    Roland Ratsimandresy, the director general of OMNIS, said
at a ceremenony to sign the extension of the Amoco agreement
that his department would intensify oil exploration with its
existing partners and would soon offer a new round of
exploration licences.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9208>
Abu Dhabi's offshore Abu al-Bukhoosh
oilfield in the Gulf, shut since an aerial attack last
November, will reopen when new anti-aircraft defences are
ready, and this could be in the next two months, oil industry
sources said.
    They said the Abu Dhabi government and Compagnie Francaise
des Petroles (Total) &lt;TPN.PA>, whose Total Abu al-Bukhoosh
subsidiary owns 51 pct of the field, have agreed on the
reopening, but that a date has not been definitely fixed.
    Unidentified planes hit the field, 100 miles off Abu Dhabi,
last November 25.
    The raid killed eight workers and destroyed the main living
quarters and a bridge linking a wellhead to the main production
platform.
    Western diplomats in the region say Iran was responsible
but Tehran has blamed its Gulf War enemy Iraq.
    Abu al-Bukhoosh was producing 57,000 barrels per day (bpd)
at the time of the attack, but the sources said it would resume
at a maximum of half that level because of reduced staff and
the fact only four of five wellheads were now operable.
    The sources said only 80 personnel can be housed in
remaining accomodations, the sources said.
    Facilities being installed to protect the field include
aircraft detection equipment, anti-aircraft missiles, housing
for military personnel and helicopter landing pads, the sources
said.
    Abu Dhabi is the largest oil producer in the United Arab
Emirates, accounting for about 800,000 bpd of its total 1.15
mln bpd production, the sources said.
    They also said Iran was working to reopen its Sassan field,
part of the same reservoir as Abu al-Bukhoosh and located only
a few miles away. Sassan was heavily damaged by an Iraqi air
raid only 10 days before Abu al-Bukhoosh was attacked.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9253>
Papua New Guinea
(PNG) provides the most exciting new prospect in the
Asia-Pacific region for oil production, energy analyst Fereidun
Fesharaki said here.
    The recent successful find at Iagifu is likely to put PNG
on the list of major oil exporters by the early 1990s, he told
the Australian Petroleum Exploration Association annual
conference.
    Fesharaki, leader of the Energy Program at the East-West
Center in Honolulu, Hawaii, was speaking on the Asia-Pacific
petroleum outlook.
    With domestic demand of around 12,000 barrels per day (bpd)
and prospects of production of over 100,000 bpd by late 1991,
PNG would become an Ecuador-level crude exporter, Fesharaki
said.
    The Iagifu wells in the Papuan Basin have recorded the best
oil flows in more than 60 years of exploration in PNG.
    The PNG government's Geological Survey in a paper
distributed at the conference estimates Iagifu reserves at
about 500 mln barrels.
    PNG enjoys the most liberal tax regime in the region with
no secondary taxes, Fesharaki said.
    "We expect a much larger oil search in Papua New Guinea, and
discovery of much larger volumes of oil, similar in quality to
(light) Bass Strait crude," Fesharaki said.
    There are also large pockets of high quality condensates to
be produced, notably in the Juha field near Iagifu which is
capable of producing 30,000 to 40,000 bpd, he said.
    But prices should be somewhat higher than the present
levels to justify development of the Juha field, he said.
    The PNG Geological Survey paper noted there are five large
prospective but little-explored sedimentary basins in PNG.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9279>
Norway has offered 10 new offshore blocks
to foreign and domestic applicants in the first phase of the
country's eleventh concession round, government officials said.
    Company shares in each of the licences proposed by the Oil
and Energy Ministry are not final. The ministry has given the
companies 10 days to accept or decline the proposed shares.
    French companies Ste Nationale Elf Aquitaine &lt;ELFP.PA> and
Total Cie Francaise des Petroles &lt;TPN.PA>, which were expected
to receive operatorships following France's agreement last
autumn to purchase gas from Norway's Troll field, were not
offered operatorships in this round, industry sources said.
    Three eleventh round blocks were awarded in the
Haltenbanken exploration tract off central Norway, including
the Smoerbukk West field where Den Norske Stats Oljeselskap A/S
&lt;STAT.OL> (Statoil) was appointed operator.
    Statoil will share the licence with subsidiaries of U.S.
Oil companies Tenneco Inc &lt;TGT.N> and Texas Eastern Corp
&lt;TET.N> and the Italian oil company &lt;Agip SpA>'s Norwegian
subsidiary.
    E.I. Du Pont de Nemours &lt;DD.N> subsidiary Conoco Norway Inc
was named operator on Haltenbanken block 6406/8 and will share
the licence with Statoil.
    Norsk Hydro A/S &lt;NHY.OL> will operate nearby block 6407/10
with partners Statoil, Norsk Agip A/S, Royal Dutch/Shell
Group's &lt;RD.AS> A/S Norske Shell and &lt;Deminex> unit Deminex
(Norge) A/S.
    Statoil has been offered the operatorship on a new block in
the relatively unexplored Moere South exploration area south of
Haltenbanken, with A/S Norske Shell, Texas Eastern and
&lt;Petroleo Brasileiro SA> (Petrobras) also offered stakes in the
block.
    Norwegian companies landed operatorships on all six blocks
opened in the Barents Sea area off northern Norway. The blocks
were awarded in three licenses, each covering two blocks.
    Statoil will head exploration on blocks 7224/7 and 7224/8,
sharing the licence with Exxon Corp's &lt;XON.N> Norwegian
subsidiary Esso Norge A/S, The British Petroleum Co PLC's
&lt;BP.L> BP Petroleum Development (Norway) Ltd, Shell, Norsk
Hydro and Saga Petroleum A/S &lt;SAGP.OL>.
    Blocks 7219/9 and 7220/7 were awarded to Norsk Hydro, the
operator, Statoil, Mobil Corp's &lt;MOB.N> Mobil Exploration
Norway, Petrofina SA's &lt;PETB.BR> Norske Fina A/S and BP.
    The third Barents Sea licence, covering blocks 7124/3 and
7125/1, went to Saga Petroleum A/S, the operator, Statoil,
Atlantic Richfield Co's &lt;ARC.N> Arco Norge A/S, Total Marine
Norge A/S and Amerada Hess Corp &lt;AHC.N>.
    The oil ministry withheld awards on four strategic blocks
included in the eleventh round's second phase.
    The ministry is accepting applications for phase two blocks
until early April and the awards will likely be announced this
summer, officials said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9293>
British Prime Minister Margaret Thatcher
denied in an interview published in Saudi Arabia today that her
government's oil policy contributed to weakness in world oil
prices.
    She said the government was determined not to intervene to
influence production decisions by oil companies operating in
the North Sea.
    "We believe these must be a matter for the commercial
judgment of the oil companies," she told the Arabic language
daily al-Sharq al-Awsat in an interview coinciding with a visit
to London by King Fahd of Saudi Arabia.
    Thatcher said this policy had not contributed to the fall
in oil prices as North Sea production was now about the same as
in 1984 when prices were close to 30 dlrs a barrel.
    British production was on a plateau and was unlikely to
increase in the future, she said.
    "We naturally share the concern of Saudi Arabia and other
OPEC members about the harmful effects of oil market volatility
for both producer and consumer countries," Thatcher said.
    "On our part, we are careful to avoid any actions which
might add to such volatility."
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9436>
Energy Secretary John Herrington has
proposed several ways to boost U.S. oil production, but he said
all would cost the Treasury money and will come under close
White House scrutiny before action is taken.
    One measure he said he favored would raise the depletion
allowance to 27.5 pct on new oil and gas production as well as
production using enhanced extraction methods.
    Herrington said such a plan would cost 200 mln dlrs a year.
The White House, reacting, said it did not favor amending the
tax code, but would look at the proposal.
    Herrington's proposals to spur production were made along
with the release last week of the energy department's report on
energy and the national security.
    The report said U.S. oil imports, rapidly rising, could hit
50 pct by the mid 1990s and have potentially damaging
implications for national security.
    He has said since in speeches and at news conferences that
any plan he would back to spur lagging domestic oil production
would have to meet three criteria--increase production, not
cause economic dislocation, and be low cost to the taxpayer.
    Herrington said an import fee would meet the first test,
spurring production but fail the second and third.
    He said it would raise production and return 120,000 oil 
workers to their jobs, but at the same time it lifted oil
prices, the higher prices would cost 400,000 jobs nationwide
and cut the gross national product by 32 billion dlrs.
    A tax on gasoline, he said, would fail the first criteria
by not increasing domestic production.
    In any case, U.S. officials say, President Reagan remains
firmly opposed to an import fee and a gasoline tax.
    Options which meet Herrington's criteria include:
    - Loan-price guarantees to shield banks from defaults by
borrowers because of lower oil prices. It was estimated that if
oil fell to five dlrs a barrel it could trigger defaults that
could cost the government an estimated 15 billion dlrs.
    - A five pct tax credit for exploration and development. It
would raise oil and gas production the equivalent of 325,000
barrels a day, at a cost of 740 mln dlrs a year.
    - A five pct credit only for geological and geophysical
expenditures. It would increase production by 80,000 barrels a
day, at a cost of 65 mln dlrs.
    - Lower bid minimums on outer continental shelf acreage to
spur exploration. A drop from the present 150 dlrs per acre for
the typical 5,760 acre tract to 25 dlrs per acre would lower
the cost of the standard tract lease to 144,000 dlrs.
    Herrington also pressed anew for existing Administration
proposals to deregulate natural gas, which he said would cut
the need for imported oil by 300,000 barrels daily.
    He also called again for Congressional approval to explore
off the continental shelf, which may hold more than 12 billion
barrels of oil, and the Arctic National Wildlife Refuge, which
may hold nine billion barrels.
    Herrington said he understood the Reagan's reluctance to 
amend the newly enacted tax code to fund some of these
proposals, but added he hoped his department's energy/security
study would make a strong case for the need to help the
struggling domestic oil industry.
    Another move Herrington said he will press anew, even
though it had been rejected earlier by the White House, is to
raise the fill-rate for the Strategic Petroleum Reserve to
100,000 barrels a day from its planned 1988 rate of 35,000.
    This, he said, would further bolster national security in
case of an oil-supply disruption.
   
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9445>
Canada's federal government
will provide a 350 mln dlr oil industry aid package that
includes cash incentives designed to cover one-third of a
company's oil and gas exploration and development costs, Energy
Minister Marcel Masse announced.
    The aid program will inject about 350 mln dlrs a year into
the oil and gas industry and could lead to more than one
billion dlrs in new investment, Masse told a news conference.
    The program will affect drilling done anywhere in Canada on
or after April 1, 1987.
    Masse told reporters that the government's oil industry aid
package is aimed at small and medium sized companies.
    The aid package, called the Canadian Exploration and
Development Incentive Program, will restrict the total payments
that any individual company can claim to 10 mln dlrs a year.
    Masse said the program will probably generate new
employment equivalent to 20,000 people working for a year.
    He said oil industry aid is needed because exploration and
development spending dropped by at least 50 pct since world oil
prices fell during the first half of 1986.
    Energy Minister Masse said the federal government decided
to provide cash incentives so a large number of non-tax paying
companies, mainly small Canadian firms, will receive the full
value of the incentive. Such companies would not immediately
benefit from tax benefits, he said.
    The federal government also wanted to deliver an aid
program outside the tax system. Finance Minister Michael Wilson
is now reviewing Canada's tax system and plans to announce tax
reform proposals later this spring.
    An important feature of the aid program is a decision to
let companies issue flow-through shares, allowing investors to
benefit from the subsidy rather than restricting benefits to
only participating companies, he said.
    Allowing flow-through shares under the program will make it
easier for companies to attract investors in exploration and
development, Masse said.
    He told reporters his department is still considering
whether to allow partnerships and other entities to qualify for
the subsidy.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9527>
Earthquake-stricken Ecuador is
negotiating with Nigeria to have the African country lend it
10,000 barrels per day (bpd) of crude for export, Deputy Energy
Minister Fernando Santos Alvite told Reuters.
    He said Ecuador was negotiating a shipments schedule and
the terms of repaying the loan. Ecuador has suspended crude
exports for about five months until it repairs a pipeline
ruputured by a March five tremor.
    Santos Alvite added Ecuador is finalizing details for a
program under which Venezuela would temporarily lend the
country 50,000 bpd for export.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9583>
Texaco Inc's oil and gas reserves
declined in 1986 despite reduced production and upward
revisions in the company's previous reserve estimates, its
annual report said.
    The statement of the report's auditor was qualified -- as
was the previous one -- because of the unkonwn final impact of
the judgement won by Pennzoil Co &lt;PZL> against Texaco on
charges Texaco interfered with Pannzoil's contract to acquire
Getty Oil Co.
    The auditor's point out, as Texaco has in the past, the
company's loss of any of several pending court decisions in
this case could cause it "to face prospects such as having to
seek protection of its assets and business pursuant to the
bankruptcy and reorganization provisions of Chapter 11" of the
federal bankruptcy code.
    Commenting on a Texas Court of Appeals ruling which reduced
Pennzoil's judgement by two billion dlrs, to 9.1 billion dlrs,
Texaco said it will file a motion for a rehearing by the
appeals court no later than March 30.
    Texaco said the proven crude oil reserves of the company
and its consolidated subsidiaries totaled 2.54 billion barrels
at the end of 1986, down from 2.69 billion a year earlier.
    However, inclusion of Texaco's equity in the Eastern
Hemisphere reserves of a nonsubsidiary company limited the
decline to 2.91 billion barrels from 3.00 billion at the end of
1985.
    Worldwide production by the consolidated subsidiaries
declined to 341 mln barrels last year from 362 mln in 1985 and
upward revisions in previous reserve estimates rose to 143 mln
barrels from 117 mln, respectively.
    Texaco said the largest drop in reserves came in the United
States -- where the total dropped to 1.46 billion barrels from
1.55 billion.
    The company said U.S. liquids production averaged 660,000
barrels per day last year, down from 714,000 in 1985, with
about 44 pct of the decline -- some 24,000 barrels per day --
representing high-cost production shut-in or curtailed in
response to the decline in crude oil prices during 1986.
    Texaco said its natural gas reserves totaled 8.16 trillion
cubic feet at year end, down from 8.87 trillion cubic feet at
the end of 1985.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9634>
U.S. oil demand as measured by
products supplied rose 0.1 pct in the four weeks ended March 20
to 16.16 mln barrels per day from 16.15 mln in the same period
a year ago, the Energy Information Administration (EIA) said.
    In its weekly petroleum status report, the Energy
Department agency said distillate demand was off 0.1 pct in the
period to 3.258 mln bpd from 3.260 mln a year earlier.
    Gasoline demand averaged 6.72 mln bpd, off 1.2 pct from
6.80 mln last year, while residual fuel demand was 1.38 mln
bpd, off 2.1 pct from 1.41 mln, the EIA said.
    Domestic crude oil production was estimated at 8.35 mln
bpd, down 7.8 pct from 9.06 mln a year ago, and gross daily
crude imports (excluding those for the SPR) averaged 3.44 mln
bpd, up 16.3 pct from 2.95 mln, the EIA said.
    Refinery crude runs in the four weeks were 11.90 mln bpd,
up 1.4 pct from 11.74 mln a year earlier, it said.
    In the first 78 days of the year, refinery runs were up 1.8
pct to an average 12.25 mln bpd from 12.04 mln in the year-ago
period, the EIA said.
    Year-to-date demand for all petroleum products averaged
16.32 mln bpd, up 1.8 pct from 16.04 mln in 1986, it said.
    So far this year, distillate demand rose 0.1 pct to 3.31
mln bpd from 3.30 mln in 1986, gasoline demand was 6.60 mln
bpd, up 0.1 pct from 6.59 mln, and residual fuel demand fell
0.4 pct to 1.42 mln bpd from 1.43 mln, the EIA said.
    Year-to-date domestic crude output was estimated at 8.41
mln bpd, off 7.7 pct from 9.11 mln a year ago, while gross
crude imports averaged 3.96 mln bpd, up 28.1 pct from 3.09 mln,
it said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9639>
Unocal Corp said it intends to
increase its spending for capital projects to 929 mln dlrs in
1987, eight pct more than the 862 mln spent in 1986.
    The company said in its annual report that it would
increase spending for exploration and development of petroleum
resources by about three pct to 614 mln dlrs from 1986's 595
mln dlrs, assuming oil prices hold around current levels.
    The planned spending for exploration and production in 1987
remains well below the 1.1 billion dlrs spent in 1985, Unocal
said.
    The company's proved developed and undeveloped reserves of
crude oil rose slightly in 1986, Unocal said. Net crude oil and
condensate reserves were 752 mln bbls as of Dec 31, 1986,
compared to 751 mln bbls at the end of 1985, Unocal said.
    The company said its net crude oil and condensate
production averaged 248,200 barrels per day in 1986 compared to
251,300 bpd in 1985.
    Unocal said its worldwide natural gas reserves were 6.07
billion cubic feet in 1986 compared to 1985's 6.19 billion. Net
natural gas output averaged 976 mln cubic feet per day in 1986,
down 10 pct from 1985's 1,084 mln, the company said.
    Unocal said its average sales prices for crude oil was
12.67 dlrs a barrel worldwide in 1986 compared to 23.81 dlrs in
1985, and its average sales price for natural gas was 2.03 dlrs
per thousand cubic feet in 1986 against 2.24 dlrs in 1985.
    Average production costs for crude oil and natural gas
declined nearly 30 pct to 3.41 dlrs per bbl of oil equivalent
in 1986 from 4.81 dlrs in 1985, Unocal said.
    In the annual report, the company called for imposition of
an oil import fee by the U.S. government to set a floor price
of about 25 dlrs a barrel for crude oil.
    "Simply stabilizing prices at about 18 dlrs per barrel    
will not materialy slow the drop in U.S. production or the rise
in imports," Chairman Fred Hartley said in the annual report.
    "Without decisive action in Washington, this nation will
once again become a hostage to OPEC's plans and policies,"
Hartley said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9650>
Pennzoil Co said it had not yet
received any "meaningful settlement offer" from Texaco Inc but
added that the company remained willing to consider proposals
to settle the 10.2 billion dlr jury judgment it won against
Texaco.
    In its newly-released annual report to shareholders,
Pennzoil said it expected the Texas state court judgment, which
was upheld by a state appeals court on February 12, to be
upheld if appealed again.
    "To date, Pennzoil has yet to receive any meaningful
settlement offer from Texaco, though it remains open to any
realistic effort to settle the matter," Pennzoil chairman Hugh
Liedtke said in the annual report.
    Pennzoil also said it had budgeted 212 mln dlrs for capital
spending in 1987, a drop from the 233 mln dlrs spent last year.
    Proved U.S. and foreign reserves of natural gas declined to
964 billion cubic feet last year, from 1.01 trillion cubic feet
in 1985, because of a virtual halt in its exploration program,
Pennzoil said. Its crude oil reserves dropped to 140 mln
barrels from 158 mln barrels in 1985.
     The Houston-based company said it sold an average of 339
mln cubic feet of domestic natural gas each day last year, a 17
pct drop from 1985. The average sales price for gas dropped by
60 cents per mcf to 2.16 dlrs per mcf, Pennzoil said.
    U.S. crude oil and gas liquids production last year fell to
an average of 33,290 barrels per day from 34,102 barrels per
day in 1985.
    The company's total revenues in 1986 declined to 482.3 mln
dlrs, from 762.5 mln dlrs the previous year. Operating income
in 1986 fell more than 80 pct, to 38.0 mln dlrs.
    Pennzoil said its goals for 1987 included development of
its Point Arguello oilfield off the California coast, to
maintain current production levels in its Bluebell-Altamont
Field in Utah and to drill for prospects in the Gulf of
Mexico's Mobile Bay area.
    "Production should begin late in the year from the Harvest
Platform in the Santa Maria Basin offshore California," the
company said. "Pennzoil's share of this production initially
should be five thousand barrels a day, increasing to a peak of
15 thousand barrels a day, net, by 1989."
    In its sulphur business, Pennzoil said production totaled
2.1 mln long tons last year, a decline of 18 pct from 1985. The
average sales price also declined, to 138.25 dlrs per long ton
from 141.05 dlrs in 1985.
    "The long term outlook for our sulphur operations remains
bright," the company said. "We expect sulphur's pricing
structure to strengthen during the current year, probably in
the third and fourth quarters."
            
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9674>
Five regional oil producing nations
will gather in Caracas tommorrow for a two-day meeting expected
to center on ways to combat proposals for a U.S. tax on
imported petroleum, the Venezuela's ministry of energy and
mines said.
    Oil ministers from Mexico, Trinidad and Tobago, Ecuador and
Venezuela will be on hand for the fifth meeting of the informal
group of Latin American and Caribbean Petroleum Exporters,
formed in 1983, it said. Colombia will also attend for the
first time, as an observer nation, the ministry said.
    Energy and Mines Minister Arturo Hernandez Grisanti said
the conference has no set agenda but one entire session Friday
will be devoted to proposals for a tax on imported oil.
    Two of the group's members, Venezuela and Mexico, are
second and third largest foreign suppliers of oil to the United
States, respectively, following Canada.
    Venezuela, concerned about the effect such a tax would have
on its exports, undertook a diplomatic push to coordinate
strategy against such measures. In February, Canadian Energy
Minister Marcel Masse was invited to Caracas for talks with
Hernandez on proposals for an oil import tax.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9718>
No action has been taken yet
on the Reagan Adminstration's offer to escort Kuwaiti oil
tankers through the Gulf, but the issue is being discussed,
U.S. Secretary of Defence Caspar Weinberger said.
    The offer was made to Kuwait in light of Iran's deployment
of Chinese-built missiles to cover the entrance to the Gulf.
    Weinberger told reporters prior to a speech at Texas
Christian University that he did not think Iran and the United
States were moving towards a potential conflict, adding that
the Straits of Hormuz at the mouth of the Gulf were still "free
water."
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9801>
No action has been taken yet
on the Reagan Adminstration's offer to escort Kuwaiti oil
tankers through the Gulf, but the issue is being discussed,
U.S. Secretary of Defence Caspar Weinberger said.
    The offer was made to Kuwait in light of Iran's deployment
of Chinese-built missiles to cover the entrance to the Gulf.
    Weinberger told reporters prior to a speech at Texas
Christian University that he did not think Iran and the United
States were moving towards a potential conflict, adding that
the Straits of Hormuz at the mouth of the Gulf were still "free
water."
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9849>
South Korea is studying a plan to buy
more coal from the United States and to start importing Alaskan
crude oil to help reduce its huge trade surplus with the United
States, Energy Ministry officials said today.
    They said the plan would dominate discussions at two-day
energy talks between officials of the two countries in
Washington from April 1.
    Huh Sun-yong, who will attend the talks with three other
Seoul government officials, told Reuters that Seoul was
"positively considering buying a certain amount of Alaskan oil
beginning this year as part of our government's overall plan to
reduce a widening trade gap between the two countries."
    Huh said however that South Korean refineries considered
the Alaskan oil economically uncompetitive.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9913>
British Petroleum Co PLC's
announcement that its U.S. subsidiary intends to tender for the
45 pct of Standard Oil Co &lt;SRD> it does not already own,
catapulted U.S. oil stocks sharply higher this morning, traders
and analysts said.
    "It raises the specter of additional consolidation in the
industry and that is what is boosting the other oils," analyst
Rosario Ilacqua of L.F. Rothschild said.
    Sanford Margoshes of Shearson Lehman Brothers said "this
deal shows that British Petroleum, a conservative investor that
knows the oil business, is clearly confident in the U.S. oil
industry, and that shines well on the U.S. companies."
 More
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9947>
British Petroleum Co PLC's
announcement that its U.S. subsidiary intends to tender for the
45 pct of Standard Oil Co &lt;SRD> it does not already own,
catapulted U.S. oil stocks sharply higher this morning, traders
and analysts said.
    "It raises the specter of additional consolidation in the
industry and that is what is boosting the other oils," analyst
Rosario Ilacqua of L.F. Rothschild said.
    Sanford Margoshes of Shearson Lehman Brothers said "this
deal shows that British Petroleum, a conservative investor that
knows the oil business, is clearly confident in the U.S. oil
industry, and that shines well on the U.S. companies."
    Philips Petroleum &lt;P> gained 3/4 to 15-7/8, Occidental
Petroleum &lt;OXY> one to 34-5/8, USX Corp &lt;X>, with its Marathon
Oil Co unit, rose 1/2 to 28-3/8. Exxon &lt;XON> climbed one to
88-3/8, Mobil &lt;MOB> one to 50-1/4, Atlantic Richfield &lt;ARC>
3-1/8 to 80-1/2, Amoco &lt;AN> 1-7/8 to 84-1/8, and Amerada Hess
one to 33-5/8. BP gained 2-3/8 to 59-3/4.
    Both analysts said the rise in Standard's price this
morning to above the proposed tender price of 70 dlrs a share,
is an indication that investors expect the bid to be sweetened.
Standard gained 6-3/4 to 71-5/8.
    The analysts cited Royal Dutch/Shell Group's &lt;RD> &lt;SC> bid
for Shell Oil Co, which was sweetened before its successful
conclusion.
    Margoshes said the BP action "is an articulation of the
underlying value of oil companies in the marketplace." But he
expressed skepticism that this will necessarily lead to
heightened merger or buyout activity in the oil group.
 Reuter
</BODY>
